



Volume 34, Chapter 478.2: Who Isn't Kindhearted?


Ju Zi looked up into the sky and muttered to herself, “Perhaps I will give you a present the next time we meet. But I can’t give that to you.”

“Eh?” Huo Yuhao stared at her suspiciously; he didn’t understand what she was talking about.

“Why aren’t you leaving?” Ju Zi asked again angrily.

Huo Yuhao shook his head gently and said, “Farewell. If we meet again, I hope that we won’t have to be enemies. I truly hope that you will still be my senior that I studied with back then, and the same senior who helped treat my injuries. I’m leaving, Ju Zi, and you must take care of yourself. If the day comes that we finally don’t have to fight to the death on the battlefield, I will try my best to protect you and fulfill your wishes.”

Huo Yuhao stared at her deeply before he rose into the sky and flew into the distance.

Ju Zi stomped her foot heavily as he watched him disappear over the horizon. “Ah!...” She began to shout indignantly, and her entire being seemed to descend into hysteria.

She managed to calm herself down after a moment as she said angrily, “Ju Zi, Ju Zi... you say that his heart is soft, but isn’t yours as well? Why can’t you do anything to him? You know very well that he’s possibly the hardest enemy to deal with, and you should kill him. You will no longer have any worries if he is dead, and you will be able to do what you want with nothing in your way.”

She was still talking to herself when circles of fiery-red figures gradually appeared a hundred meters around her. Four enormous soul tools slowly rose as a red shadow swiftly came to Ju Zi’s side. It was the Fire Phoneix Douluo, Luan Feng.

“Why didn’t you give you the order, commander?” Luan Feng frowned as she asked Ju Zi.

Ju Zi turned towards her, and her eyes slowly turned wet as she suddenly plunged into Luan Feng’s arms and sobbed uncontrollably.

Luan Feng was momentarily stunned, and then she suddenly understood something as she heaved a faint sigh and hugged Ju Zi as she shook her head in exasperation.

Huo Yuhao was still hovering in midair in the distance as he watched everything that was happening on the ground, and a forced smile appeared on his face.

“Ju Zi, did you know that I would rather you have given the order to make a move against me? If that were the case, perhaps I would have been able to harden my heart to deal with you in the future. But because of your softness, my heart cannot be hardened to do anything to you!”

Ju Zi was so scheming, how could he be tricked once again? How could he not have considered that she could have arranged an ambush? Only his spiritual form was there instead of his original body, and if Ju Zi did give the order to attack him, his spiritual form had many ways to escape.

Huo Yuhao was a lot more careful because of the mistake that he had made previously.

But Ju Zi didn’t make a move, and he couldn’t say anything heartless, either. They had clashed and sparks flew, but everything had finally dissolved into a heartbreaking farewell.

Ju Zi was angry with herself, but wasn’t Huo Yuhao also hating himself for having a soft heart?

Ju Zi left, and she took her trusted subjects with her. The Extreme North grew calm once more, and all that was left were the marks of excavation.

-------------------------

Huo Yuhao returned to where the Ice Bear King was resting, and sat down beside him with his legs crossed as he started to meditate. He quickly calmed himself down as he took this opportunity to cultivate in the Extreme North’s bitter cold.

Three days quickly passed, and the Ice Bear King’s wounds were fully stabilized. Huo Yuhao finally returned to his journey with the Ice Bear King once more, going straight for Dragon City. He still had to rendezvous with Nan Qiuqiu, who was waiting for him there.

Dragon City wasn’t affected by the Sun Moon Empire at all, and everything was like before, though the city was still being penetrated by soul tools and technology. The Sun Moon Empire’s soul tools were still snaking their way into the Heavenly Soul Empire’s aristocrats and citizens’ way of life.

Huo Yuhao took the Ice Bear King, who was in human form, back to the cloth store.

Nan Qiuqiu was already very worried from waiting, and was immediately overjoyed when he returned.

“You still know to come back. You’ve been gone for so many days, but you didn’t send a message at all.” Nan Qiuqiu planted her hands on her hips as she shouted angrily at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao placed his index finger on his lips as he lowered his voice and explained. “I was in the Extreme North over the past few days, so how could I have sent a message back to you? There’s someone else here, calm down.”

Only now did Nan Qiuqiu realize that a round fellow had followed Huo Yuhao inside. This person’s waist, head, and torso were all circular, and his egg-like tummy entered the courtyard first before she saw his fat face, which was all smiles.

“Who’s this?” Nan Qiuqiu asked suspiciously.

The Ice Bear King didn’t wait for Huo Yuhao to introduce him, and he took a few quick steps forward as he said to Nan Qiuqiu respectfully, “You must be grandmother. Greetings, grandmother. I am Little Bai.”

“Grand… grandmother…” Nan Qiuqiu stared at him with slack jaws and widened eyes. Huo Yuhao felt his eyes go black, and he couldn’t help but slap the Ice Bear King on the head. “She’s not your grandmother! Don’t spout nonsense!”

The Ice Bear King withdrew his head like a wounded turtle. “Grandfather, this lady is quite pretty, so I thought she was my grandmother. So, she’s not?”

Nan Qiuqiu stared at Little Bai’s enormous torso before she turned towards Huo Yuhao and said, “Wait, wait. What is happening, exactly? You have to explain this to me. You’ve been gone for half a month, and you bring back a fat grandson back with you?”

Huo Yuhao answered with a forced smile. “He’s my distant relative, and I am his senior.” He could only explain everything like that. Otherwise, Nan Qiuqiu would probably hammer him with a lot more questions with that immensely curious personality of hers.

Distant relative?

Nan Qiuqiu glanced at Little Bai a few times suspiciously. She felt that this fatty wasn’t simple at all.

Huo Yuhao lowered his voice and said, “Qiuqiu, I ran into quite a big problem this time. I managed to figure out what the army was here for. They were here to excavate rare metals at the Extreme North’s borders, and they have already discovered where the veins of rare metals are. They have retreated, but I cannot guarantee that they won’t return in the future. We have to relay this information back as soon as possible, so that the Academy can prepare a response.”

Nan Qiuqiu asked, “Then what about the matter that eldest senior brother entrusted to us? Are we not going?”

“Of course, that still has to be done,” Huo Yuhao said in exasperation, “That’s the reason why we have to split up. I’ll write a letter, and you’ll deliver it to eldest senior brother so that he can pass it to Elder Xuan personally. I will complete the task that eldest senior brother has given us.”

Nan Qiuqiu’s eyebrows rose as she retorted, “Hmph, I knew it!. You just aren’t willing to do anything with me, and you’re always looking for ways to chase me away.”

Huo Yuhao forced a laugh and said, “Shit, isn’t this happening because our plans can’t keep up with what’s happening? This matter is too important. Furthermore, I’ll use a container to store a piece of Divine Ice Crystal, and you’ll bring that back for teacher Xuan so that he can inspect it and decide whether it’s suitable for crafting soul tools, and what kinds of soul tools the crystal is appropriate for. There’s something in it for you, too.”

There was quite a large amount of the crystal, and everything came from the Earthdragon Sect. Nan Qiuqiu would definitely get a piece of whatever soul tool they could craft out of it. Of course, those Divine Ice Crystals wouldn’t have their ice spirits. That wasn’t because Huo Yuhao was stingy, but because people without Ultimate Ice martial souls couldn’t use ice spirits at all. Divine Ice Crystals without ice spirits were just top-tier rare metals, and soul tools could still be made from them through certain methods.

Nan Qiuqiu’s expression became a little better after she heard his words. “I’ll follow you this time, then. But remember, you owe me!”

“What do I owe you?” Huo Yuhao asked.

Nan Qiuqiu grunted and replied, “I don’t care. You just owe me.”

“Alright.”

Huo Yuhao wrote the letter before he passed a piece of Divine Ice Crystal to Nan Qiuqiu so that she could take them back. He didn’t give her all of it, because it wasn’t safe, as she would be holding too many precious items with her.

Huo Yuhao escorted Nan Qiuqiu out of Dragon City to express how apologetic he was. He watched her depart before he turned around and went deep into the Heavenly Soul Empire with the Ice Bear King, in the direction of the Setting Sun Forest.

The Setting Sun Forest wasn’t far from the Heavenly Soul Empire’s capital, Heaven Dou City. Huo Yuhao couldn’t help but heave a sigh to himself when he thought about Heaven Dou City, because that was where the Tang Sect had originated! But now, the city was in the Sun Moon Empire’s hands, and he had to help the Heavenly Soul Empire retake this city in the future, if it was possible.

Huo Yuhao had already decided how he was going to proceed. He had to visit the Setting Sun Forest to check if Big Mao and Second Mao were alright. If they were fine, then all was well. Then he would have to scout around the Heavenly Soul Empire’s territories. He was by himself, and it was thus a lot easier for him to conduct reconnaissance duties of any kind. He wanted to see the Sun Moon Empire’s deployments, and he also wanted to find out how many of the Holy Ghost Church’s men were inside the Heavenly Soul Empire. He also wanted to search for traces of Tang Ya and Ma Xiaotao.

This process would probably take quite a long time, and was one of the reasons why he didn’t want to take Nan Qiuqiu along. It was a lot easier for him to escape alone, but things would be different if Nan Qiuqiu was with him.

Huo Yuhao relied on his powerful Spiritual Detection as he flew through the air. Even though he ran into some of the Sun Moon Empire’s aerial surveillance soul tools, he managed to evade them cleverly.

-------

Huo Yuhao was concerned about the Ice Bear King’s injuries, so he deliberately controlled his flying speed. They arrived outside Heaven Dou City after two days.

Heaven Dou City’s defenses were a lot tighter, compared to Dragon City. Huo Yuhao could see from far away that there were many aerial surveillance soul tools above the city. The Sun Moon Empire’s flag swayed in the wind on the city wall, and there were many soldiers patrolling and standing guard.

He couldn’t see what was happening inside the city clearly, but he didn’t dare to go any closer from the air.

Huo Yuhao stared at Heaven Dou City, and believed that the Sun Moon Empire had to have many soldiers stationed inside, judging from the situation. Heaven Dou City was the Heavenly Soul Empire’s capital city, and one of the most renowned and ancient cities on the continent. The Heavenly Soul Empire must have launched continuous assaults or ambushes from their forces in the shadows, and that was probably the reason why the defenses around Heaven Dou City were so tight. If those reclusive sects were the ones making moves, Heaven Dou City was their best target!





Volume 34, Chapter 478.3: Who Isn't Kindhearted?


There have to be powerful soul masters here, since there are so many soldiers standing guard. The Holy Ghost Church probably has men here too. I’ll take a look once I’m back from the Setting Sun Forest.

Huo Yuhao turned around and went straight for the Setting Sun Forest. He couldn’t help but wonder how Princess Wei Na and the others from the Body Sect were doing as he flew. The last time they had met at Radiant City, they were still so powerful, but they were now citizens who had lost their country.

The Setting Sun Forest was very close to Heaven Dou City, and Huo Yuhao could soon see the dense forest from a distance. There were faint flickers of brilliant colors deep in the forest. Of course, they were fatal.

“Be careful, Little Bai. This forest has a very toxic miasma inside,” Huo Yuhao warned the Ice Bear King beside him.

The Ice Bear King chuckled and said, “Rest assured, grandfather. Poison is what I’m least afraid of. Besides poisons like that belonging to the Ice Empress, the soul beasts of the Extreme North rely on our extremely low temperatures to resist most kinds of strong poisons. It’s all good… let’s go.”

That’s true. My Ultimate Ice isn’t afraid of poison, and the Ice Bear King is much stronger than I am. The Snow Empress has truly found a good helper for me, and everything is a lot safer with this fellow around.

It was the reason why Huo Yuhao felt confident investigating Heaven Dou City earlier that day.

Huo Yuhao took the Ice Bear King into the Setting Sun Forest, and went down the same familiar path as the Ice Bear King followed beside him.

Huo Yuhao was very different from when he first came here long ago. He was still extremely weak back then, and didn’t understand anything about what was happening here. Now, he was a formidable Soul Sage, and almost a Soul Douluo. His soul power had been increasing rapidly, even exponentially, after continuously absorbing the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence every day over the past few days. Huo Yuhao could even feel that he was close to that bottleneck, and the discovery actually surprised him.

Huo Yuhao’s soul power was only at Rank 74 when he left Shrek City. A little more than a month had gone by, but he could already feel that he was pushing towards the next bottleneck. This cultivation speed was simply too quick!

Of course, one of the most important reasons was that he had absorbed the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence, and the Snow Empress was there to guide him. By forming his soul core, his soul power cultivation speed was greatly increased. His soul core continuously helped him increase his soul power even when he was not cultivating.

The Icefire Yin Yang Well quickly came into view. Huo Yuhao unleashed his Snowy Dance of Ultimate Ice to expel the miasma as he took Little Bai into the valley.

A man and a bear descended from the sky right into the valley. However, Huo Yuhao was immediately taken aback when they entered the valley.

The Icefire Yin Yang Well was still a paradise on earth the last time he was here, but many things were different now.

There were many different plants growing densely inside the valley around the Icefire Yin Yang Well, but everything clearly looked a lot more chaotic.

Many plants on the periphery had disappeared, and some areas even revealed empty earth. Only the immortal herbs and plants in the inner circles appeared as they were. Furthermore, such a place that was filled with life did seem a little disarrayed. Some of the immortal herbs in the inner circle seemed like they had shifted around.

What happened? Did someone come inside?,

Huo Yuhao wondered as he walked towards the Icefire Yin Yang Well.

“You’re here.” He wasn’t even near the Icefire Yin Yang Well when a crying voice rang out.

The Ice Bear King was startled as he turned around vigilantly. He could see a large pinkish flower that was swaying its head around, and it was clearly emanating grievous emotions.

“How are you, You You?” The large pinkish flower was the Delicate Silk Immortal, and Huo Yuhao hurriedly greeted her.

The Delicate Silk Immortal was clearly full of resentment. “No, I’m not good at all. Ever since you guys sent in those two bastards, our plants haven’t been well.”

“Ah?” Huo Yuhao was momentarily stunned. Only then did he realize that the mess around the Icefire Yin Yang Well was related to Big Mao and Second Mao.

“What’s wrong, You You? Have Big Mao and Second Mao caused you trouble?” Huo Yuhao asked a little anxiously.

“They have caused more than trouble!” The Delicate Silk Immortal answered sorrowfully, “If not for the fact that some of us still have some strength, we would probably have become meals in their bellies. They’re not bears, they’re two pigs! Look at the outer layers. Originally, there were all kinds of herbs and plants there that were thousands of years old, but they have eaten them all. They are also very cunning, and have considered eating us more than once. We didn’t dare to kill them because of you. The home that we have relied on for subsistence has become so tattered. If you didn’t come, we might have risked everything we have to deal with them, and that’s because they have become far too powerful. If we don’t deal with them soon, they might just eat every single one of us.”

Huo Yuhao didn’t expect Big Mao and Second Mao to cause so much trouble. He hurriedly apologized, “Sorry, sorry. I didn’t know they would be like that. I’m here to take them away this time, don’t you worry.”

You You heaved a sigh of relief, and many immortal herbs and plants released similar emotions around them. They had to be wary of those two fellows eating them every day, and living a life like that was truly difficult!

The Ice Bear King didn’t pay attention to Huo Yuhao and You You’s conversation. Instead, his attention was focused on the Extreme Chill Icespring. He exclaimed happily, “Eh, this place seems very fun! That water is interesting!” as he spoke, and he strode towards it.

Huo Yuhao was caught off-guard as Little Bai leapt into the air and went right down towards the Extreme Chill Icespring.

The Delicate Silk Immortal’s voice froze, and was clearly a little stunned.

Is this human retarded? Why is he jumping straight into the Icespring?

“Is your friend committing suicide, Huo Yuhao?”

“Don’t worry about him. He’ll be fine,” Huo Yuhao said in exasperation.

The Ice Bear King plopped right into the Extreme Chill Icepsring, and quickly disappeared into the water.

“You You, where are Big Mao and Second Mao? Let me take them away,” Huo Yuhao asked the Delicate Silk Immortal.

The Delicate Silk Immortal’s enormous flowerhead gestured to one side and said, “They’re over there. Those two fellows are either eating or sleeping to digest some herbs. They are fast asleep. Their digestive abilities are too strong. They eat every day and digest every day, and they absorb everything especially quickly. Go take a look. Take them away as fast you can… we can’t stand them for a minute longer.”

“Alright, alright. Calm down. I’ll just take them away.” Huo Yuhao felt very guilty that Big Mao and Second Mao had caused so much harm to them. This place was a place that the Tang Sect’s ancestor, Tang San, had been to before, after all. He couldn’t just let this place be ruined!

He swiftly went in the direction that You You had pointed out, and the herbs and plants opened a path for him as they let him walk as he liked.

Big Mao and Second Mao were lying down in the outer layer. There were quite a few plants and herbs beside them, and there was even some residue around the corners of Big Mao’s mouth. Criminals wouldn’t want to be caught, but these two fellows didn’t care at all!

Huo Yuhao was astonished when he saw them. These two fellows were changing far too quickly!

A Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bear’s appetite was incredible, and Huo Yuhao had already known that when they were still in the Tang Sect. The food that they had to gather to feed them was equivalent to the volume that everyone in the Tang Sect ate every day. However, they were less than three meters tall when they left the Tang Sect. Less than a year had gone by, but Big Mao and Second Mao were at least seven meters tall now. Even though they were still quite a distance away from becoming fully-grown Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears, their growth was just too quick. Their current size and build meant they were at least Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears with a thousand years of cultivation.

A Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bear’s strength couldn’t be measured by the number of cultivating years that normal soul beasts were measured by. Thousand-year Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears were feared by even ten-thousand-year soul beasts, just like the first Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bear that Huo Yuhao had encountered back then.

Seems like they’ve been causing too much destruction, but they are growing very quickly!

Huo Yuhao didn’t know that back when Bei Bei sent Big Mao and Second Mao into this place, You You and the other immortal herbs had allowed them to stay because of Huo Yuhao. That was because the valley where the Icefire Yin Yang Well was located was very large, and all sorts of herbs such as ginseng and huangqi could be seen everywhere. They were all very nutritious and beneficial herbs. From the immortal herbs’ perspective, those two bears could eat for a few hundred years, and they still wouldn’t finish eating those things.

But what they didn’t know was that the Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears’ appetite couldn’t be judged from their size. They possessed far stronger digestive abilities than normal living beings, and they had eaten nonstop ever since they had arrived.

They were still eating normal food back at the Tang Sect, and they digested normal food normally. Even though they still ate a lot back then, their appetite wasn’t that outrageous. But the herbs and plants in this place were considered rare and exotic herbs, and every single species took their form from condensing large amounts of the spiritual qi of heaven and earth. The Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears were very good at absorbing the spiritual qi of heaven and earth. Big Mao and Second Mao would eat gluttonously every day. Then they would sleep, and digest everything as they slept before eating gluttonously again.

Humans would have exploded from the large amounts of nutrients if they ate so many herbs every day. However, the Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bear’s were enormous, and had a frightening capacity to absorb all the vital energies of heaven and earth. They ate quickly, and digested quickly as well, ending up with things like this.





Volume 34, Chapter 479.1: Heaven Dou City


Just as the Delicate Silk Immortal had said, if some more time were to pass, and Big Mao and Second Mao became sufficiently powerful, they would probably make a move on those immortal herbs. Those immortal herbs were plant-type soul beasts, and weren’t adept in battle. On the other hand, Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears were almost the most frightening soul beasts, and battle was their forte. Their ancestors in the ancient times were probably individuals that could match up to the giant dragons!

Huo Yuhao stared at these two in exasperation, but he was feeling happy inside. Big Mao and Second Mao’s growth undoubtedly added a lot of strength to the Tang Sect once more.

“Wa, this feels so good, just so good. Grandfather, I don’t want to leave. It’s too comfortable here.” The Ice Bear King’s voice rang out from the Extreme Chill Icespring.

Huo Yuhao snapped his head around. The Ice Bear King was swimming joyously and without care within the Extreme Icechill Spring in his original form, his body was emanating icy blue light. He did seem like he was enjoying himself a lot.

You You was rendered speechless, and the other immortal herbs descended into silence.

They had thought Big Mao and Second Mao were large enough, but they truly paled in comparison to the one in front of them. Furthermore, the Ice Bear King, who was still swimming happily, didn’t mask his aura at all, and the frightening ice-type undulations made the Blazing Delicate Apricot, who was on the Blazing Sunspring’s side, quiver uncontrollably.

The two little bears had already given them enough trouble. If this extra-large bear had a go, he probably wouldn’t even need a few days to devour every single plant in this place. All the plants in this place feared for their safety, and nobody dared to make a sound. They were afraid of angering Huo Yuhao or this enormous bear.

Huo Yuhao cursed under his breath as he activated his spectral demiplane, and he hurled Big Mao and Second Mao with one hand each into the demiplane. He erected a border inside the plane to protect the bears from being harmed by the undead outside before he returned to the Extreme Chill Icespring.

He was naturally unafraid of the Extreme Chill Icespring at his current cultivation. The temperature around the Extreme Chill Icespring was similar to that around the Manifold Mysterious Ice Cavern, and was probably higher than the cavern’s inner areas. The salient feature of this place was that the mouth of the spring coexisted with the Blazing Sunspring.

“Grandfather, my injuries are healing very quickly in this place. But I’m a little hungry.”

Every single plant around the Icefire Yin Yang Well almost shriveled when they heard that he was hungry. This time, their entire bodies were trembling.

Huo Yuhao almost laughed out loud when he saw how they were reacting. He could clearly remember, back when he was first here, how high and mighty these plants were.

“I’ll find something for you to eat when we’re out. Are you saying that the Extreme Chill Icespring helps you with your recovery?”

The Ice Bear King immediately nodded seriously and said, “This place is filled with much origin energy of heaven and earth, and it’s just so comfortable. I don’t want to leave anymore. Why don’t you let me stay here, grandfather, and you can come get me after you finish your business?”

“Uh…” Huo Yuhao hesitated.

“No!” You You immediately cried out in agony. “I beg you, Huo Yuhao, take him away. I will give you whatever you want, even if what you want is more than your ancestor Tang San’s limits. You can have whatever you want. We will cooperate as long as you don’t let him hurt us. Please take him away. Otherwise, we will be doomed.”

Huo Yuhao was all smiles when he heard the flower’s words and said, “How ashamed I am. I have already received so much help from you guys. How can I take anything more?”

The Delicate Silk Immortal didn’t even hesitate. “No, this isn’t something that you want. We are giving things to you of our own will. Every single one of us will give you something. Besides the Bluesilver Emperor that we can’t do anything about, the things we can give you should be sufficient for you to accomplish a lot of things. I just hope you will leave immediately after taking those things.”

The Delicate Silk Immortal shook its flowerhead gently as it spoke, and the Delicate Silk Immortal Pill that Huo Yuhao had seen before flew out.

The pinkish pill emanated an alluring fragrance as it drifted towards Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao caught it subconsciously.

The pill was lukewarm, and shone with pinkish hues in his hands. Its gentle aroma gave him an incredibly refreshing and comfortable feeling.

You You was a little depressed. “Is that enough?”

“I was about to take the bear away without asking anything from you guys. However, he’s injured, and I’ll stay here with him for two days before we leave.” Huo Yuhao spoke the truth. Even though the immortal herbs and plants here had been hostile to him before, he did get quite a lot of help from this place. He didn’t harbor any resentment or hatred at all towards these plants.

Furthermore, his ancestor Tang San had left this place behind. How could he let the Ice Bear King cause any destruction here?

But You You didn’t feel that way. The flower immediately thought Huo Yuhao was being sarcastic when it heard his words, and it immediately used the plant’s language to communicate with the other plants.

It didn’t take long before an entire pile of all kinds of good stuff that immortal plants produced appeared in front of Huo Yuhao. For instance, the Blazing Delicate Apricot’s Blazing Rubber was in that stack. The Blazing Delicate Apricot was evidently afraid of Huo Yuhao holding a grudge against it, and it took out almost every single bit of its blazing rubber.

The other plants made their own contributions, and almost everything was the best that they could produce.

Huo Yuhao was completely taken aback. He didn’t expect that the destruction that Big Mao and Second Mao had wrought would lead to something like this.

He didn’t intend to take anything from those plants, but if the plants were so generous and giving everything out of their own free will, he would do himself wrong by not accepting their gifts.

Thus, Huo Yuhao acted according to the various records inside the Poison Scripture that Tang San had left behind, and he used various methods to keep all these absolutely precious items and essences.

There wasn’t any burden on his conscience. After all, he hadn’t harmed the plants here. Essences were precious, but the many plants with more than a hundred thousand years of cultivation around the Icefire Yin Yang Well wouldn’t take long to recover after cultivating for a period of time. You You and the others were most afraid that Huo Yuhao would destroy everything here to get what he wanted.

Of course, Huo Yuhao understood that many of these plants were afraid of the Snow Empress and the Ice Bear King, who was happily swimming in the water. His own individual strength wasn’t enough to threaten these plants.

Huo Yuhao sincerely expressed his gratitude to the immortal herbs’ generous gifts, and the plants looked on eagerly as he pulled the Ice Bear King away.

The Ice Bear King did recover a lot more quickly in this place, but the plants weren’t assured at all! Huo Yuhao had taken gifts from them, and he would be ashamed if he dallied any longer. The Ice Bear King wouldn’t need too long to recover outside, anyway.

Huo Yuhao still wanted to laugh out loud as he left the Setting Sun Forest.

Fortune has shone upon me... and I couldn’t even stop it from happening! Oh, my ancestor, I didn’t ask them for anything! They wanted to give everything to me of their own will...

Huo Yuhao touched his face and thought,

Am I being a little shameless? However, those precious essences and treasures are useless if they remain in that place. In my hands, at least I can save and help people.

Huo Yuhao was confident that with the Delicate Silk Immortal Pill, even if he couldn’t completely heal Tang Ya, he could still suppress the evil soul power within her body to a certain extent.

It’s time to visit Heaven Dou City to take a look.

A dash of cold light flickered beneath Huo Yuhao’s eyes.

The Sun Moon Empire, and the Holy Ghost Church… no matter what, I will not let your plans succeed.

------------

The journey from the Setting Sun Forest to Heaven Dou City wasn’t far, but he was extra careful. He landed fifty kilometers from Heaven Dou City, and changed into regular clothes that normal citizens wore. He also used Imitation to readjust his appearance and facial features before he travelled towards Heaven Dou City.

As for the Ice Bear King, his appearance was unfamiliar in the first place. Even though he was a little fatter than he should be, he was just some fatty if he deliberately concealed his aura.

They arrived outside Heaven Dou City’s city wall in the evening.

Dusk was falling over the city as the sunset glow crept over the horizon. Blazing red clouds viewed from outside the city seemed to blanket the entire city in a layer of reddish-golden hues, and everything was dazzling and gorgeous.

Huo Yuhao and the Ice Bear King lined up at the gate, and went through inspection.

“Where are you from, and what is your business in Heaven Dou City?”

There was a team of fifty soldiers at the gate. Twenty were responsible for guarding the gate, while thirty others were responsible for interrogations and inspections.

Huo Yuhao had a wide arsenal of reasons and whatnot, and invented a name for himself and the Ice Bear King as they snuck through the gates.

The Sun Moon Empire’s soldiers didn’t deliberately cause any trouble for them. They were holding soul power detectors in their hands, and they could tell whether someone was a soul master by sweeping over that individual. If someone wasn’t a soul master, just asking a few questions was sufficient before the soldiers would let that person through.

Soul power detectors were useful against typical soul masters, but they were completely useless against someone like Huo Yuhao, who was adept at concealing himself. As for the Ice Bear King, his ability to conceal himself was possibly even stronger than Huo Yuhao’s, and he was more direct. The Ice Bear King withdrew his soul power into his soul core, and the thick layer of fat on his body severed any kind of undulations readable by the soul power detectors.

Heaven Dou City was still bustling and flourishing. Huo Yuhao used his spiritual power to sweep around after entering the city, and could still discover the marks of battle. That was especially true around the city wall.

Evidently, both parties had undergone an epic battle when the Sun Moon Empire invaded Heaven Dou City.

Heaven Dou City is where the Tang Sect originated from!

Huo Yuhao couldn’t help but clench his fists tightly.

Don’t you worry, Teacher Xiao Ya. I’ll help you take back our place of origin in the future, no matter what.

Bei Bei and Tang Ya were considered family. Huo Yuhao wouldn’t have been able to enter Shrek Academy if not for them, and even if he fused with the Skydream Iceworm, he couldn’t possibly have accomplished what he had today. Therefore, the gratitude he bore to the two of them came from deep within his heart. The Holy Ghost Church had captured Tang Ya, and she had become the evil sect’s Sacred Lady. Besides Bei Bei, he was the one that felt the most pain. Furthermore, there was still Ma Xiaotao, who he saw as an elder sister!





Volume 34, Chapter 479.2: Heaven Dou City


Huo Yuhao proceeded deep into the city once he entered, and found a hotel in a relatively bustling area to stay.

He didn’t have any leads right now, so he could only find a place to stay.

How easy could it be to find Tang Ya and Ma Xiaotao inside the Heavenly Soul Empire, or the Sun Moon Empire? He wasn’t hoping that he could just find them here, but searching for information inside a large city like Heaven Dou City was a lot easier. He was almost certain that there were evil soul masters in Heaven Dou City. The Holy Ghost Church wouldn’t relinquish the opportunity to control such an enormous city, and even if they couldn’t control it entirely, they would keep the city within their grasp.

Huo Yuhao and the Ice Bear King had something to eat after finding a place to stay, but this meal stumped Huo Yuhao.

The reason was simple; the Ice Bear King’s appetite was far too terrifying! One could imagine – he had a frame like a mountain, so how much did he have to eat to be satiated?

Everyone would find it very suspicious if Huo Yuhao just allowed him to eat as much as he wanted inside the restaurant.

Fortunately, the Ice Bear King had stored a lot of energy inside his body, and he could still sustain himself for many days even without eating. This would give Huo Yuhao enough time to find a solution.

Huo Yuhao brought the Ice Bear King out of the hotel after eating dinner. Resolving this glutton’s food issues was top priority. At the same time, he wanted to observe what was happening right now inside Heaven Dou City.

There were all sorts of surveillance soul tools in the skies above Heaven Dou City. Huo Yuhao didn’t want his behavior to be too eye-catching, and he spread his Spiritual Detection around him as he walked the streets, trying to maintain his sensitivity as much as possible during the process. In the end, even if his spiritual power was discovered, they couldn’t lock down on his position unless his opponent was also a soul master with formidable spiritual power.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t that concerned about his safety. With the Ice Bear King beside him, almost nobody could capture him unless there were many powerful individuals from the Holy Ghost Church present.

Heaven Dou City was still busy and bustling late into the night. People thronged along the busy streets, and one could hardly tell that this was a city that had experienced the flames of war not too long ago.

The main streets of Heaven Dou City were being repaired, and some soul lamps were being installed. There was no doubt that the Sun Moon Empire was still following through with their plan of converting the city with their technology and soul tools.

The Heavenly Soul Empire’s citizens were undoubtedly full of hatred towards the Sun Moon Empire. However, as long as they got used to all that new technology, and the core of those soul tools’ technology was within the Sun Moon Empire’s grasp, then the Sun Moon Empire wouldn’t be afraid of the Heavenly Soul Empire’s aristocrats or citizens resenting them. Given enough time, the Heavenly Soul Empire would be slowly assimilated.

Huo Yuhao walked the streets as he sighed inside. The Sun Moon Empire’s strategy was just too ruthless. They were saying that they were serving the citizens, and nobody could say anything about it.

-------

It was much later into the night, when the lights along the streets began to dim, before Huo Yuhao took the Ice Bear King back to the hotel.

Huo Yuhao had spent almost four hours scouting around, and he had already discovered some information about what he wanted to know.

“I’m hungry, grandfather,” the Ice Bear King said to Huo Yuhao with an aggrieved look on his face.

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly and said, “You’re not the only one who’s hungry. Those two fellows are hungry too.” He was naturally referring to Big Mao and Second Mao, who, after sleeping for a couple of hours, had awoken in the spectral demiplane. Huo Yuhao immediately communicated with them with his spiritual power after they woke up, and told them to play around inside the spectral demiplane for now. He instructed them not to go too far beyond the borders that he had established.

Occasionally leaving the borders for a few moments wouldn’t be a problem, but they were so lively, and Huo Yuhao would already be happy if they didn’t cause trouble with the undead.

But the biggest problem in the spectral demiplane was that there was nothing to eat. Those two fellows fooled around for a while, but soon expressed to Huo Yuhao that they were hungry.

Feeding three bears is truly a difficult task!

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly on the inside. Fortunately, he had managed to find a way to resolve their appetites when he was out. At least, he could deal with today, and everything else would have to wait.

The night was even darker outside. Huo Yuhao extinguished the lights before he took the Ice Bear King out of the hotel once more. This time, Huo Yuhao concealed them both entirely through Imitation.

“Grandfather, this ability of yours is fantastic. It’s very suitable for surreptitious activity!” the Ice Bear King said excitedly.

Huo Yuhao was almost rendered speechless. “Do you know how to talk? What surreptitious!? Your grandfather is taking you to eat.” Huo Yuhao could only accept the title now, as he was used to the Ice Bear King calling him that.

Huo Yuhao confirmed the right direction once they left the hotel before speeding up.

There were many surveillance soul tools in the sky, but they were inside a city, not the wilderness. Even if oscillation detectors discovered there were two people moving around, nobody would be alerted. Huo Yuhao realized when he was investigating before this that the surveillance soul tools above the city were mostly for monitoring. There were oscillation detectors and thermal detectors, but they weren’t rotating around, and were probably used for responding to sudden events.

Huo Yuhao wrapped through and around streets and alleys as they arrived near the southern city gate. Huo Yuhao turned and entered a string of alleys, and an enormous structure quickly appeared in front of him.

It was a warehouse... a warehouse that stored food.

Granaries were imperative for any city, because they fed the city’s citizens and the army.

For a large city like Heaven Dou City, at least ten such granaries had to be kept full to sustain everyone’s daily necessities. At the same time, these granaries could also be used in the case of a siege.

Only granaries could satisfy the Ice Bear King, Big Mao, and Second Mao. Huo Yuhao didn’t bother with whether the food was tasty or not.

The granaries were guarded very tightly. People that intended to cause destruction would normally start by burning granaries, because that was the easiest way to start chaos.

The granaries were heavily guarded, but that was for normal people. These defenses didn’t count for much against powerful individuals like Huo Yuhao and the Ice Bear King.

They had the protection of Imitation as the bear and man strode openly into the granary’s periphery. They would run into oscillation detectors and thermal detectors if they went further inside.

On the continent, these two kinds of soul tools combined, in addition to spiritual detectors, were considered a foolproof surveillance combination.

Therefore, places with these surveillance soul tools installed were typically very confident in their defenses. Spiritual detectors were expensive and not very practical, so such places would normally not be equipped with any. Most places were equipped with the other two kinds of detectors.

Huo Yuhao relied on Spiritual Detection and stopped accurately outside the surveillance soul tools’ maximum range. Afterwards, he used his spiritual power and opened it like an enormous web over the entire granary.

There was no surveillance without any loopholes. That was especially true for a place like this granary. Granaries were very important to normal citizens and soldiers alike, but they weren’t as important to soul masters and soul engineers.

Therefore, there were oscillation detectors and thermal detectors around them, but they only covered a certain part of this granary.

Finding their way in would be easy once they found a gap. Huo Yuhao wrapped around the main door and stepped towards the side of the granary before he snuck in with the Ice Bear King. Little Bai was clearly very hesitant when they were about to squeeze through the window, because he was too fat, and really couldn’t fit.

Solving that problem was very simple. Huo Yuhao stored him temporarily in the spectral demiplane before he went through the window by himself.

Heaven Dou City’s granaries were truly quite large. Grains and wheat were piled like mountains inside, along with all kinds of preserved and dried meat that could be kept for a long time.

Grains were suitable for anyone, while the meat was more suitable for the army.

Huo Yuhao found a corner that wouldn’t attract any attention before he released the three bears.

Bears were carnivores, and they weren’t very interested in grains. However, the dried meat and fish immediately attracted their attention.

Little Bai was too large, so he maintained his human form. Big Mao and Second Mao didn’t notice him in the beginning, but those two Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears quickly realized something wasn’t right when the three of them began to eat.

Little Bai’s mouth could immediately open and stretch to one square meter when he was eating, and a whole carcass disappeared with each mouthful. Was this something that humans could do?

Big Mao and Second Mao thought they ate very quickly, but the two of them combined were still quite some way away from how fast Little Bai was eating.

Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bears were very arrogant soul beasts. They were naturally unconvinced, and thus all three bears began to compete, stuffing themselves continuously.

Huo Yuhao was standing nearby, and his mouth twitched as the sides of livestock that were hanging in rows disappeared at an incredible speed.

Body mass and size were still directly related to appetite. Reality proved that Big Mao and Second Mao were working very hard, but they were still a far cry from Little Bai.

Big Mao and Second Mao had spent a long time eating all sorts of precious herbs and plants at the Icefire Yin Yang Well, and they were growing very quickly. However, the taste of herbs and plants was very unpalatable compared to meat. They unleashed their potential more than usual because of this rare opportunity to eat meat.

Fifteen minutes passed. They quickly ate their fill before they patted their round tummies and laid down on the floor, where they refused to move. On the other hand, the Ice Bear King was still there, as he took his eating seriously. One mouthful, and one hanging side of meat after another disappeared. Furthermore, judging by the way he looked, he didn’t even chew his food.

Little Bai was having the time of his life.

The Extreme North had always had a scarcity of food. No matter how peaceful the soul beasts there were, conflicts were still inevitable from time to time. Such conflicts usually happened because of the need to eat.

Someone at the Ice Bear King’s level naturally wouldn’t have to worry about eating. However, he was long since sick and tired of eating the same things every day.

This was his first time in the human world. The human world’s hustle and bustle had already moved him, and the dried meat and fish that humans made were extremely delicious. How could he hold back?





Volume 34, Chapter 479.3: Heaven Dou City


An hour went by before the Ice Bear King had his fill. More than a third of the meat inside the granary had disappeared…

Huo Yuhao only made his move at this moment, and used his extra-large storage soul tool to store the rest of the dried meat. He could feed these bears for two or three meals with that. Feeding bears was truly a difficult task!

They had their fill, and Huo Yuhao sent all three bears into his spectral demiplane to rest. This time, he didn’t even erect any borders. With the Ice Bear King around, his aura itself would ward off most of the undead creatures.

Little Bai changed back into his original body once they entered the spectral demiplane.

Big Mao and Second Mao immediately grew silent, no longer wondering why Little Bai could eat so much. They were all bears, and while the Darkgolden Terrorclaw Bear’s bloodline was considered superior to that of the Ice Bears, the Ice Bear King was so much older than they were! He was as powerful as a Savage Beast! Therefore, the two little bears naturally became little brothers to the big bear.

The Ice Bear King loved these two little bears. He had countless little brothers back in the Extreme North, and now that he finally had little brothers to boss around after he left there, how could he not be happy?

Huo Yuhao didn’t care about how the three bears were messing around inside his spectral demiplane as he snuck out of the granary and went back towards the city center.

-----

Huo Yuhao had to find some evil soul masters if he wanted to get any information about the Holy Ghost Church. He realized when he was scouting earlier that many soul masters were inside Heaven Dou City’s royal palace, which had originally belonged to the Heavenly Soul Empire. There were quite a few with formidable soul power undulations among them.

Huo Yuhao paused as he drew near the royal palace, and turned into a relatively darker street at the side. He turned a few more corners, and then vanished into a shadowy corner.

Huo Yuhao didn’t attempt to enter the royal palace directly. There were many powerful individuals here, and the palace’s defenses were undoubtedly the tightest. He would likely run into some spiritual barriers if he went in too hastily. If he was discovered, he couldn’t be sure if there were powerful soul masters who were adept with spiritual power.

Huo Yuhao concentrated his spiritual power, and channeled his Ultimate Ice soul power to readjust his body’s temperature. His body temperature quickly became one with the air around him, and he squinted a little as he used Spiritual Detection on the royal palace once more. This time, he was entirely concealed with Imitation.

Huo Yuhao had many formidable offensive soul skills, using either his Ultimate Ice or his spiritual power. However, he only had one true divine skill in his arsenal, and that was Imitation.

Imitation allowed him to conceal himself, and he could even change the way he looked. With support from his great spiritual power, he could devise entirely unpredictable and mutable battle tactics.

Huo Yuhao’s Imitation and Xu Sanshi’s Xuanwu Displacement could both be said to be divine skills that were complementary to their martial souls.

Huo Yuhao’s other soul skills were important, but they were relatively less important than Imitation, because his other soul skills could be duplicated by other soul skills.

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power entered the royal palace once more, and he quickly locked on to a small lake near him. This lake was undoubtedly manmade, its water was so clear that the bottom could be seen. It wasn’t very deep, barely more than a meter, and there were many exotic flowers and plants growing around the lakeside. It was like a garden inside the palace.

This dark and shady corner where Huo Yuhao chose to hide himself wasn’t a casual choice; he came to this place because he was eyeing this lake beforehand.

There were soldiers patrolling the royal palace, but the chances that they would enter this secluded corner were a lot lower. After all, there were many soul tools monitoring this area, and the patrols were targeted at blind spots and the most important areas.

This is the place.

Huo Yuhao activated his Eye of Destiny, and strengthened his Spiritual Detection once more. He adjusted his senses to their most sensitive states as he observed everything that was happening around the lakeside. Only when he confirmed that there was nothing wrong around the lakeside did he jump over the wall and enter the royal palace.

The royal palace’s walls were almost completely covered by oscillation detectors and thermal detectors. Huo Yuhao chose to enter was right after an oscillation detector swept over. These oscillation detectors rotated horizontally, and Huo Yuhao could only discover their rhythm with Spiritual Detection. He was making perfect use of this rhythm at this moment. Using that short window of time after he jumped over the wall, he dashed and arrived at the lakeside with a few ups and downs before he discreetly submerged himself in the lake’s water.

None of the surveillance soul tools would target the water, which meant he was absolutely safe there. Furthermore, Huo Yuhao could do a lot of things underwater.

Huo Yuhao held his breath as he sank to the shallow lakebed. The water wasn’t deep, and if it wasn’t already dark, he could be very easily discovered within the clear water, but discovering him under the cover of darkness was far too difficult.

Huo Yuhao’s eyes shone with pale blue colors after entering the water, and the temperature around him swiftly began to decline.

This small lake’s surface area was about five hundred square meters, and was considered exceptionally scenic. Under Huo Yuhao’s control, the bottom of the lakewater began to turn into ice.

In normal low temperatures, ice would definitely begin to form from the surface before it would spread downward. That was because ice had lower density, and would thus appear on the surface of the water.

However, ice began to spread from the bottom of the lake under Huo Yuhao’s control. Furthermore, the ice was secured to the lakebed, causing the low temperatures to spread from the bottom up. A thick layer of ice appeared after some time, and the ice stopped forming about ten centimeters away from the surface. Huo Yuhao’s body emerged from the surface, and he discreetly hid himself in a corner that wouldn’t be scanned by any surveillance soul tools.

From the outside, the lake was still full of water, and the water’s surface was still very calm. But anybody jumping into the lake would realize that the water was only ten centimeters deep, and everything below that was solid ice.

Only Huo Yuhao could achieve this level of control. Furthermore, he managed to vary the solid ice’s temperature in different areas, definitely something that normal people couldn’t accomplish.

If the temperature above the ice was too low, then the ten centimeters right below the water’s surface would quickly turn into ice as well. Huo Yuhao’s plan would be foiled if a patrolling soldier saw everything. On the other hand, if the ice’s temperature was too high, then the ice would quickly melt under the water around it, and Huo Yuhao wouldn’t be able to do what he wanted. Therefore, he had to control the ice’s temperature very delicately.

Huo Yuhao’s understanding towards ice and water had become a lot deeper over the past few weeks, and his control over ice and water became a lot easier and more casual.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t in a hurry to leave. He lay prostrate on the surface of the ice, and pressed his left hand underwater as he held a Milk Bottle in his right hand. He absorbed soul power from the Milk Bottle as he continuously channeled Ice Explosion into the ice beneath the water.

Huo Yuhao could detonate any kind of ice. However, only ice that was infused with Ice Explosion would possess the greatest explosivepower.

He had used this method back then to surprise even the Darkness Holy Dragon, Long Xiaoyao. It was enough to show how formidable Ice Explosion was. This was also an attack that couldn’t be directly used, yet was almost considered a divine skill, its importance second only to Imitation.

Huo Yuhao continued for a full fifteen minutes before he stopped. He moved, and continued the same set of actions. The lake’s surface was a little big for Ice Explosion, and infusing Ice Explosion into just one spot wouldn’t achieve the desired strength.

Another fifteen minutes passed before Huo Yuhao stood back up, and used Spiritual Detection to open a path as he snuck deep into the royal palace.

The various surveillance soul tools in the royal palace’s outer layer were greatest in number, and also the most sensitive. After all, prevention was better than a cure, and there were far fewer surveillance soul tools in the palace’s inner regions. There were many more people inside the royal palace, so surveillance soul tools weren’t that practical. Soul tools would only become effective if they were searching for someone under certain special circumstances. If that happened, handheld surveillance soul tools would be sufficient.

Huo Yuhao continued moving secretly into the royal palace. He would stop every once in a while to inspect everything around him closely before continuing. At this point, he was most afraid of the formless spiritual barriers, and even he could only detect spiritual barriers from a short distance away. If his spiritual power touched a spiritual barrier, the person who was controlling the spiritual barrier would directly locate him if they were strong enough.

Fortunately, spiritual barriers weren’t common at all. Huo Yuhao was about one-third of the way in as he pushed forward, and he still hadn’t discovered any spiritual barriers.

Huo Yuhao paused, standing in a dimly lit region between two pavilions. He briefly replenished his soul power and readjusted his spiritual power so that he was in peak condition before his eyes started to glow. Faint rose-gold colors flickered, and his Eye of Destiny opened on his forehead. All three of his eyes were radiating rose-gold hues, and that was especially true inside his Eye of Destiny, as a black whirlpool could be faintly seen. It was Huo Yuhao’s spiritual soul core, belonging to his Spirit Eyes.

People who were familiar with him would immediately understand after witnessing him in this state that Huo Yuhao was about to use a spiritual-type soul skill with his full strength.

Huo Yuhao unleashed Spiritual Detection to its highest possible level in the next moment, and it spread in all directions with his body at the center. It only took a few blinks of the eye before it had encompassed the entire palace.

The reason why he had to go deep into the palace was because of this. It would be harder to lock down his position if he was inside the palace, and the reason he did this was to startle and alert his enemies!





Volume 34, Chapter 480.1: The Godly Ice Explosion


At the same time, he wanted to see if the Sun Moon Empire had installed any spiritual barriers inside the Heavenly Soul Empire’s Imperial Palace. If they did, the place in which they did so had to be the most important, and either an important figure or object was bound to be there. He wasn’t afraid of being discovered, being totally confident in his ability to flee this place quickly.

He instantly unleashed his Spiritual Detection, and a three-dimensional structure of the entire palace appeared in his head. He squinted his eyes and sensed the slight changes around him. He also fully imprinted the three-dimensional structure of the palace into his memory using his immense spiritual power. It would be important for his next visit here.

Just like he had expected, he detected three places where spiritual powers interacted. This meant that there were spiritual barriers in those three places. Those three places were all located near the center of the palace.

However, no alarm sounded. The palace was very quiet, as if the spiritual barriers that had been touched didn’t alert anyone at all.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t complacent at seeing this. After scanning for three seconds, he instantly shut off his Spiritual Detection. At the same time, he quickly unleashed his Spiritual Interference Domain and used his spiritual avatar to leave behind a streak of his spiritual power and maintain his Spiritual Interference at this location. He instantly teleported fifty meters away before fleeing in a direction that he had identified earlier.

He had found out many things during that brief period of Spiritual Detection.

Indeed, a few seconds after he teleported away, two black figures had already arrived silently at where he had been standing. A huge black web, carrying a rotting smell, fell from the sky and instantly engulfed the streak of spiritual power that Huo Yuhao had left behind.

His spiritual power immediately dissipated and disappeared. His Spiritual Interference Domain also vanished, and everything turned dark once again.

“What?” a slightly surprised shout rang out. Two figures quickly dropped to the ground.

“What’s going on? There’s no one?” an elderly voice spoke up.

The other person was also puzzled, and said, “This shouldn’t be the case! Just now, I sensed that the person unleashing his spiritual power was over here. I can’t be wrong. This person’s spiritual power was strong!

“He might be a spiritual-type Titled Douluo. I didn’t expect someone as strong as him among the remaining losers in the Heavenly Soul Empire. However, he’s very sensitive. After discovering our spiritual barrier, he quickly fled. But it’s not so easy for him to flee.” The voice of this person talking was very sharp, but their gender was unclear. His frail figure was concealed by a black veil.

The person beside him was a tall and large elder. His sinister gaze was still flashing in the darkness. He had long grey hair that flowed behind his back, while his burly figure was also concealed by his black clothing.

There was an image of a ball of white flame on their chests.

“Come, let’s follow his spiritual aura to find him. He can’t escape.” The frail man in black snorted coldly, and a deep purple halo was released from his body. This halo oscillated as it spread outward. During this process, slight vibrations appeared in the direction that Huo Yuhao had escaped in earlier.

“Oh? This fellow seems to be able to teleport. I only discovered traces of him fifty meters away. It’s a pity for him that it’s me! Hmph! Let’s go and chase him!” As he spoke, the frail man in black immediately leapt up, charging into the sky like a bolt of lightning, pursuing Huo Yuhao traces closely.

The other elder followed closely behind him, his toes touching the ground and letting out intense white light from his body. At the same time, nine soul rings rose from beneath his feet.

The colors of these nine soul rings were very weird. Two of them were yellow, two of them were purple, and five were black. It was an ordinary combination of colors, but each soul ring had a blurry layer of color on it, making the original, bright colors of the soul rings much dimmer. This was especially so for the five black soul rings. If not for the fact that they could be compared to the pitch-black clothing he was wearing, the difference in their colors might actually be overlooked.

Without a doubt, this elder was a Titled Douluo, whereas the frail man in black was actually surrounded by a layer of distorted light. Traces of yellow, purple, and black could be seen, but it was unclear how many soul rings he possessed.

The two figures quickly chased in a specific direction. Very soon, they came to the small lake that Huo Yuhao had used to hide.

While the Heavenly Soul Empire’s Imperial Palace was very expansive, that was mainly because of all the structures in the palace. For powerful soul masters like Huo Yuhao, they quickly reached the boundaries of the palace when they unleashed their full strength.

Huo Yuhao was hovering above the lake. If he moved forward any further, he would be within the range of the surveillance soul tools surrounding the palace. His Spiritual Detection was still in use. Due to his all-around detection earlier, he clearly knew where all the spiritual barriers were. Right now, he just needed to move his Spiritual Detection around those three spiritual barriers, and the entire palace would basically be under his observation.

He naturally discovered the two people that were chasing him. The pair were very quick. That elder was a Titled Douluo. As for the other man, Huo Yuhao was unable to clearly tell. However, the other guy had to at least be an advanced-tier Soul Douluo if he wasn’t a Titled Douluo, judging from his spiritual undulations.

Evil soul master?

A cold grin surfaced at the corner of Huo Yuhao’s lips. Following that, he charged straight towards a wall of the palace. At this moment, he didn’t seem to care about being discovered by the surveillance soul tools.

Deafening alarms rang out in the next moment. The entire palace was alarmed. Beams of light subtly appeared in the sky. The aerial surveillance soul tools were scanning in this direction.

Not only that, beams of soul rays started to surface from above the palace walls. They were all sweeping in his direction. The Sun Moon Empire did well in setting up a defense as strong as this, even though they had only occupied the Heavenly Soul Empire for a short period of time.

A cold and mysterious look appeared on Huo Yuhao’s face. He twisted his body in the air before his soul thruster lit up. Instantly, he charged towards the streets outside the palace. He unleashed his Imitation, and immediately disappeared.

Even if there were oscillation detectors, they still needed time to adjust and come over. By the time they arrived, Huo Yuhao would be long gone. It was impossible to follow him directly, given that his Imitation was in use.

Two figures were also chasing him at great speed. Just as they flew above the lake-

BOOM!

The entire lake seemed to have been mined with countless bombs. A terrifying explosion ensued, and almost the entirety of Heaven Dou City heard it. The lake had become the most frightening explosive. Countless ice flakes flew everywhere, and the immense explosive force blew apart the layer of ice that had formed below the surface of the lake.

This explosion was too sudden, and there weren’t any clues before it happened. When it occurred, the frail man in black and the elder were both surprised. They were both pure soul masters, and so they didn’t have any automatic defensive soul tools on them. When the explosion occurred, they could only subconsciously circulate their soul power to resist it. Both their bodies were instantly flung high into the air.

The frightening explosive force continued to surge up as the lake instantly expanded to five times its original size. The huge structures around it were immediately flattened by the explosion. Even the wide and thick palace walls nearby collapsed.

The strength of this explosion was equivalent to an all-out attack from an ice-type Titled Douluo. Although Huo Yuhao was a Soul Sage, he had accumulated power there for almost an hour. He had drained a lot of his soul power before he completed his Ice Explosion Technique. In addition, he had frozen the lake water into ice beforehand. The entire process took a lot of effort.

He’d planned a result just like this.

The distorted lights around the frail soul master disappeared following the explosion, revealing his eight soul rings. He was already coughing up blood in the air.

When Huo Yuhao had escaped earlier, he sneakily stuck close to the lake’s surface as he flew. For this frail soul master to follow his spiritual trail, he naturally had to follow Huo Yuhao’s escape route closely. Both of them were almost at the center of the explosion, and were sent high into the air by Huo Yuhao’s Ice Explosion Technique.

The elder was faring much better, given that he was a Titled Douluo. Although he was caught unawares, he still relied on his abilities to neutralize most of the impact. The other soul master wasn’t so fortunate. He was only a Soul Douluo, and also a spiritual-type soul master. He wasn’t adept at defense. As a result, he was immediately hurt critically by the explosion. His legs were blown off, and his soul power also became very messy.

The excruciating pain turned his aura into a huge mess. He was already screaming tragically in the sky, blood flowing from his pores. Fortunately, his cultivation was rather strong, which saved his life. If he were only a Soul Sage, he would have lost his life to Huo Yuhao’s accumulated Ice Explosion Technique!





Volume 34, Chapter 480.2: The Godly Ice Explosion


That Titled Douluo’s face was covered in ash from the explosion. Although his limbs weren’t blown off, the shirt he was wearing was in tatters now. He spat out blood in the air, which quickly froze before falling to the ground.

Both he and that frail soul master were evil soul masters. When evil soul masters were influenced by their own evil strength, they would become very self-centered. Naturally, the Titled Douluo couldn’t bother with the other soul master right now. As he tried to stabilize himself in the air, he quickly unleashed a defensive soul skill and hid within a layer of thick greyish fog. At the same time, he quickly retreated.

The other soul master couldn’t adapt at all. As he was critically hurt, he was already falling from the sky. He was flailing as he tried to circulate his soul power and control his body. However, he couldn’t do it in the end.

At this moment, he suddenly a chill down his entire body. This chill didn’t come from the temperature of the outside world; it originated from his own senses.

As a spiritual-type Soul Douluo who was also an evil soul master, his senses had always been very acute. When this feeling came, he realized that something was amiss. He desperately screamed, “Save me!”

The elder who was rapidly retreating heard his call the moment he exited the radius of the remaining shockwaves of the explosion. After hearing the calls, he was furious. It was because of him that they were caught in the ambush!

Aren’t you just falling from the sky? Don’t tell me you’ll fall to death even though you’re a Soul Douluo? Why are you screaming so loud? Even if you’re hurt badly, your injuries aren’t lethal.

The elder had no intention of saving him at all. However, it was also at this moment that he was shocked to find out that the dark sky seemed to have slightly distorted in an area a little ways away from the man in black. A beam of golden light flashed out before it penetrated into the head of the frail man in black.

The frail man’s body quickly shriveled up as he fell from the sky, and that golden light also revealed its true appearance. It was a long spear, bladed on both ends. The spear exuded blinding, petrifying golden light.

Disastrous!

The Titled Douluo seemed to have realized something. His figure quickly flashed away as he charged straight towards the sky.

That beam of golden light vanished in the next instant. There seemed to be a distorted figure that flashed away. In the next moment, everything returned to normal once again.

“Scoundrel!” The Titled Douluo shouted furiously, a huge patch of thick greyish fog pursuing that distorted figure. Wherever it passed, blasting sounds resonated through the air. However, his attacks were futile. He could only hit the air.

When that frail man in black was killed, he realized that the enemy’s target was that actually that frail man in black. The reason was very simple: he was adept at spiritual abilities!

From the start until the end, they had not seen the appearance of the attacker. However, without a doubt, this enemy was a spiritual-type soul master. Of course, in the eyes of the Titled Douluo, the attacker was a spiritual-type Titled Douluo. To this enemy, the elder wasn’t the true threat, because he could conceal himself from the elder. Even given the elder’s cultivation, and even if he unleashed all his senses, he could only discover his enemy within a certain range.

On the other hand, that Soul Douluo was different. With him around, it was like having an extra pair of eyes, much easier dealing with the spiritual-type Titled Douluo. Obviously, the spiritual-type Titled Douluo wanted to kill the Soul Douluo, because that would greatly reduce their ability to suppress him.

There were very few spiritual-type martial souls in the world of soul masters. There weren’t also very few spiritual-type soul masters, even in the Holy Ghost Church.

There were more spiritual-type evil soul masters compared to ordinary soul masters. However, in just a few years, three of them had already died. It was important to know that these evil soul masters were very crucial to the Holy Ghost Church, even though they had very weird temperaments. This Rank 87 spiritual-type Soul Douluo had now died. How could they possibly catch the attacker now?

----------

The person who had killed the Soul Douluo was indeed Huo Yuhao. After he charged out from the palace, he found the most appropriate time to use his Ice Explosion Technique with the help of his Spiritual Detection.

As for turning back to attack, it was originally not in his plan. He had only thought of that idea on the spur of the moment. He didn’t intend to deal with the frail man initially. After all, it was his first time seeing him and sensing his threat.

Huo Yuhao took action because he wanted to act when his Ice Explosion Technique was the most effective.

He controlled his Ice Explosion Technique with the help of his Spiritual Detection. Huo Yuhao didn’t flee too far initially. He stopped and turned back, and stayed just outside the palace walls.

He had returned was because he saw the Titled Douluo elder abandoning his partner, leaving him exposed.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t fit to be called an Ultimate Soldier if he didn’t seize such an opportunity!

Throwing the Golden Dragon Spear from afar was Wang Qiu’er’s ultimate skill. Huo Yuhao wasn’t as strong as her, but he wasn’t weak either, after fusing with the soul rings she had turned into. Furthermore, he had strengths that she didn’t have.

Why did the Golden Dragon Spear appear after the Titled Douluo saw a distortion in the dark sky?

It was because Huo Yuhao had used his Imitation on the Golden Dragon Spear just as he threw it.

This wasn’t just a simple use of his spiritual-type soul skill. It involved attention to detail. The process was very complex.

First, he had to leave a streak of his spiritual sense and spiritual power on the Golden Dragon Spear. He could only do this after his spiritual power materialized. In addition, he was only able to complete such a rapid fusion of his soul and spiritual powers after he had formed his soul core.

After this, he imprinted his Imitation onto the streak of spiritual power and used it just as he threw the Golden Dragon Spear out.

Simply speaking, his Imitation was actually unleashed through his Golden Dragon Spear, completely concealing it in the darkness. It only revealed itself when it arrived in front of the frail man in black.

Even after it appeared, it was fully under Huo Yuhao’s control, as he still had to ensure that his spiritual power continued to move the Golden Dragon Spear and complete the attack. The Golden Dragon Spear thus absorbed the life energy of the frail man, which was directly drawn away by Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power. On the Golden Dragon Spear, it was like an avatar with its own spiritual power and life energy. This avatar controlled the spear to return to him as fast as possible. As it flew back, Huo Yuhao’s Imitation was unleashed again, allowing the Golden Dragon Spear to move like the wind and instantly conceal itself.

Huo Yuhao’s attack actually drained a lot of his effort, even though it was just a simple strike. It was only completed through his immense spiritual control.

As for the elder, he had discovered Huo Yuhao too late. How could it be easy for him to pursue him now?

The immense soul power undulations caused by the Ice Explosion Technique didn’t just blow apart all the surveillance soul tools in this region of the palace, but it also caused great interference to the aerial surveillance soul tools in the air. It was only possible to locate Huo Yuhao using another spiritual-type soul master at the moment.

------------

Huo Yuhao moved through multiple streets and alleys as he took cover in the darkness. He only stopped after he was sure he was in a safe place.

Right now, his breathing was a little quick. However, there was an excited look in his eyes.

Ultimate Soldier! This was a true Ultimate Soldier! Sneaking into the enemy’s base, killing an influential figure and fleeing far away. From the start until the end, he wasn’t even exposed. The enemy didn’t even know who had made the attack.

This feeling was great!

From his earlier all-around surveillance in the Heavenly Soul Empire’s Imperial Palace, Huo Yuhao had already clearly found out that there was only one spiritual-type soul master in the entire palace. It was that guy. Without any soul tools, that guy wasn’t able to pose a threat to him.

Although spiritual surveillance soul tools could locate him, they still had to be controlled by soul engineers. Compared to soul masters, they weren’t very adaptable. Moreover, they couldn’t track him. Unless the enemy could use spiritual surveillance soul tools in conjunction with oscillation and thermal detectors, as well as lock onto his position the moment he was detected, there was no way he could be detected, given current soul tool technology.

Huo Yuhao had always been monitoring the Sun Moon Empire’s soul tool technology throughout this period of war, and was very confident in his own judgment in this matter.

When he landed in Ju Zi’s trap the last time, it was because he had been too careless. He had underestimated the Phoenix Soul Engineer Legion, which ended up exposing him. But it was a good lesson. At least he wouldn’t allow himself to be exposed in the future when it came to similar situations.

His direct fighting abilities right now were already very strong. More importantly, he was great at concealing himself. This was actually the most terrifying part about his skills.





Volume 34, Chapter 480.3: The Godly Ice Explosion


The reason why Ju Zi thought that Huo Yuhao would become her greatest enemy in the future was precisely because of this reason. Huo Yuhao’s ability to conceal himself made him much more dangerous than ordinary Titled Douluo. It was quite terrifying when a person’s traces couldn’t be found! Moreover, given Ju Zi’s understanding of Huo Yuhao, she knew his potential. He possessed an Ultimate martial soul, and he already had seven soul rings. There was no doubt that he would become a Titled Douluo in the near future. A Titled Douluo with an Ultimate martial soul was even more terrifying than a Titled Douluo who was an evil soul master!

Huo Yuhao entered through the window as usual when he returned to his hotel. He had already calmed down by now. After killing that spiritual-type Soul Douluo, he had managed to achieve his aim for this mission. However, this would have greatly alarmed the enemy. During this period of time, the Sun Moon Empire would surely increase their surveillance in the Heavenly Soul Empire’s Imperial Palace, it was inevitable. But could he continue to wait any longer?

The best way was naturally to wait for them to lower their guard before continuing his surveillance. The enemy might be more relaxed after a period of tension, which would then provide a great opportunity for him.

However, Huo Yuhao couldn’t wait any longer! There were still many things he had to do. He had to quickly gather more information here. Furthermore, through the earlier all-around surveillance, he was certain that neither Ma Xiaotao nor Tang Ya were in the Imperial Palace. They were both Holy Ladies in the Holy Ghost Church, and very respected. If they were in Heaven Dou City, they would surely be in the Imperial Palace. Since they weren’t, the likelihood that they were in this city was very small.

When he thought about that, Huo Yuhao’s good mood diminished slightly. Without being able to find Ma Xiaotao and Tang Ya, it meant that his most important target of this mission wasn’t achieved. How could he be happy now?

What should I do? Should I try to capture an evil soul master to gather information?

Huo Yuhao furrowed his brow. That was the stupidest idea. Perhaps it might be effective, but it wasn’t going to be easy. In addition, those evil soul masters might not know where Tang Ya was. But it seemed like he still had to give it a go.

He sat cross-legged and thought for a moment. He decided that he couldn’t think of a better plan. It seemed like capturing an evil soul master and searching his memories was the best he could do...

After deciding on this strategy, he had another goal to reach. He thought about it for a moment before he started to fine-tune his plan.

If he wanted to find an evil soul master, the best place to do so was naturally the Imperial Palace. However, he had just caused a ruckus in the palace. The security in the palace was bound to be very tight now. Under such circumstances, how could he possibly capture a lone evil soul master? This was a huge problem!

Furthermore, the evil soul master that he captured couldn’t be too weak, either. Otherwise, it would be difficult to get any relevant information from him.

After formulating a plan, Huo Yuhao slowly entered into meditation and continued to absorb the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence into his body.

He felt as if his cultivation was improving by leaps and bounds following every session of meditation after he started to absorb the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. His soul power kept on getting stronger, and he was slowly becoming a Soul Douluo. If not for the fact that he wasn’t ready, he really wanted to find out what standard his cultivation had reached. According to his own estimates, he should at least be Rank 77 by now. It also meant that his soul power had improved significantly. He had reaped great rewards!

---------------------

The next morning, Huo Yuhao entered his spectral demiplane and fed the three bears. After this, he went into the streets again, and proceeded in the direction of the Imperial Palace.

As he walked the streets, he paid attention to all the chatter around him. Many people were discussing the explosion that came from the palace. It was even rumored that the perimeter of the palace was out of bounds right now.

Huo Yuhao kept on walking towards the palace, and only returned after circling around it once.

He discovered that the person in charge of Heaven Dou City from the Sun Moon Empire was still very rational. He didn’t seal off the entire city or make it out of bounds because of what had happened last night. The only area that was out of bounds was the street he was on yesterday, where a part of the palace walls had blown apart, and was under repair now. Apart from that, everything in the palace appeared to be fine, at least from the outside. He didn’t survey the inside of the palace using his spiritual power.

He had already unleashed his greatest spiritual power last night. There was no way the enemy wouldn’t be wary of him. Any spiritual barriers or similar soul tools would certainly be in use now. If he carried out any Spiritual Detection, he would be sending himself straight into a trap. Although Huo Yuhao didn’t really believe the Sun Moon Empire had any way of finding him, he wasn’t going to take the risk.

---------------

After returning to the hotel, Huo Yuhao called the Ice Bear King out from his spectral demiplane.

Given his individual abilities, he wasn’t really very impressive in Heaven Dou City. However, it was different if he had Little Bai’s help. Furthermore, he had some other plans...

“Grandpa, what kind of place is that? It’s really fun. Those skeletons are really interesting! Why are they running away from me?” Little Bai asked excitedly.

Huo Yuhao hadn’t set any boundaries for him in the demiplane. He had allowed him to bring Big Mao and Second Mao out to play.

When Electrolux created this demiplane, he had made it so that the specters in the demiplane could evolve. Even Huo Yuhao didn’t know where they got their energy from. According to the memories that Electrolux left behind, it should have its origins in spatial strength. As for how Electrolux managed to do that, Yuhao had no clue at all. It seemed to be a strength from another world. Unless his cultivation could reach that of Electrolux, there was no way he could possibly find any clues.

Huo Yuhao said, “This is a demiplane that one of my teachers left behind for me. It’s a parallel dimension of our world, and only I can open it. Since you like it here, I’ll let you enter a few more times in the future. However, we’ve things to do now. You must follow my plan.”

Huo Yuhao recounted his plan to the Ice Bear King. He knew that the Ice Bear King was rather simple-minded, and wouldn’t be able to remember a plan that was too complex, so he tried to simplify the mission that he gave the Ice Bear King. As for the complicated stuff, he left it for himself.

After settling the plan, Huo Yuhao and Ice Bear King remained in the hotel to rest.

----------------

Two days later...

The streets of Heaven Dou City were still very crowded. It was evening now, and the sky had just turned dark. This was the time when business was booming for hotels and restaurants. Apart from those who were going home, there were a lot of people who were heading to restaurants and eating places.

Huo Yuhao slowly walked among the crowd. After two days of observation, the situation in the palace had already quieted down. The damaged palace walls had already been repaired. As for what was going on in the palace, he didn’t manage to find out anything through his Spiritual Detection. Today was the day he was going to truly take action.

The Imperial Palace was already within sight in the distance. Huo Yuhao walked towards it naturally, finding a seat in a small restaurant not far from the palace. He ordered some dishes and sat there alone, eating by himself.

It was at this moment that a figure silently came to the outside of the palace walls. The light around its body was distorted, as if it had completely assimilated with the air. Some streaks of air could barely be seen distorting under the dim light.

If he revealed himself right now, everyone who had ever seen him would be shocked. This was because he was also Huo Yuhao!

Huo Yuhao walked slowly, his toes on the ground. He leapt up atop the palace walls. He silently unleashed his Spiritual Detection towards the inside of the palace.

Indeed, just like he had expected, the defensive installations in the palace weren’t any different from before. After all, it was quite unrealistic to install more oscillation and thermal detectors. The palace was so huge. How could they possibly find so many more spiritual surveillance soul tools in such a short period of time?

Huo Yuhao found a spot that the oscillation detectors didn’t cover, exploiting it to sneak into the palace. He quickly moved into the depths of the palace.

The number of patrolling guards hadn’t been increased, either. Perhaps the Sun Moon Empire thought that ordinary soldiers didn’t have any effect on Titled Douluo.

Huo Yuhao went going deeper and deeper into the palace. Everything seemed to be business as usual. His Spiritual Detection covered only a hundred meters from him. He didn’t carry out any detection on a large scale.

He only stopped when he was around five hundred meters from the center of the palace, where he hid silently in a dark corner.

It was also at this moment that the air started to undulate a little. Snow started to fall from the sky.

At the start, it was only a few snowflakes, but slowly, the wind grew stronger and stronger. More and more snowflakes started to fall. Patches of snowflakes were being blown about by the raging winds. In just a short period of time, the entire palace was covered in a blizzard.

It was weird, but this blizzard only engulfed the central area of the palace. It didn’t leak out to any other parts of the Heavenly Soul Empire.

At that moment, the people who were passing by not far from the palace were shocked. It was their first time seeing the palace being engulfed by a blizzard. Such a phenomenon would only occur in the Extreme North. Although Heaven Dou City was quite close to the north, and it would also snow in the winter, it was impossible for there to be a blizzard here!

This blizzard was very strong. When the snowflakes struck the structures in the palace, piercing scratching sounds could be heard.

The inside of the palace was a mess right now. Many of the patrolling guards were hurt by the driving blizzard. Furthermore, the temperature in the palace was falling dramatically. From the original ten degrees Celsius, the temperature soon fell to negative twenty degrees Celsius. The confusion and mess in the palace worsened under this extremely cold temperature.





Volume 34, Chapter 481.1: The Darkness Dragon Emperor


Shadows dashed out continuously from the structures inside the royal palace. There were soul masters and soul engineers, but they couldn’t do anything, even if they were outside. How were they supposed to face such a sinister change in the weather?

Several intelligent soul engineers immediately realized that the problem was probably in the sky. Everyone flew into the air to investigate.

However, they quickly ran into trouble once they actually went up into the sky. The further they went, the stronger the blizzard was, and fierce gales blew as their flying-type soul tools couldn’t support them any further. Many soul engineers were directly blown back down, and fell to their certain and miserable deaths.

Three elderly men appeared on a relatively tall roof inside the royal palace at the same time. One of them was the evil Titled Douluo that he had seen before. The two other elderly men seemed a lot more normal, and nine soul rings flickered on each of their bodies.

These were three Titled Douluo!

Huo Yuhao was still hidden within a dark and shadowy corner, but he could observe everything that was happening around him with Spiritual Detection.

There was no doubt that this blizzard came from the Ice Bear King, his execution of it was very similar to how it was back in the Extreme North.

The Ice Bear King quietly left Heaven Dou City before he followed Huo Yuhao’s instructions. He took to the skies from a place the surveillance soul tools above Heaven Dou City couldn’t reach. He flew more than four thousand meters above into the sky, far higher than the aerial surveillance soul tools could reach, before flying over above the royal palace and throwing this blizzard towards the ground.

This was the strength of top-tier individuals. The Ice Bear King wasn’t yet like an Ultimate Douluo, but his strength was comparable to that of a Rank 96 or Rank 97 Transcendent Douluo. Furthermore, even though his control over ice and snow wasn’t at the level of the Ice Empress and the Snow Empress, who could control Ultimate Ice, it was still sufficient for his blizzard to reach one hundred degrees below zero.

That was a very frightening number. The blizzard’s strength became a lot weaker as it came down from the sky, but it could still reach thirty to forty degrees below zero as it hit the ground. That was an enormous threat to normal people.

An evil soul master lowered his voice and asked, “What’s going on, Hallmaster Jing?”

The person standing in the middle of the three elderly men was, surprisingly, someone who Huo Yuhao was very familiar with: Jing Hongchen, the Illustrious Virtue Hall’s hallmaster!

Jing Hongchen wasn’t in the Illustrious Virtue Hall during the tremendous explosion in Radiant City. He wasn’t the only one that wasn’t there, as his two grandchildren weren’t there, either. They were heavily injured during the grand competition, so they were receiving treatment from the Royal Palace’s imperial physician. Jing Hongchen was protecting them at their side, and looking over them. Thus, they managed to avoid the disaster.

Still, the great explosion had dealt a heavy blow to Jing Hongchen. The Illustrious Virtue Hall was completely ruined, and his entire life’s work of blood and sweat was buried beneath rubble, just like that. In addition to his grandchildren being heavily injured, he fell extremely sick because of these blows, and even his cultivation took a hit. Following his granson’s gradual recovery, and in addition to the fact that Xu Tianran still relied heavily on him after ascending to the throne, his emotions were slowly able to recover.

Jing Hongchen had remained here as leader of Heaven Dou City after they conquered the Heavenly Soul Empire’s capital.

Heaven Dou City was one of the most popular large cities in the Douluo Continent. Furthermore, it was positioned in the Heavenly Soul Empire’s central and northern region, towards the west. They could use this place as a stronghold, and it was thus a very important transition stop for storing food and transporting soldiers. This place was an important strategic location in the Sun Moon Empire’s invasion of the continent.

Xu Tianran personally gave the order for Jing Hongchen to hold down the fort here, displaying Xu Tianran’s trust in him.

The war was started a little hastily, and the Sun Moon Empire’s Illustrious Virtue Hall was still being reconstructed. The Sun Moon Empire had to bear a great burden by starting this war, and even though they had gained the upper hand under Ju Zi’s superb battle strategies, their supply lines had been stretched longer and longer with the passage of time.

They needed soldiers to stand guard over the territories that they had conquered from the Heavenly Soul Empire, while they had to fight back against the Heavenly Soul Empire’s scattered attacks in their conquered territories, as well as against the reclusive sects, who were hidden away in the dark. They expended a lot of resources and men every day, and that was the reason why the Sun Moon Empire had channeled and mobilized as many resources and as much power they could going into this war. Jing Honchen was a Class 9 soul engineer who was loyal to Xu Tianran, and he was naturally given an important responsibility.

However, the Holy Ghost Church was starting to become increasingly outrageous within the Sun Moon Empire. Their Supreme Leader had requested that a soul master from the Holy Ghost Church be given the position of vice-city leader in any large city that the Sun Moon Empire conquered.

The Sun Moon Empire’s senior commanders expressed their strict opposition to that request at first. However, the Holy Ghost Church was just too powerful, especially because they had two Ultimate Douluo. They were very useful for the Sun Moon Empire’s invasion, so Xu Tianran had no choice but to accommodate their demands. He knew that the Holy Ghost Church was a little too large for efficient control, but he had no choice, because he wanted to expand his territory.

The strategy that Xu Tianran had in his heart was actually very simple: he wanted to continue using the Holy Ghost Church to expand the Sun Moon Empire’s territory, and with the passage of war, the Holy Ghost Church’s strength would undoubtedly be expended continuously.

The Holy Ghost Church was an organization of evil soul masters. Evil soul masters were indeed powerful, but at the same time, powerful evil soul masters had their own problem... the problem of replenishing their numbers!

The Holy Ghost Church had only attained the scale that they were at today after accumulating their strength for thousands of years in the darkness. It wasn’t done within one or two days. Once they sustained too many deaths and losses, their overall strength would continuously weaken.

As the Sun Moon Empire dominated more territory, their overall strength only became stronger, while the Sun Moon Empire’s royal family would have ever more soul masters and soul engineers to command. When the time came, the Sun Moon Empire would be increasingly stronger, while the Holy Ghost Church would become continuously weaker, and Xu Tianran wouldn’t be afraid that the Holy Ghost Church would turn against them. Furthermore, the two Ultimate Douluo were powerful, but they were already more than two hundred years old. They were very near human limits, and who knew when those two would just pass away from old age?

What Xu Tianran was truly afraid of were those two Ultimate Douluo!

The result of Xu Tianran accommodating the Holy Ghost Church in Heaven Dou City was another Titled Douluo from the Holy Ghost Church being here together with Jing Hongchen. This Elder’s title was Nightmare, and he was a rare soul master who was adept with illusions. His martial soul was the Nightmare Demon, a soul beast that had very poor fighting skills, but extremely powerful illusory skills. It was the reason why his martial soul was very rare.

The Nightmare Douluo hadn’t unleashed his true powers when Huo Yuhao faced him that day. Both soul masters and normal citizens would enter a dream-like state when struck by his illusory attacks. If that happened, then the Nightmare Douluo could kill that individual, and even control them in battle. The final result was that the person who was put into a nightmare would die regardless, while all that resentment and fear after death was extremely beneficial for the Nightmare Douluo’s cultivation.

The Nightmare Douluo once sent an entire village into a nightmare due to some private benefit a long time ago, and became a public enemy. He was chased down by many soul masters, but his illusions were far too powerful, and he finally broke out while killing many of the soul masters who were chasing him. He all but disappeared in the end, and vanished off the grid. He was then recruited by the Holy Ghost Church.

The Nightmare Douluo wasn’t much of a threat to top-tier soul masters. Illusions were hardly effective against Transcendent Douluo, but if his nightmares were used against normal citizens or soldiers, the destruction that he could wreak could even surpass that of a Class 9 stationary soul cannon shell. Therefore, his status in the Holy Ghost Church was relatively high, and he was one of the few who were consecrated by the Holy Ghost. His status was even above an Elder!

Back when the Sun Moon Empire was attacking Heaven Dou City, the Nightmare Douluo had used his formidable illusions to confuse many soldiers on the city walls. He made them attack and murder each other, which created an incredible opportunity for the Sun Moon Empire, and he had remained after the city was broken.

The Nightmare Douluo today didn’t kill as much as he did back then. At his level, normal citizens and even low-tier soul masters and their resentments inside a nightmare were no longer enough to aid his cultivation. He needed soul masters at a certain standard so that he could improve. More accurately put, the more powerful a soul master’s spiritual power, the stronger the resentment after dying under his nightmares. That kind of resentment was the most beneficial for him.

“Speak, Hallmaster Jing!” The Nightmare Douluo’s face darkened as he pushed Jing Hongchen to speak.

Jing Hongchen frowned and said, “I can only conclude that this isn’t something created by soul tools. This should be a soul master’s ability, and this person has to be a Transcendent Douluo to bring such an enormous blizzard down upon us. I’ll take a look up in the sky. I’ll leave this place to the two of you.”

“Wait!” The Nightmare Douluo hurriedly stopped Jing Hongchen. “Hallmaster Jing, if you discover that Titled Douluo with formidable spiritual power, you have to notify me. We will try our best to capture him, and as long as we capture him, I’ll do anything for you if you need me in the future.”

Jing Hongchen glanced at him and nodded, “Alright.” With that, he flew into the sky. The powerful winds in the blizzard weren’t enough to block him, as he was a Class 9 soul engineer, and could only reduce his speed.

The Nightmare Douluo was furious after their attacker had escaped the other day, but he couldn’t find any traces of him at all. However, he was very excited! The attacker was a spiritual-type soul master, and if such a soul master perished under his nightmares, then that soul master’s resentment would be extremely beneficial for him.

From his perspective, Huo Yuhao should be a spiritual-type Titled Douluo. He was very clear that his nightmares and illusory abilities were insufficient to directly kill a spiritual-type Titled Douluo. However, he would have a much higher chance of success after severely injuring that person, while the resentment produced after killing them would still be the same. That person’s death could even help his soul power, which had been stagnant for a long time, improve once more!





Volume 34, Chapter 481.2: The Darkness Dragon Emperor


The Nightmare Douluo was at Rank 91. Evil soul masters had a very difficult time improving after reaching the later stages of cultivation.

The Holy Ghost Church had been accumulating strength for so many years, and they had accumulated quite a few Titled Douluo. However, Transcendent Douluo were few and far between, and there were just a few of them. It wasn’t hard to see how difficult it was to become an evil Transcendent Douluo.

Therefore, the Nightmare Douluo was extremely interested in capturing Huo Yuhao, so he didn’t hold back in asking Jing Hongchen for help. Aerial battle wasn’t his forte, and in terms of direct fighting strength, the Class 9 soul engineer Jing Hongchen was much stronger than he was.

Huo Yuhao had been observing Jing Hongchen and the other two through Spiritual Detection. He wasn’t worried at all as Jing Hongchen rose into the sky, as the Ice Bear King’s strength wasn’t something that Jing Hongchen could easily fight against. Battles that occurred five thousand meters up in the sky were based on absolute strength, as many soul tools would be weakened. Of course, Jing Hongchen had many ways of preserving his own life, and Little Bai wouldn’t be able to do anything to him, even though Jing Hongchen couldn’t defeat him. Furthermore, Little Bai had already accomplished the first step of his task. He should already be retreating, and he probably wouldn’t clash with Jing Hongchen.

The royal palace was still in a state of disarray at this moment. The blizzard’s viciousness wasn’t what caused the chaos, as this was the Heavenly Soul Empire’s royal palace, after all. The structures inside were tough, far stronger than the Sun Moon Empire’s tents back in the Extreme North. The blizzard couldn’t cause them much harm if they stayed inside their rooms. Of course, that was also because this blizzard came from five thousand meters high in the sky. The blizzard’s strength would be very different if the Ice Bear King had unleashed it from the ground.

The thing that was causing such disarray in the royal palace was the plunging temperature. Even Soul masters would be affected once the temperature reached thirty degrees below zero, and these effects weren’t minor. Normal soldiers couldn’t even move around at all.

More and more soul masters and soul engineers appeared outside. It was very difficult to pass down orders in such a tremendous blizzard, and they could only fight against it passively as they resisted the biting cold.

The soul power and spiritual undulations within the royal palace were very messy under such circumstances. Huo Yuhao activated Spiritual Detection once more, and avoided the two Titled Douluo on the roof as he stretched his Spiritual Detection toward those areas with a lot of people. He had to find a single target so that he could make a move.

An evil soul master’s soul power undulations were vastly different from those of normal soul masters, and their auras were different, as well. It wasn’t difficult to find an evil soul master. Huo Yuhao wanted to find an evil Soul Sage. Such an individual would be considered relatively powerful and higher up in the hierarchy, so he had to know quite a few secrets.

Indeed, Huo Yuhao quickly found his target after his spiritual power reached out. There were several evil soul masters clustered together amid the chaos, gathered in a room about four hundred meters away from him.

There was one person who was clearly the leader of the group, and the others all had relatively weaker cultivations.

This individual was a Soul Sage, and he emanated bluish-gray soul power undulations that circled around him. The other five evil soul masters all had four or five soul rings.

That’s him,

Huo Yuhao’s eyes squinted as he immediately made his move.

He snuck towards that location in a flash, and quickly came close behind that evil soul master. His eyes flickered as he closed in on the room, and sent a single strike of Spiritual Shock against one of the four-ringed evil soul masters.

The four-ringed Soul Ancestor made a stifled grunt as he slowly crumbled to the ground. Blood flowed from his eyes, nose, ears, and mouth, and he didn’t look like he could live through this.

“Who goes there?” the Soul Sage roared as he dashed out of the room in a flash and immediately caught sight of Huo Yuhao, who had just turned to run away.

An enemy! Evil soul masters were typically quite conceited, even though one of their own had perished. Huo Yuhao deliberately created an image that presented himself to this evil soul master’s eyes as a seven-ringed Soul Sage with two yellow, two purple, and three black soul rings.

Evil soul masters always believed that they were invincible against others of the same rank. The evil soul master saw that his enemy was just a Soul Sage, and he accelerated in pursuit of Huo Yuhao without testing out his actual strength.

The two Titled Douluo immediately noticed the disturbance from the rooftop far away, but they didn’t move at all. The reason was simple: the number of soul rings that Huo Yuhao displayed!

Soul rings were an absolute representation of one’s strength to most soul masters. Their enemy was just a Soul Sage, and there was already an evil Soul Sage in pursuit, so these two Titled Douluo didn’t have to interfere at all. They had to pay attention to the big picture, and protect against any top-tier individuals who might be appearing.

Huo Yuhao escaped very quickly. All the surveillance soul tools were severely affected by the blizzard in the sky, and they couldn’t lock down on his position. He wasn’t attacked by soul tools because they couldn’t lock on his location.

The Nightmare Douluo did not expect that the vicious blizzard in the sky was meant to create space for Huo Yuhao to escape at this moment. Furthermore, he didn't expect that a blizzard of such enormous scale was just so that Huo Yuhao could capture an evil soul master, rather than for an ambush.

The evil soul master who was chasing Huo Yuhao was also very quick. Three skeletal heads emanating dark green flames encircled him, their flames spurting behind him. Those flames continuously boosted his speed, and he was slowly bearing down on Huo Yuhao.

The Heavenly Soul Empire’s royal place wasn’t small, but it wouldn’t take a Soul Sage very long to leave its premises at full speed.

It might appear that Huo Yuhao using the Ice Bear King’s Blizzard to trick a Soul Sage was a little bit of overkill. But in reality, Huo Yuhao would have wasted a lot of time and energy looking for an opportunity if that didn’t happen, and his current plan was much quicker and more straightforward.

The royal palace was a mess at this moment. That was Blizzard’s most fearsome characteristic in group battles. Huo Yuhao lamented in his heart as he ran, as he thought about how fantastic it would have been if his Snowy Dance of Ultimate Ice could reach such an enormous size. Even if his domain attack didn’t possess such destructive power, simply creating such disarray while complementing his Imitation would greatly increase his stealth abilities.

The royal palace’s wall was in front of him, and the Soul Sage who was chasing him was about thirty meters behind him, in range for most offensive soul skills.

There were two rows and a total of eight small soul thrusters on Huo Yuhao’s back, and they activated at the same time as they immediately propelled his body forward. Huo Yuhao was like a cannonball as he arrived at the palace wall in the blink of an eye.

The evil soul master behind him almost vomited blood. He felt like he was just getting in range to attack his enemy, and was just about to unleash a soul skill to attack when Huo Yuhao accelerated and escaped his grasp. The feeling was just too hard to bear.

Can Ireally be that lucky?

The evil Soul Sage was furious as he hurriedly accelerated in pursuit.

How could he know that everything was under Huo Yuhao’s control with Spiritual Detection, and that it had nothing do with luck? The truth was that, with Huo Yuhao’s abilities, he could use many different ways to shake his opponent off in terms of speed. The reason why he used soul thrusters was because he wanted to conceal his powers as much as possible.

Huo Yuhao leapt into the sky as he tapped his foot gently against the palace wall, and shot away. He didn’t go up into the sky, as there were many aerial surveillance soul tools above him. Even though the blizzard had destroyed some, there were still some left.

Huo Yuhao found the Ice Bear King with Spiritual Detection. He asked the Ice Bear King to leave the city first and wait for him outside.

Huo Yuhao had already sensed that Jing Hongchen was searching for the Ice Bear King’s traces high in the sky, so calling the Ice Bear King for help would be counterproductive.

The evil soul master behind him was close in pursuit. The three large skeletal heads around him radiated green light, and he seemed to be using his full strength as he charged after Huo Yuhao at breakneck speed.

A faint cold smile surfaced beneath Huo Yuhao’s eyes.

It’s about time. There’s a lot less surveillance and monitoring outside the royal palace, while the blizzard has covered the royal palace. I have to take him down as quickly as possible.

Huo Yuhao turned around and raced along the palace wall. The evil Soul Sage was about to attack when Huo Yuhao used his soul thrusters to shake him off once more. They would arrive in a relatively spacious area if they continued forward, as the streets close to the royal palace were extremely wide and spacious. It was the dark of night, so there wasn’t anybody outside the royal palace.

The evil soul master grew even more furious.

This fellow is too slippery. Does he really think that he can shake me off within Heaven Dou City?

Even though he didn’t really know how to use soul tools, he was very clear about what the Sun Moon Empire’s aerial surveillance soul tools could do. He believed that soul engineers would chase Huo Yuhao down very quickly to help him capture this guy. But a person like him, who was so arrogant and perhaps even twisted, didn’t want others to interfere.

However, he suddenly realized that the Soul Sage who was running away in front of him had slowed, and the distance between them was closed in an instant.

Is he tired? He can no longer explosively unleash soul power?

The evil Soul Sage was overjoyed. He pointed his right hand at Huo Yuhao, and a sharp howl could be heard as one of the three skeletal heads orbiting around him flew out and blasted straight at Huo Yuhao.

This evil Soul Sage’s martial soul was very extraordinary. His mother had passed away when he was born from a difficult birth, and they were in the wilderness. He remained in the wilderness for several days before someone rescued him, and the toxins from his mother’s corpse flowed into his body, mutating his martial soul intensely.

His martial soul became a Skeletal Head after mutating. Furthermore, he was different from normal soul masters. Normal soul masters’ martial souls themselves would evolve and improve as they became stronger, and as soul masters obtained higher cultivation ranks. But his martial soul was extremely peculiar, as he would gain another Skeletal Head with each extra soul ring. He had only released three Skeletal Heads so far, and this was just part of his full strength!





Volume 34, Chapter 481.3: The Darkness Dragon Emperor


A skeletal head flew towards Huo Yuhao at this moment, and released a yellow circle from its surface. It was coming right at Huo Yuhao as the skull suddenly opened its mouth, and the skeletal head rapidly swelled as it chomped down on Huo Yuhao. The skull itself shone with intense green light.

Huo Yuhao could feel a tremendous force pulling on him. This force wasn’t targeted at his body, but at his spirit instead. This terrifying pulling force seemed like it was going to consume his entire spirit.

He lives up to his name as an evil soul master! He’s going straight for the spirit...

Huo Yuhao was a lot slower than before. Otherwise, the evil soul master wouldn’t have caught up with him. He didn’t rely on his soul thrusters to widen the gap like before, but tapped the tip of his foot gently on the ground as he spun around.

What the evil soul master saw were Huo Yuhao’s glowing eyes. Those eyes had boundless clarity, and two rose-gold beams of light fired from those eyes in the next moment.

The evil Soul Sage felt like a giant mallet had hammered onto his spiritual sea in that instant, stirring up torrential waves. He howled agonizingly as green light shone from his body while he plummeted from the sky. The giant skull about to bite down on Huo Yuhao froze in midair at the same time.

Huo Yuhao vanished into thin air with a flash. He reappeared right in front of the evil Soul Sage as he used his left leg soul bone’s skill, Instant Teleportation.

One versus one, and soul master against soul master was what Huo Yuhao was best at. Back when he was still on exchange at the Sun Moon Imperial Soul Engineering Academy, he had once relied on his own strength to defeat every single one of their members without taking a single loss.

His formidable individual fighting strength was displayed once more. Huo Yuhao used Spiritual Shock, and even though his opponent was a Soul Sage and Huo Yuhao didn’t use his Eye of Destiny, the evil Soul Sage bled from his mouth and nose as his spirit was severely damaged.

The evil Soul Sage fought with his life to recover, trying to regain control of his body. However, Spiritual Shock wasn’t something that was easy to deal with.

The evil Soul Sage stared into Huo Yuhao’s eyes right in front of him. He felt a chill run down his spine, and only then did he realize that his opponent was probably much less simple than he had imagined. In that moment, it was the first time that he hoped soul engineers would come and rescue him.

But how was that possible? Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Detection was in control of everything, and why would Huo Yuhao make his move if he didn’t find the most suitable opportunity? Since he had made his move, how could he still give his opponent a chance to retaliate?

Huo Yuhao’s seven soul rings immediately disappeared, as those were conjured with Imitation. How could he display his soul rings’ true colors for evil soul masters to see? There were still aerial surveillance soul tools monitoring them from above, as well!

The air around them contorted vigorously as the evil Soul Sage groaned once more.

Spiritual Blast!

This was a Spiritual Blast unleashed right at his head. The evil Soul Sage was still affected by what had happened before, and he couldn’t resist Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Blast at all, the torturous pain made him cry out painfully once again.

Light shaped like a whirlpool appeared above his head. It was Spiritual Confusion, another of Huo Yuhao’s powerful single-target control skills. Huo Yuhao would take control until the end, since he had started it. Huo Yuhao had always trained in both offense and control. He mostly played the role of an assault-type soul master, but his control-type abilities were actually more powerful.

Even a Soul Douluo would have trouble enduring through three formidable spiritual-type soul skills used one after another. So what if his opponent was an evil soul master? Evil soul masters’ spirits were stronger than typical soul masters, but that was still useless against Huo Yuhao!

Huo Yuhao’s entire being turned bluish-green, and an enormous bluish-green pillar of light blasted out from his skeleton. This was the Ice Jade Empress Scorpion’s Ice Empress’ Wrath, one of the two great soul skills bestowed upon him by her skeleton.

The evil Soul Sage no longer had any soul power to resist, and his spiritual sea was a complete mess, he had been severely injured. This evil Soul Sage, who had always been so arrogant, immediately became a frozen statue.

Huo Yuhao raised his hand and slapped the frozen statue before he disappeared into the air with it. He activated Imitation once more as he stored the frozen statue inside his storage-type soul tool.

Storage-type soul tools couldn’t store living beings because there was no air inside. Any kind of living being inside would die, or they would have to break out with their own strength.

But this evil Soul Sage was special. He wouldn’t die for a while after being frozen by Huo Yuhao’s Ultimate Ice. At least, he wouldn’t need air. Huo Yuhao wanted to leave this place first before dealing with him.

Huo Yuhao had accomplished his goal, and he turned as he was about to leave when everything seemed to change around him.

The Heavenly Soul Empire’s royal palace, which was in disarray because of the blizzard, suddenly quieted down to the point where the silence was terrifying. Even the streets became completely silent, and that silence was the kind as if all sound had disappeared.

Huo Yuhao was just about to leave, but he seemed like he was immobilized as he stood there, motionless. His entire body appeared listless.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t afraid when he was facing an army of a few thousand soldiers, but beads of sweat started to appear on his face within a few short breaths. He tried his best to calm himself down, but his emotions were making him quiver uncontrollably. This pressure came entirely from his spirit, and was the first time Huo Yuhao had experienced something as sinister as this since he began plying his craft.

Of course, the royal palace didn’t actually have no sounds, and the chaos couldn’t settle down instantly. Everything suddenly grew quiet around him because he couldn’t hear; he couldn’t hear a single person.

Suddenly, footsteps could be heard. Just footsteps, one person’s footsteps. It was the only thing Huo Yuhao could hear with his current sense of hearing.

A silhouette appeared at the end of the street and slowly walked towards him. There seemed to be a dense fog around him, and even a person as powerful as Huo Yuhao couldn’t see everything about him. Huo Yuhao felt like all he could see was a patch of darkness, like this person was a darkness that had consumed everything around him.

This person had not appeared in Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Detection, and the danger had come so suddenly. Everything was so sudden that Huo Yuhao didn’t know how to defend himself.

That silhouette wasn’t walking too quickly or too slowly. Huo Yuhao was using Imitation to conceal his tracks, but it had no effect against this person. They finally drew closer, and he was about ten meters away from Huo Yuhao before he stopped.

The fog cleared, and Huo Yuhao was stunned.

He knew this man.

If Huo Yuhao had a ranking of the most powerful individuals on the Continent, this person before him would be ranked among the top three of those currently alive. At least, he would be ranked as such among those powerful individuals that Huo Yuhao had seen before.

“I’m surprised that it’s you. If Xishui hadn’t told me about your existence, it would have been hard to believe that you’d grown to such a standard after a few short years.”

The voice sounded old, and there were tinges of benevolence and warmth, as if he were talking to a friend.

Huo Yuhao said plainly, “I am also surprised to see you here. Greetings, senior Long.”

Yes, this person who seemed like he controlled everything around them, the person who had appeared before Huo Yuhao, and seemed to have merged into the darkness, was one of the two Ultimate Douluo that he knew of: the Darkness Holy Dragon, the Dragon Emperor Douluo, Long Xiaoyao. He was a man who had once shared a reputation with the Dragon God Douluo, Mu En, and they belonged to the same generation.

Huo Yuhao’s heart sank right down when he saw Long Xiaoyao. He was very clear that a person like Long Xiaoyao wasn’t someone he could fight against. Long Xiaoyao was powerful to the point that Huo Yuhao couldn’t even properly imagine a fight.

Huo Yuhao’s mindset would probably have been better if this had happened before he had formed his soul core, and that was because he only understood after forming his soul core how much more powerful Ultimate Douluo were compared to Transcendent Douluo. Ultimate Douluo were humans who could fight against the Beast God, Di Tian, whose soul power was entirely present as soul cores.

Long Xiaoyao was clad in black, and his hair was all white. He wasn’t much different from when Huo Yuhao had last seen him.

The reason why Huo Yuhao didn’t expect to see him here was because Long Xiaoyao had never appeared on the Heavenly Soul Empire’s battlefields in any of the intelligence that Huo Yuhao knew about. At this moment, Long Xiaoyao’s appearance had undoubtedly severed every single one of Huo Yuhao’s escape routes.

“Youngster, I still vividly remember the wager we had. You gave me a pleasant surprise back then, but you have given me so many more pleasant surprises at this moment. You are a Soul Sage, and judging from your soul power undulations, you’re not far from becoming a Soul Douluo. Brother Mu has taken in an excellent disciple!” Long Xiaoyao seemed to lament a little as he spoke. He placed his hands behind his back and gazed into the sky. Who knew what he was thinking about?

“Don’t mention my teacher. If teacher were still alive, he would be ashamed to stand with you,” Huo Yuhao answered coldly.

His strength couldn’t even begin to compare to Long Xiaoyao’s strength. However, Huo Yuhao was not afraid, as strength and authority couldn’t bend his will. The Darkness Holy Dragon, Long Xiaoyao, was following the Holy Ghost Church, and that was something that Huo Yuhao held in contempt.

Long Xiaoyao frowned and said, “You youngsters don’t understand matters of the older generations.”

Huo Yuhao laughed coldly and said, “No, I do not understand. All I know is that you have chosen to take the side of the evildoers, and who knows how many people you’ve helped the Holy Ghost Church massacre. Many of the things that the Holy Ghost Church has done are a result of your existence. I really don’t understand. At your level, why do you allow yourself to be used by evil soul masters, and why do you help them destroy lives and create calamities? Do you know that if this is allowed to continue, and if the Sun Moon Empire conquers the continent, the Holy Ghost Church’s next target will be to take over? When that happens, all of humanity will probably become the Holy Ghost Church’s slaves, and they will give their lives and everything they have for evil soul masters to cultivate. Is Hell on the mortal world something you want to see?”





Volume 34, Chapter 482.1: Eight Skills Fired Consecutively


Long Xiaoyao’s expression changed slightly as he said hoarsely, “It’s not as serious as you make it out to be. Do you think evil soul masters are born evil? You and a great many other soul masters are wrong on this matter. The truth is, almost every evil soul master deserves pity, and that’s because the world shuns them due to their martial souls’ characteristics. They have had to go through much pain and bitterness in their earlier days, and that’s the reason why their personalities are a little extreme. I believe that if the Sun Moon Empire conquers the continent in the end and corrects the reputation of evil soul masters, everything will be different. They will control themselves, and as for who rules over the continent, that’s not something that I’m concerned about.”

Huo Yuhao laughed, and his laughter was very disdainful. “Yes, perhaps what you said does make some sense. There are many evil soul masters who deserved pity when they were younger. However, they start killing people because they have received unfair treatment, and they use all kinds of evil methods to strengthen themselves. How can that be the right thing to do? I may not know about others, but let’s talk about the Death God Douluo, Ye Xishui. I am willing to call her my senior because of my teacher, but it seems like she’s the demon king among humanity.”

“You are not allowed to talk about Ye Xishui.” Long Xiaoyao’s eyes suddenly grew focused, and Huo Yuhao felt as if his body was held in place by some tremendous power. This frightening strength was pressing against his body, like he was about to be ground into dust.

However, he grit his teeth and held on as he said with difficulty, “Am I wrong? She’s the Death God Douluo, and she controls the Death God Pagoda. The reason why the Death God Pagoda is so powerful is because it incinerates people’s spirits when it fires at full strength, while thousands of spirits are burned through every time it fires. I saw it with my own eyes, and from what it looked like, there were at least tens of thousands of spirits inside. That means tens of thousands of lives! How many evil soul masters are there? Every single one of them is a life, but does this mean those people that they so mercilessly slaughtered are not considered lives? Ye Xishui hasn’t just been killing people. She has imprisoned their spirits, and she will ultimately incinerate their spirits for an attack, and eventually obliterate them. Are such brutal and cruel methods things you wish to see?”

Long Xiaoyao fell silent after Huo Yuhao’s string of accusations. Of course, he knew that every single one of Huo Yuhao’s words was true.

Long Xiaoyao heaved a faint sigh and shook his head. “I cannot turn back anymore. I am willing to do anything for Xishui, and the only thing I can do now is to restrain myself so that I don’t kill people. I’m not clear as to what the Holy Ghost Church has done, but I do know something. Xishui has told that after the continent is united, there will be a new order, and true peace will only happen when that time comes.”

Huo Yuhao said nothing more. He knew that he could no longer move the Dragon Emperor Douluo. He stared coldly at him, but he was full of lamentations in his heart. But he still had some hope.

He couldn’t fight against the Dragon Emperor Douluo by himself. However, he still had the Beast God’s reverse scale on his body.

Huo Yuhao had managed to escape with his life from the Death God Douluo’s clutches with the reverse scale’s protection. The Beast God would naturally appear if Long Xiaoyao attacked him, and he felt absolutely threatened. Furthermore, Huo Yuhao now had his soul core, and the amount of energy his body could sustain was greatly boosted after he absorbed the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. Killing him wouldn’t be that easy.

Long Xiaoyao said plainly, “You’re hoping for the Beast God’s strength to protect you, eh.”

Huo Yuhao’s eyes grew focused, but he said nothing.

Long Xiaoyao smiled faintly when he saw Huo Yuhao’s silent consent. “Youngster, I am actually very interested in you. You’re so young, yet you can reach such a cultivation rank. That is considered extremely prodigious. Xishui has long told me about your situation, and I definitely won’t make the same mistake. In front of an Ultimate Douluo, you can’t defend yourself just because you have some protective abilities. Furthermore…”

Long Xiaoyao suddenly paused, and turned around towards a rooftop by the side of the street. He grabbed with his right hand through the air and said, “You’ve been watching for a while now. Come out, lady.”

The quiet and dark world suddenly seemed to return to normal, and the sounds that Huo Yuhao couldn’t hear reappeared once more.

“Ah!” A crisp exclamation rang out as a shadow was pulled from the sky by a formless strength, and this shadow fell not far behind Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao felt a little relieved as the pressure Long Xiaoyao had unleashed against him vanished completely. He glanced backwards subconsciously, and this time, he was truly astonished.

Just as he couldn’t sense Long Xiaoyao’s presence, he also didn’t sense this person’s presence with Spiritual Detection.

Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Detection was powerful, but it still had a focus. For instance, Huo Yuhao would only pay first attention to strong soul power undulations when he was using Spiritual Detection over a large area. He naturally wouldn’t pay much attention to normal citizens who didn’t have any soul power undulations, since these people didn’t threaten him much anyway. If somebody deliberately suppressed their soul power in a group of people with the right method, Huo Yuhao would have a hard time finding them. But if his opponent wanted to attack him, his opponent would have to channel soul power and come closer to him.

There was only one reason why he didn’t discover this person, and that was because this person was sufficiently familiar with him. This person knew about his Spiritual Detection, and this person had been hiding in the street beside the royal palace while concealing her soul power. She didn’t make any moves at all.

“You… why are you here?” Huo Yuhao’s voice was actually trembling, in contrast to his calmness before.

He wasn’t afraid at all if he faced against the Dragon Emperor Douluo by himself. The worst that could happen was death, and he had been at the borders of death countless times.

But he could no longer keep his cool as he stared at this person in front of him, and that was because she looked identical to Dong’er. She was Tang Wutong!

Tang Wutong didn’t land on the ground stably, but she wasn’t wretched enough to fall face-first to the ground. The Darkness Holy Dragon was still merciful to women.

She stood up and stared calmly at Huo Yuhao. “Why can’t I be here?”

The corner of Huo Yuhao’s mouth curved into a forced smile. There was nothing more to be said. They were facing the Darkness Holy Dragon; how could they just run away even if they wanted to? There was no more meaning to pursuing the reason behind why Tang Wutong was here.

Long Xiaoyao smiled and said, “What a pretty little girl. She has been hiding by the side for a while, and she has considered attacking me more than once after I showed up, but she just couldn’t find an opportunity. With her around, I trust your Beast God’s powers won’t be that effective. Let’s find another place. This place is too noisy.”

Long Xiaoyao waved his hand as he spoke, and everything descended into silence and darkness once more. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong immediately felt a terrifying soul power undulation rise up in the next moment. This wave of soul power poured out in all directions, with them at the center.

That formidable soul power was filled with darkness, but it was impossible to fight against. The soul power swept them up as the space around them began to contort. Huo Yuhao wanted to use Spiritual Detection to investigate what was going on, but his spiritual power couldn’t leave his body at all.

Is this an Ultimate Douluo’s power?

Huo Yuhao’s cultivation was far from sufficient. However, he had encountered many top-tier individuals before, and his senses were extremely powerful. Huo Yuhao could faintly feel that the Darkness Holy Dragon’s cultivation was probably higher than Ye Xishui’s. They were both Ultimate Douluo, but the Darkness Holy Dragon’s pure fighting strength was probably stronger. He wondered if his teacher was stronger than the Darkness Holy Dragon when he was in his prime.

Tang Wutong subconsciously arrived beside Huo Yuhao, and grabbed his arm nervously. Huo Yuhao turned back towards her as he channeled his soul power to protect them.

Tang Wutong looked at him and asked, “Do you really want to know why I’m here?”

Huo Yuhao forced a laugh and said, “Do you really think that holds any meaning anymore? Why didn’t you run when you saw the Darkness Holy Dragon?”

“Why should I run? Tang Wutong said plainly, “Furthermore, do you really think I could escape? His senses are different from your Spiritual Detection. You detect things as a whole, but his senses are very fine and delicate. When he appeared and discovered you while you were using Imitation, he naturally discovered me as well. I couldn’t escape even if I wanted to.”

Huo Yuhao heaved a sigh and said, “Then why did you come?”

Tang Wutong said, “Eldest senior brother was worried about you, and after Qiuqiu returned, he asked someone to go and bring you to go back as quickly as possible. He didn’t want you to continue searching for Tang Ya, and I am the messenger. I heard Nan Qiuqiu’s report about your travels, and I figured that you’d be looking for intel inside Heaven Dou City, so here I am. I just heard about that tremendous explosion inside the royal palace, so I began to search for your tracks. See, I only managed to find you just now.”

Huo Yuhao didn’t know what to say. Could he say that Tang Wutong was unlucky? But for some reason, he felt very safe and secure when he saw her.

The Darkness Holy Dragon seems like he has some way to block the Beast God’s strength. Am I going to die with Tang Wutong here today? That’s not so bad. At least, even though she isn’t Dong’er, she looks exactly like her.

Tang Wutong glanced at him and said, “What are you thinking about? Are you trying to escape?”

Huo Yuhao shook his head and said, “It’s too difficult for us to run away in front of an Ultimate Douluo. I can feel that the Darkness Holy Dragon is probably stronger than the Death God Douluo, whom we’ve encountered before. Why do you look like you’re not worried at all?”

Tang Wutong smiled, and her smile was just so beautiful. Her smile was just like Dong’er’s smile, except she didn’t have Dong’er’s tenderness when she was looking at him. Instead, there was an extra tinge of courage.

“Why should I be worried? Will worrying ensure my safety? Since that’s not going to happen, then there’s no point in worrying. If we have to die, then we will die fighting. This isn’t the first time that we’ve fought side by side.”





Volume 34, Chapter 482.2: Eight Skills Fired Consecutively


Huo Yuhao also laughed. “Yes! Even if we die, we will die fighting. I’m very honored to experience this battle with you. At the very least, we are the rare few in the continent who have battled Ultimate Douluo one after another.”

Tang Wutong released his arm and patted him gently on his shoulder. “Don’t worry, I’ll protect you.”

Huo Yuhao rolled his eyes and said, “You, protect me? More like I’ll protect you.”

Just as they were talking, the dark air around them suddenly stabilized as their surroundings became clear once more, and sound returned, along with sight. However, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were both momentarily stunned.

They were no longer outside the Heavenly Soul Empire’s royal palace. There wasn’t a single trace of urbanization; they were clearly somewhere in the wilderness.

What did that mean? It meant that the Darkness Holy Dragon had used his own strength to bring them both out of Heaven Dou City into the wilderness. That was just unbelievable. This was an Ultimate Douluo’s power! Perhaps he didn’t yet have the Beast God’s ability to pierce through spacetime, but even then, to be able to bring them both to this place unwittingly within such a short period of time was far beyond Huo Yuhao’s understanding.

The Dragon Emperor Douluo smiled as he watched their stern expressions. “What’s wrong? Are you afraid?”

Tang Wutong grunted contemptuously. “Afraid? What’s there to be afraid of? You’ve just been alive for a few more years than we have. If we had lived in the same generation, you might be afraid of us.”

“Yes!” Long Xiaoyao laughed, “You’re right. If we were in the same generation, I may not have been able to defeat you. You are prodigies of your generation, but I was also a prodigy back then. Now that I think about it, I feel like two hundred years is right before my eyes!”

A tinge of sorrow appeared in his eyes as he spoke. He nodded gently in Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao’s direction and said, “Come, the two of you can team up. Let me see what kind of fighting strength you prodigious youngsters can achieve. Don’t think of escaping, because that’s absolutely impossible. Fight with your full strength. Warriors who die on the battlefield die an honorable death.”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong glanced at each other, and each saw the other’s determination.

Huo Yuhao took a slow step forward, and his Eye of Destiny gradually opened on his forehead.

Tang Wutong didn’t fight with him for point position. Instead, she took a step back and stood behind him.

Their martial souls were unleashed at almost the same time, and seven soul rings swiftly rose into the air.

Huo Yuhao unleashed his Spirit Eyes. Seven soul rings that were completely out of the ordinary swiftly appeared, the most eye-catching one his blood-red soul ring, which appeared at the end.

His Spirit Eyes’ sixth soul ring came from Wang Qiu’er. The soul ring that she had given him was very special, and rose-gold in color. It didn’t share the same color as normal soul rings, but with his Eye of Destiny instead. His seventh soul ring came from a hundred-thousand-year Evileye Tyrant, and it was also red. These two soul rings were the most glaring amongst his seven soul rings.

Huo Yuhao began to release his formidable soul power, and his entire being seemed to faintly contort. He didn’t move immediately, but was just standing there quietly as he stared at Long Xiaoyao. His seven soul rings glowed one after another.

Long Xiaoyao seemed surprised when he saw Huo Yuhao’s seven soul rings. This was the first time that he had seen such a combination. However, the soul rings that he was looking at didn’t include the hundred-thousand-year soul ring at the end.

Even though it was a hundred-thousand-year soul ring, this arrangement was very normal. One of the two soul rings that attracted his attention was Huo Yuhao’s rose-gold ring, his sixth one, which was filled with the power of destiny. The other one was his white soul ring, his first one, which looked like it was no different from a ten year soul ring.

How powerful was the Darkness Holy Dragon, the Dragon Emperor Douluo? This white ring looked like a ten year soul ring in normal people’s eyes, but that wasn’t the case to him.

He was very clear on what ten year soul rings were like. They were white, but they radiated a drastically different aura. Even though the soul power in Huo Yuhao’s ten year soul ring was completely contained, along with its aura, Huo Yuhao’s white soul ring had a smoothness that ten year soul rings didn’t have. Faint golden patterns could be seen on its surface, and that was absolutely something that ten year soul rings couldn’t achieve.

There’s something wrong with this kid’s soul rings!

Long Xiaoyao thought to himself. Huo Yuhao wasn’t hasty to make his move at all. He was just standing there like a statue.

Very smart!

Long Xiaoyao praised Huo Yuhao in his mind.

This kid knows that I, with my status, will never take the initiative to attack him without him making a move first. He wants to raise his aura and his abilities to their highest possible level before attacking me.

But would that really be effective? Huo Yuhao’s Eye of Destiny gradually opened on his forehead. Rose-gold sun patterns of the stretched in all directions with his Eye of Destiny in the middle. His eyes slowly closed, like he was using his Eye of Destiny to view the world.

The light in his Eye of Destiny was crystal clear. Even Long Xiaoyao felt like his Eye of Destiny possessed a strange gravitational force when he took but one look, as if this eye was going to consume his soul.

Rose-gold patterns glowed as dense spiritual undulations strengthened at an incredible speed. Long Xiaoyao wasn’t particularly concerned in the beginning, but an astonished expression quickly began to show on his elderly face.

Such formidable spiritual power. Furthermore, his spiritual power is so pure and condensed. Even the Holy Ghost Church’s evil soul masters, who use special methods to cultivate their spiritual power, can only reach such a level of spiritual power when they become Soul Douluo. How is this young man doing this?

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power continued to strengthen amid Long Xiaoyao’s surprise. His spiritual power wasn’t just changing quantitatively; it was also changing qualitatively.

Long Xiaoyao wasn’t the only one who was astonished. Tang Wutong, who was standing behind him, was equally surprised.

She had known Huo Yuhao for quite some time, and they had fought side by side before. Back in the Ming Dou Mountain Range, the two them went deep into enemy lines together. But because of the Death God Douluo’s appearance, she didn’t see Huo Yuhao’s battle with Ye Xishui.

Tang Wutong knew that Huo Yuhao was very strong, but she had always believed that her overall strength wasn’t inferior to his. However, she was now starting to doubt that opinion. Huo Yuhao’s continuously rising spiritual undulations were far stronger than what his cultivation rank could normally achieve.

Condensed soul power gradually transformed into circles of rose-gold light. This light was very viscous, while Huo Yuhao’s body became a little blurry amid all those contorting lights.

Huo Yuhao’s body gradually floated into the sky as his seventh blood-red soul ring flickered. Rose-gold patterns appeared behind his back, forming an image of the Three-Eyed Golden Lion. Everything within several hundred meters of him, which included the light around Long Xiaoyao, was tainted with the same colors.

Long Xiaoyao sighed in amazement.

Is his spiritual power close to that of a Titled Douluo’s level? No, that’s not right. His spiritual power is similar in strength to a Titled Douluo, but it is is more condensed, and is on another level.

All of a sudden, blinding rose-gold patterns radiated all around Huo Yuhao, and his body seemed to vanish entirely within them.

A vertical eye that seemed material suddenly appeared in midair, and the intense spiritual power undulations rose to their highest possible level.

“Materialization of spiritual power!” Long Xiaoyao’s eyes grew focused.

The Huo Yuhao who was still sitting in a restaurant outside the royal palace suddenly dissipated as it disappeared into countless rose-gold light patterns that swiftly flew out of the city.

Huo Yuhao had left that spiritual avatar as his contingency plan, so that he could substitute it for his original body as he was running away to draw the soldiers chasing him away. However, this spiritual avatar lost its meaning when the Dragon Emperor Douluo appeared. As Huo Yuhao unleashed his spiritual power with his full strength, that thread of his spiritual power was immediately recalled by the Eye of the Asura.

Radiant golden light transformed into an enormous pillar of light as it surged into the sky. The rose-gold vertical eye was just hovering there, and a strange whirlpool spun rapidly within the coldness of the vertical eye’s pupil. All of the space that was covered by its rose-gold light began to contort in this moment.

For the first time, a truly astonished look appeared on the Dragon Emperor Douluo’s face. He had originally believed that he was already holding Huo Yuhao in high regard, but it seemed like his judgment was far from sufficient. The spiritual power that this youth displayed far surpassed that of normal Titled Douluo, and with Long Xiaoyao’s two hundred years of experience, he was entirely sure that even Transcendent Doulou would have a hard time reaching Huo Yuhao’s level of spiritual power.

Materializing spiritual power wasn’t something that happened with improving one’s soul power or cultivation rank. It was an attribute that only formidable spiritual-type soul masters could achieve. Furthermore, Long Xiaoyao could feel a soul core within Yuhao’s materialized martial soul true body! This was the core of why he was so astonished.

Huo Yuhao was a young Soul Sage, and yet he already possessed a soul core. It was even a soul core for a spiritual-type martial soul.

Brother Mu, oh Brother Mu. What kind of disciple have you taken in?

“The judgement of destiny!” Huo Yuhao’s ice-cold voice echoed through the twisting space, and a golden skull appeared soundlessly above Long Xiaoyao’s head. The skull was shattered in the next moment as it transformed into countless motes of flowing light that flowed into Long Xiaoyao’s body.

Even an Ultimate Douluo like Long Xiaoyao couldn’t resist the power of destiny. The darkness around him rippled vigorously, but couldn’t dispel the golden lights, and he could only allow them into his body.

This was the Eye of Destiny’s ability to unleash the judgement of destiny. It couldn’t decide the outcome of a battle, but it could change one’s destiny.

Long Xiaoyao chuckled as he muttered under his breath, “I haven’t been this surprised in a long time. Interesting, very interesting.”

Two beams of light blasted from the enormous vertical eye, one black and the other white, circling around each other and going straight for Long Xiaoyao.





Volume 34, Chapter 482.3: Eight Skills Fired Consecutively


“Eh, what’s this?” Long Xiaoyao was still standing there, motionless, and he grinned as he allowed those two beams of light to land on his body.

There weren’t any soul power undulations, nor were there spiritual undulations. The black and white beams didn’t seem to do anything at all. However, Long Xiaoyao’s expression changed a little when they actually landed on him, and an inexplicable sense of danger immediately appeared in his mind.

I can feel danger?

“Spiritual... Shock!” a voice with a strange tone rang out, and every syllable uttered made the enormous vertical eye a little brighter. He could see that all the rose-gold light that the vertical eye was radiating had turned blood-red at this moment.

A pillar of light that was the same size as the vertical eye blasted out in the next moment and went right for Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao snorted as his body, which was originally submerged within all the rose-gold colors, suddenly turned black, and a dragon roar that seemed to come from ages past arose. An enormous black dragon head appeared in front of him, howling at all the rose-gold light around him.

Spiritual power against spiritual power – this was the arrogance that belonged to an Ultimate Douluo!

Even though Long Xiaoyao wasn’t a spiritual-type soul master, his mastery of spiritual power had already reached the limits of terrifying because he was an Ultimate Douluo.

However, something that astonished the Dragon Emperor Douluo once more happened.

The rose-gold pillar of light that seemed unstoppable as it zipped through the air suddenly paused – yes, it paused – and a shadow suddenly appeared in front of it. It was Huo Yuhao, who was back in human form.

A rose-gold wheel of light glowed behind his head. There were patterns of a Three-Eyed Golden Lion within this wheel.

Huo Yuhao’s body slammed almost directly into the giant black dragon head, and he was immediately consumed by the darkness.

Everything happened too suddenly, and Long Xiaoyao was momentarily stunned. Afterwards, he looked on in surprise as the black dragon head that he had conjured with his spiritual power dissipated just like that. The figure of Huo Yuhao was still hovering in midair, the rose-gold pillar was reactivated, and enveloped that shadow before it wrapped around him and slammed brutally into Long Xiaoyao.

The rose-gold pillar’s origin, the vertical eye, disappeared in that moment, and a large black door filled with eerie and sinister auras took its place.

Huo Yuhao’s face was very pale as he stood at the gate’s entrance. He was holding Tang Wutong with one of his hands, and her Radiant Dragon Butterfly’s wings were outstretched.

“Let’s go!” Huo Yuhao dashed into the door as he pulled Tang Wutong along.

There would only be one outcome battling an Ultimate Douluo, and that was death and defeat!

Therefore, Huo Yuhao had never considered fighting against the Dragon Emperor Douluo from the beginning. What he needed was an opportunity.

Destiny’s Judgment from the Eye of the Asura was the first step to creating this chance. Bad luck appearing on his opponent was equivalent to good luck standing on his side.

Black and white lights crossed. Those were the Three-Eyed Golden Lion’s two powerful soul skills conferred by his sixth soul ring, Spiritual Dispossession and Destiny’s Demise. They instantly lowered his opponent’s defense against both material and spiritual attacks.

Even Huo Yuhao didn’t know what kind of effect these two powerful soul skills could achieve against an Ultimate Douluo.

What came next was his most powerful spiritual attack, the Eye of the Asura’s Spiritual Shock! The rose-gold colors were blood-red when he was using his full strength.

Huo Yuhao could only get closer to an Ultimate Douluo with spiritual attacks. He had actually paid an enormous price for that momentary pause in the middle, and cracks even appeared in his spiritual sea in that moment because of it.

But it was that momentary pause that allowed him to dispel the Eye of the Asura, and use Instant Teleportation to appear in front of his own Spiritual Shock. What he leveraged was the Dragon Emperor Douluo’s arrogance, betting that the Dragon Emperor Douluo would use spiritual power to fight against his own Spiritual Shock.

He was successful in his wager. He used his body to take a hit from the Dragon Emperor Douluo’s attack, and he used the soul skill that came from the Three-Eyed Golden Lion’s skull, Destiny’s Adjudication. That soul skill gave him immunity to spiritual attacks thrice a day.

Huo Yuhao managed to escape from the Evileye Tyrant King’s assault once because of this soul skill.

His chances were boosted once more!

The black door appeared because Huo Yuhao was already making his incantations when he became the Eye of the Asura. He relied on his spiritual soul core to do two things at the same time, and his body was enormously burdened as he completed the summoning of his spectral demiplane.

What Huo Yuhao needed was the last step in creating this opportunity. He made another bet, that his strongest form of Spiritual Shock could cause the Dragon Emperor Douluo to be momentarily stunned after taking a hit from Spiritual Dispossession.

If every chance came through in the end, then he had a chance to take Tang Wutong into the spectral demiplane and escape from this place.

The Eye of the Asura, Destiny’s Judgment, Spiritual Dispossession, Destiny’s Demise, Spiritual Shock, Instant Teleportation, Destiny’s Adjudication, and the opening of his spectral demiplane.

Huo Yuhao used eight soul skills one after another within such a short period of time, and he did all that so he could create a chance for him and Tang Wutong to run away.

Did he succeed?

Darkness was starting to descend upon them as Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong’s bodies were about to disappear into that large door which connected them to the spectral demiplane.

Everything in the world seemed to freeze in the darkness.

An elderly voice suddenly resonated through the air, which was already frozen and swallowed by darkness.

“Almost. You really almost succeeded.”

A gigantic black dragon claw flickered with dark purple light as it slashed out across this dark space, right at the black door that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong had just escaped into.

The large black door immediately broke apart as two bodies that were about to disappear suddenly became clear once more. They were forcibly pulled from the darkness surrounding them.

The silent darkness vanished as Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong collapsed onto the ground almost at the same time.

Tang Wutong’s eyes were full of fear as she helped Huo Yuhao back on his feet, as he was faltering and about to fall back to the ground. Her expression became increasingly solemn.

The Darkness Holy Dragon, the Dragon Emperor Douluo, reappeared within their vision amid the darkness, but he was no longer smiling.

His eyes were concentrated on Huo Yuhao, and there were unexplainable emotions rippling through his eyes.

“Now, I must admit that you are much more talented and accomplished than I was when I was younger,” Long Xiaoyao spoke sincerely. “With your current spiritual power, and the fact that you already possess a soul core for your spiritual-type martial soul before your eighth soul ring, you will have a chance to challenge me when you become a Transcendent Douluo in the future. If, one day, you can become an Ultimate Douluo, then you will be on the same level as the Beast God and the Evil Emperor. If not for my Silent Darkness Domain, you would have successfully escaped, and this episode would have probably become the greatest joke of my later days.”

Huo Yuhao struggled free from Tang Wutong’s support. He wiped away the blood that was coming from his nose as he said coldly, “We weren’t able to escape in the end, were we?” His nose was bleeding not because the Darkness Holy Dragon had hurt him. Instead, it was because he had paid a huge price to unleash eight powerful soul skills with his full strength, one after another. Every single soul skill was unleashed at its greatest possible level, and even his spiritual sea had begun to crack. His head was exploding with pain, and it was impossible for him to use spiritual attacks like he had before.

“But we haven’t lost. We will never lose in any moment before we die.” Tang Wutong took a step forward from behind Huo Yuhao and stood in front of him.

Huo Yuhao was momentarily stunned. Tang Wutong snapped her head around and glanced at him. “Why aren’t you willing to trust me? If we had combined our abilities back then, we might have succeeded. You have too much machismo.”

Huo Yuhao felt a little dazed in that instant when he saw her displeased expression. A thought suddenly surfaced in his mind.

If only she had been Dong’er. If I had teamed up with Dong’er, our plan would have succeeded!

“Now, it’s my turn!” Tang Wutong grunted coldly as she raced forward like a gust of wind. She was pretty, and she was aloof, and she seemed like the Goddess of Light lighting up the darkness around them in this moment. She had the determination of a moth pouncing towards fire, and an unwavering resolution.

Her pinkish-blue hair swayed in the air like waves as she continued charging forward. Crisp dragon roars could be heard as brilliant golden flames blazed behind her.

A smile appeared on Long Xiaoyao’s face once more as he stared at the determination and arrogance on Tang Wutong’s face. He gradually raised his right hand.

Right at that moment, Tang Wutong suddenly paused in midair as all seven of her soul rings shone.

Her soul rings were also different from normal soul masters. Black, black, black, black, black, black, red! She had six black rings and one red ring, six ten thousand year soul rings and a single hundred thousand year soul ring. It meant she had potential and talent that wasn’t inferior to Huo Yuhao at all.

One reason why Bei Bei went to look for Tang Wutong and sent her to ask Huo Yuhao to return, besides the fact that she looked just like Dong’er, was because Bei Bei hoped that she could pull Huo Yuhao slowly walk out from his thoughts and memories of Dong’er. But there was yet another more important reason, and that was because she was sufficiently powerful. She had seven powerful soul rings that made her much more powerful than a typical Soul Sage.

Her seven soul rings flickered as the radiance from her body flourished. The light pattern of a trident appeared on her forehead, and a tinge of blue immediately covered her otherwise golden frame.

Tang Wutong raised her head a little amid the bluish-gold colors. She allowed her flowing long hair to drift and sway in the wind, and a bright dragon roar rang out from her mouth. This dragon roar was crisp and bright, and along with the intense bluish-golden light, an enormous dragon-shaped shadow gradually appeared with her body in the middle.

That was a colossal dragon flickering with the colors of the rainbow. The dragon seemed illusory, but there was a dignity and majesty within the illusion that seemed like it could dominate the ages.





Volume 34, Chapter 483: The Dragon God's Descent


When it first appeared, the Dragon Emperor Douluo felt it the most acutely.

If Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power had left him astonished earlier, he was horrified to see the seven-colored dragon projection shining from Tang Wutong’s body.

If it was just the color or aura of this projection, the Dragon Emperor Douluo wouldn’t have felt it so strongly. More importantly, it was the dominance of the projection that made him felt so overwhelmed. It was a dominance that originated from her lineage.

“Dragon God?” Long Xiaoyao shouted, and subconsciously staggered back.

In the past, he and Mu En were called the Twin Holy Dragons of Black and White. Mu En’s title was the Dragon God, while he was the Dragon Emperor. However, such titles were only compliments to their immense abilities. Their martial souls were the Radiant Holy Dragon and Darkness Holy Dragon respectively, which were both branches of the dragon species. The reason why they were so strong was because they were one of the authentic dragons.

The Radiant Holy Dragon and Darkness Holy Dragon were both very respected, and were considered one of the more superior dragons. Long Xiaoyao’s martial soul was in fact of the same lineage as Di Tian. However, the difference between his martial soul and Di Tian’s was that Di Tian was the clan master of the Black Dragons, since he was the Golden-Eyed Black Dragon King. If the Darkness Holy Dragon actually existed, it would at most be regarded as an honorary elder of the Black Dragons.

The aura that Tang Wutong exuded right now clearly belonged to that of dragons. However, it was far superior to the aura of the Radiant and Darkness Holy Dragons. Furthermore, the terrifying dominance from her aura only belonged to the original Dragon God!

Even though the aura that came from Tang Wutong was slightly weaker, it was still different from that of the Darkness Holy Dragon.

Her abilities weren’t enough to threaten Long Xiaoyao, but her streak of dragon aura completely suppressed Long Xiaoyao and his Darkness Holy Dragon, and fear rose inside him.

Tang Wutong had used the fourth soul skill of her Radiant Butterfly Goddess, Dragon God’s Possession!

The seven-colored dragon projection turned into a layer of thin seven-colored dragon scales on Tang Wutong’s body. Her dragon scales extended all the way to her lower jaw. Only her head wasn’t covered. After she was engulfed by the thin layer of dragon scales, her aura became more and more dominant.

A pair of wings also dyed in the same seven colors rose up behind her. Her second soul ring started to shine, a seven-colored light burning brightly. It was her second soul skill, Dragon God’s Fury.

A high-pitched dragon roar reverberated through the air, forming a huge seven-colored light blade that chopped towards Long Xiaoyao’s head. It was Tang Wutong’s third soul skill, Radiant Dragon God’s Slash!

At this moment, even Long Xiaoyao couldn’t confirm what Tang Wutong’s martial soul was. However, there was one thing he was clear about: the blood lineage and aura of the Dragon God were present in her martial soul.

Earlier, he had thought that Huo Yuhao was the most special, far surpassing any generational talent. But right now, he immediately sensed that Tang Wutong was on the same tier as him when she unleashed her full strength! Even though he had been alive for more than two hundred years, he had never even heard of an inherited martial soul from the Dragon God before.

He lifted his right hand and gently slapped out. The night sky behind him instantly turned pitch-black.

The Radiant Dragon God’s Slash was slowly dissipated by that darkness. However, Long Xiaoyao’s body actually shone with streaks of seven-colored light. Although they soon vanished, Tang Wutong’s attack was still able to hit him due to the Dragon God’s lineage in her attack.

Tang Wutong’s attacks didn’t cease just like that. She continued to charge forward, but her body transformed.

The seven-colored dragon projection appeared once again. However, it was no longer illusory this time. It was well and truly real.

It was a small and delicate seven-colored dragon. A pair of butterfly-shaped dragon wings opened behind her. Seven-colored scales reflected bright lights. This small seven-colored dragon was only seven meters long, very small and weak compared to a real dragon. Even most of the mature earthdragons were bigger than it.

However, as soon as it appeared, Long Xiaoyao took another step back.

By unleashing the Dragon’s God Possession through her Radiant Butterfly Goddess, it would naturally evolve into the Dragon God’s Descent. Of course it wasn’t the true Dragon God, but that streak of strength from the Dragon God’s lineage was still unleashed to its greatest potential.

The reason why Long Xiaoyao stepped back was because her Dragon God’s aura had become stronger again. If it were Ye Xishui, things would be different. But Long Xiaoyao’s Darkness Holy Dragon naturally developed some fear in front of the Dragon God’s aura. It was not something that could be made up for using his cultivation.

Tang Wutong’s wings slashed down instantly. It was her Dragon Wings Guillotine!

Long Xiaoyao lifted his right hand. Tang Wutong felt as if she had hit some kind of viscous fluid, which hindered her. It even felt as if she was stuck to something.

Another sonorous dragon roar sounded out. The seven-colored dragon roared furiously at Long Xiaoyao, and Tang Wutong’s fifth soul ring shone brightly. It was her fifth soul skill, Dragon God’s Roar!

A huge seven-colored dragon head appeared behind Tang Wutong. Following this roar, an intense seven-colored glow, nearly as large as Tang Wutong, was released in Long Xiaoyao’s direction.

The black current around Long Xiaoyao was greatly dissipated by this seven-colored glow.

Tang Wutong unleashed her full strength, but why would Long Xiaoyao let her achieve what she wanted? He snorted coldly before the viscous black moved up to the seven-colored dragon wings. The incredible difference in their cultivations couldn’t be made up for just from the strength of Tang Wutong’s lineage. Tang Wutong only felt a wave of invisible, dark aura suppressing her spiritual power, keeping her Dragon God’s aura from spreading any further.

At this moment, the surrounding temperature suddenly fell significantly. A snow-white figure appeared beside Tang Wutong and pressed her palm towards Long Xiaoyao’s head.

The temperature didn’t actually fall. The chill came from within… within Long Xiaoyao’s body!

“What?” Long Xiaoyao was stunned. He immediately flipped his left palm to receive the incoming palm.

Empress’ Sword, Empress’ Palm, Empress’ Chill! It was the Snow Empress and the Snowless Glacier!

“Grrr!” the Snow Empress snorted gently, and her snowy-white figure turned illusory. A jade-green figure replaced her, and a sinister white light swept past.

Long Xiaoyao pointed with his finger, and a sharp note rang out. The jade-green figure instantly turned illusory before it backed off.

Long Xiaoyao’s left arm was quickly frozen from the consecutive strikes. A layer of frost engulfed his entire arm, and it turned completely numb. Even with his cultivation, he couldn’t instantly neutralize it.

Destiny’s Demise had taken effect, and his material defense had been lowered. Otherwise, how could Long Xiaoyao be frozen, given that the Snow Empress and Ice Empress weren’t in their original forms?

It was at this moment that a figure that exuded strong rose-gold light appeared. A palm also appeared with this figure.

Weird emotional undulations spread in the air. Sorrow, yearning, love, pain and all kinds of other emotions gathered in this palm.

It was the Haodong Palm, a palm which lasted eternally.

Long Xiaoyao’s right palm was controlling Tang Wutong, and his left palm was frozen. However, at this moment, he seemed very calm. He wasn’t as stunned as before.

He retracted his right hand and blocked Huo Yuhao’s palm.

When their palms collided, Huo Yuhao was instantly flung back. Long Xiaoyao’s body also jerked slightly, and he revealed a confused look in his eyes. At this instant, he seemed to have returned to two hundred years ago, when he was first making a name with Mu En and met Ye Xishui.

White and jade-green combined. Two hands were holding onto each other. The light projection re-formed.

It was like they had instantly arrived in another world. Everything around them instantly turned into a land of ice and snow.

The Ice Empress and Snow Empress disappeared. A rebuke that seemed to come from the icy plains of the Extreme North descended from the sky.

Two giant beams of white and jade-green light instantly descended. The boundless darkness was crushed by that miraculous white and green, turning into powder.

Long Xiaoyao shook. In the next moment, he had already turned into an ice statue.

Tang Wutong struggled and managed to break free from her restraints. She flew back into the air.

BANG!

The ice statue exploded, scattering ice everywhere.

It was the Ice Explosion Technique. The ice formed from Ultimate Ice was immediately blown apart as the Pride of the Ice and Snow Empresses was unleashed.

Huo Yuhao crashed to the ground and grabbed his left hand.

Is it over?

It wasn’t just his Spirit Eyes that could unleash the strength of a Titled Douluo. When he used his full strength, he could do it with his Ultimate Ice martial soul, too.

After the Snow Empress recovered, the Pride of the Ice and Snow Empresses regained its full strength. The fusion of the Ice and Snow Empresses dropped the temperature of Ultimate Ice below negative two hundred and forty degrees Celsius. This terrifyingly low temperature instantly drained Huo Yuhao’s soul power. However, he still managed to complete this strike because both the Ice and Snow Empresses had absorbed the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence, giving him a stable foundation.

This could already compare to the all-out attack of a Titled Douluo. The Dragon Emperor Douluo was complacent. Along with Destiny’s Demise and Spiritual Dispossession, as well as the judgment of destiny, he was struck with the greatest misfortune.

The Dragon Emperor Douluo disappeared. It looked like he had died from the Ice Explosion Technique.

Tang Wutong had already retreated to Huo Yuhao’s side, and pulled him up. The two of them looked at each other, revealing puzzled looks in their eyes.

Win? Did we win? The answer was…

No!

Darkness, boundless, irresistible, and terrifying darkness, descended once again.

Everything stopped. Time, movement, and Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong’s blood and soul power slowed. At this moment, the two of them became statues. They stood there quietly, and only saw the dejected looks in each other’s eyes.

Long Xiaoyao slowly walked out from the darkness, just like he did when he first walked out from the Heavenly Soul Empire’s Imperial Palace.

His white hair looked a little messy now. His clothes were also a little messy. However, this was the worst it got for him.

How could an Ultimate Douluo be killed so easily?

“The two of you have indeed given me a lot of surprises. I didn’t expect young people to be so good nowadays. The new generation of youngsters has surpassed the older generations!”

Long Xiaoyao didn’t feel down just because he was in a slightly pathetic state right now. On the contrary, he seemed to be very happy.

He gestured towards Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. Huo Yuhao didn’t move, but Tang Wutong was directly drawn towards and landed in front of him.

Tang Wutong wasn’t able to move no matter how much she tried to circulate her soul power. She could only watch as she was brought over by Long Xiaoyao.

“What a beautiful young lady! If I were two hundred years younger, I might even chase you.” Long Xiaoyao’s expression turned cold.

“The game is over.”

The darkness was removed, and Long Xiaoyao’s hand was on Tang Wutong’s shoulder. It was just a frail and elderly hand, but Tang Wutong felt as if everything in her body had been sealed. She couldn’t even muster her strength, and could only stand there just like that.

Huo Yuhao fell to the ground. All the fighting earlier had completely drained him.

Long Xiaoyao said, “Huo Yuhao, do you know why I haven’t killed you yet? Given my abilities, I just need one strike to kill you.”

Huo Yuhao laughed coldly. “I don’t think it’ll be so easy. You’re afraid that the Beast God will descend, aren’t you?”

Long Xiaoyao laughed, “I said that I have many methods of making you unable to use Di Tian’s strength. Since you don’t really believe me, we can give it a go right now.”

As he spoke, he waved his hand at Huo Yuhao.

A streak of black light flashed and landed in front of Huo Yuhao. When Huo Yuhao lowered his head to look at it, he found out that a pitch-black dagger had landed by the side of his foot.

Long Xiaoyao pressed his hand on Tang Wutong’s shoulder, while his other hand held a dagger that was identical to the one beside Huo Yuhao.

“You can choose between stabbing yourself or letting me stab her. You have nine tries, and each stab has to be on your backbone. You can choose the exact position. You’ll stab once for every number I count. If you hesitate, she’ll take the stabs for you. After nine stabs, both of you can leave.”

Huo Yuhao was stunned. He didn’t expect Long Xiaoyao to use such a method to threaten him.

An Ultimate Douluo actually used a young lady to threaten him!





Volume 34, Chapter 484.1: Game of Death


Long Xiaoyao laughed lightly and said, “Alright, let me also tell you that the poisonous darkness element in this dagger can’t be resisted even by your Ultimate Ice. Of course, let’s not even talk about her. Her body is light-type. I’m afraid she’ll lose half her life the moment she’s stabbed. I’ll give you one minute to consider. After that, our game will begin.”

“Huo Yuhao, don’t!” Tang Wutong shouted. She also realized at this moment that she had recovered her ability to speak.

Huo Yuhao ignored her and slowly bent his waist. He picked up the dagger from the ground.

The dagger was seamless. The hilt and the blade seemed to have been carved from the same piece of metal. When held, the dagger felt icy-cold, and the darkness element in it wasn’t something that Huo Yuhao fancied.

“Dragon Emperor Douluo, will you do everything that you promised?” Huo Yuhao straightened his back. Even though he was very pale, blood coming from his nose and mouth, and looked a little dogged right now, his back was still very straight. He was like a javelin as he stood where he was. As he faced Long Xiaoyao, he didn’t even bother to refer to him as an elder. In his heart, Long Xiaoyao wasn’t fit for the term at all.

Long Xiaoyao smiled and replied, “Given my identity, do you think I need to scam a fellow like you?”

Huo Yuhao laughed coldly, “Given your identity? You even use a girl to threaten me. What else can you not do? It’s a humiliation to my teacher that he once had the same status as you.”

Long Xiaoyao’s expression changed slightly. “What a razor-sharp tongue you have. You have no choice. Our game is about to begin.”

As he spoke, he slowly lifted the arm that held the dagger. He pointed the blade of the knife at Tang Wutong.

After Tang Wutong shouted, she no longer made a sound. She only watched Huo Yuhao silently. At this moment, both of them had no choice. She only wanted to see how Huo Yuhao was going to deal with such a game of death. She knew that she was now a tool in their game. No matter what she said, she wouldn’t be able to affect the proceedings.

Long Xiaoyao’s expression changed, and he shouted, “One!”

Huo Yuhao moved. He didn’t hesitate at all. The short blade in front of him turned into a streak of black light and instantly stabbed it into his belly.

“Ah!...” Tang Wutong couldn’t help but scream.

However, Huo Yuhao’s expression was very calm. It was as if the dagger didn’t stab into him at all. As the icy-cold dagger penetrated his flesh, he only felt a chill in his belly. It was like a weird force was furiously sucking away his life energy. But the pain wasn’t that bad. There was only a stronger and more uncomfortable numbing sensation, like a tendon had been snapped. Even so, his expression didn’t change. It was as if he was doing something very normal.

“Oh, I forgot. I need to add another rule.” Long Xiaoyao was still smiling. There was a weird look on his face right now. The dagger was still in the air.

“Are you reneging on your promise?” Huo Yuhao asked coldly.

“Of course not.” Long Xiaoyao smiled as he said. “I only want to tell you that every stab needs to have two holes.”

Huo Yuhao’s face turned cold. Tang Wutong tried to struggle. However, how could she break free from the hands of an Ultimate Douluo?

Huo Yuhao stared at Long Xiaoyao, “Is there anything else you want to add?”

Long Xiaoyao shook his head and answered, “That’s all.”

“Alright.” Huo Yuhao pressed against the dagger that was in his belly. Suddenly, the dagger went deeper into his body. His facial expression also changed slightly. The sharp end of the dagger poked out from his back. However, no blood seeped out from either wound.

“Alright!” Long Xiaoyao shouted too. “No wonder you’re the disciple of Mu En. You’re tough, but are you tough enough?”

Huo Yuhao looked at him coldly as he gripped the hilt of the dagger.

“Two!” Long Xiaoyao roared.

Huo Yuhao used his right hand to pluck the dagger from his body before quickly stabbing it into the other side of his belly. When the dagger penetrated his flesh, Huo Yuhao didn’t make too much noise. However, he shook tremendously when he plucked the dagger from his body. Two streams of dark blood spurted from his earlier wounds, before blood started to flow out from his body.

“Yuhao!” Tang Wutong shouted. At this moment, she had also turned pale. She only felt that things had turned blurry in front of her. However, the image of Huo Yuhao was deeply imprinted in her mind.

Two stabs. He had stabbed himself twice without any hesitation. He didn’t have the time to consider at all. Two stabs meant that there were four wounds on his body right now.

Long Xiaoyao laughed, “How does it feel? Light can bring life, but darkness can devour life. Isn’t it great to personally feel life energy seeping out from your body? Don’t worry, the darkness element in my dagger isn’t very strong yet. With your abilities and spiritual power, you can handle a few more stabs if you’re tough enough. Of course, she can also help you.”

“Yuhao, give the next stab to me!” Tang Wutong suddenly shouted. Tears flowed uncontrollably from her cheeks.

Huo Yuhao smiled and muttered, “Wutong, I have something to ask of you. Can I?”

“Three!” Long Xiaoyao interrupted him.

Black lights flashed and blood spurted. It was the third stab, and there were six wounds now!

“No!...” Tang Wutong shouted. Tears flowed from her face. She only felt that she was about to suffer a mental breakdown. Her heart ached, and it left her breathless. She started to shake uncontrollably.

“Wutong, when I first entered Shrek Academy, I was only eleven years old. Then, I was a young man filled with hatred. I knew nothing. With the guidance of eldest senior and Teacher Xiao Ya, I earned the right to enter Shrek Academy. From then on, Shrek Academy became my family.

“At the start, life was very bitter. I cultivated every day. I knew that I was less talented than the rest. This was why I need to put in more effort than everyone else.

“I had a roommate then who was a clean freak, but who was very lazy too. He never cleaned the room. I was the one who cleaned the room. He was very gifted, almost one of the best in our generation. In addition, he was very handsome, and his abilities were great. When he first entered the Academy, he became the center of attention. His name was Wang Dong.”

Hearing Huo Yuhao’s story, Tang Wutong seemed a little dazed, and there was a blurry look in her eyes.

“Four!

“No!...” She was immediately jolted awake from her blurred state of mind.

Black lights flashed, and the fourth stab landed. There were eight wounds now.

The third stab was in the middle of his belly. The fourth stab was to the left of his intestines.

Huo Yuhao’s voice sounded a little weak. His shirt was already dyed black from his blood. However, he was still staring at Tang Wutong.

She wasn’t Wang Dong’er, but she looked identical to her. Huo Yuhao couldn’t feel any pain at all. He even felt that he was blissful. Even if he died, he could still watch his favorite girl live. It seemed like it wasn’t that sad after all.

“When Wang Dong and I first started, we had some kind of confrontation. But we became friends after we attended the Academy together. I was trying to catch up to him. Suddenly, one day, we unwittingly found out that our martial souls were highly compatible. Hence, we went to the wilderness to test things out. We didn’t expect our martial souls to fuse together, and we were able to unleash a fusion skill. It’s just that we were still very weak then. After unleashing one fusion skill, our soul power would be drained. When we passed out from the fatigue, we would usually be late for school the next day, and we were punished together.”

As he spoke, Huo Yuhao’s expression turned gentler. Everything in the past replayed in his mind.

“After that, we were selected to compete in our first Continental Advanced Soul Master Academy Soul Dueling Tournament because of our impressive performance. We were reserve members. It’s just that we didn’t expect a few of our seniors to be hurt by evil soul masters, and they had to pull out. We replaced them as competitive squad members.

“It was really tough then. However, we were ambitious. We worked hard, and faced our opponents with our greatest abilities. We performed miracle after miracle, turning the impossible into reality. Finally, we defended Shrek’s glory. We won the tournament for Shrek! We were then given the title of ‘Shrek’s Seven Monsters’. That was one of the greatest glories of my life.”

“Five!”

Black light flashed, and the dagger stabbed again. It was the other side of Huo Yuhao’s intestines. The tenth wound had been inflicted.

This time, Tang Wutong didn’t shout. She seemed to be completely immersed in Huo Yuhao’s story, and had forgotten what situation they were in.

“After that, we got together again and experienced many things together. One day, the Academy held a matchmaking session for the disciples of the inner courtyard. Only those from the inner courtyard could participate, so that the male and female students could have a chance to express their liking for someone. Everyone was normally so busy with their cultivation, and they were also very shy. The Sea God’s Blind Date was our best opportunity. I also joined under peer pressure.”





Volume 34, Chapter 484.2: Game of Death


“Who knew that I would meet her during the blind date? She had long, pinkish-blue hair, and was absolutely ravishing. She looked identical to Wang Dong. I still thought that she was Wang Dong’s sister. However, I never expected Wang Dong to actually be Wang Dong’er. She had always been by my side, but I foolishly didn’t know it.

“She called me a fool. Wasn’t she right? However, I’m willing to be her fool for life. Naturally, we got together. I really liked her. Everything that happened in the past replayed in my mind. Even in my dreams, I didn’t expect to get together with my goddess. Yes, she’s my goddess.

“Wutong, you aren’t the first person to look like her. There was another girl who looked exactly like her. That girl was called Wang Qiu’er. I met her before and after the blind date. Then, I even thought that they were the same person. It was only afterward that I realized that they were different.”

“I liked Dong’er, but Qiu’er gradually walked into my world. She helped me and saved me. More weirdly, she was even able to form a fusion skill with me. However, I only have Dong’er in my heart.”

“Six!” Long Xiaoyao’s voice softened a little, but he continued to shout.

Huo Yuhao lifted his hand and stabbed himself.

Black light flashed once again. It was the sixth stab, and there were twelve wounds now.

His body shook as this stab landed. He also staggered back two steps. The ground was covered in black blood. His face had also turned from pale-white to dim-gold. His entire aura seemed to be there, yet not be there at the same time. Even his pupils started to turn grey.

“Yuhao, stop. Please, I beg you. Please stop. Leave the last three stabs for me, alright?” Tang Wutong was already sobbing uncontrollably.

Huo Yuhao shook his head gently and said, “I’m a man. Even if you don’t look like her, I’ll still do it for you. I’ll protect my partner and my friend. We are friends, aren’t we? Finish listening to my story first.

“I’ve always been very troubled. I was certain that I liked Dong’er, but I didn’t want to harm Qiu’er either. Qiu’er started to like me from some unknown period of time. I was sandwiched between her and Dong’er. I didn’t know what to do. As a result, all sorts of problems piled up.

“Once, we entered a place called the Yin Yang Love Querying Valley. There, we went through many ordeals. Eventually, Dong’er saved me by committing suicide. Then, Qiu’er admitted defeat. However, Dong’er didn’t manage to wake from the coma that she sustained in the process of committing suicide. I personally sent her back to her home, but that was the last time I saw her. When I returned again, she had already left. Her family told me that she had already awoken from her coma.

“The Douluo Continent is so vast. How could I find her? Not long before that incident, Qiu’er died while saving me on a mission. I asked myself, do I really not have Qiu’er in my heart at all? No, I could feel that she left a deep impression in my heart. It’s just that I can’t split my heart in two. I’ve already given it to Dong’er. This is why Qiu’er is the person I’ve let down the most in my life.”

“Seven!”

His hand lifted, and the dagger stabbed. This time, the black light slowed down slightly. It wasn’t because Huo Yuhao’s determination had fallen. It was because his body was a little overwhelmed because he was in such a weak state. This stab was closely connected to the sixth stab. They were both further to the sides of his intestines.

He finally collapsed after this stab. He sat down on the ground, in the puddle of his blood on the ground. His body was trembling slightly, and he needed his other hand to support himself to keep himself from fully collapsing to the ground.

“Do you still remember? Wutong, I tried to pour my soul power into you that day. In fact, I took you as her, just without the memories. I really hoped that our martial souls would fuse to prove that you were her. But I failed. Our soul power can’t fuse. It doesn’t seem that our martial souls are compatible. Then, I realized that you aren’t her. You are Tang Wutong. She is Wang Dong’er. The greater the hope, the greater the disappointment. At that moment, I was extremely tormented. I really wished that you were her! If that were the case, there would be light in my world once again.”

Huo Yuhao’s eyes had already turned completely grey by now. His pupils seemed to have dilated. He finally couldn’t see Tang Wutong clearly anymore. There was only a blurry, pinkish-blue figure in front of him.

“I had two wishes in my life originally. My first wish was to avenge my mother. However, that has slowly faded away as time passed. I’ve slowly realized that my hatred is diminishing. My mom wouldn’t want me to avenge her. Furthermore, I can’t do it. I really can’t.

“My other wish is to get together with Dong’er. To live together with her. To wed her and have a few kids. To accompany my kids every day. That’s all I want.” As he stopped there, Huo Yuhao’s tears were already flowing from his eyes.

He seemed to see himself and Wang Dong’er together, and their kids running not far away from them.

Tang Wutong was in a daze as she looked at him. It was like she had been completely immersed in his tragic story.

“Eight!” Long Xiaoyao’s voice suddenly turned cold and stiff.

Huo Yuhao plucked out the black dagger again. But when he stabbed himself once more, he had evidently lost his strength. He stabbed at his right chest, but the dagger swept across his rib. He had to exert force twice before it stabbed through his body.

Right now, Tang Wutong’s eyes had already turned hollow. She didn’t even bother trying to stop him anymore.

Huo Yuhao’s voice was becoming weaker and weaker. It was trembling, and he was stuttering, “Wutong, if you see someone that looks identical to you in the future, she might just be my Dong’er. Please take care of her, but don’t tell her of everything between us. In fact, it’s good if she forgets me. I’m too much of a burden. Perhaps she’ll be happier without me. I’m happy as long as she’s happy. Elder Long, I hope you stay true to your word. Don’t make it difficult for her. Let her leave… nine!”

Huo Yuhao shouted out the last number on his own. His eyes suddenly brightened, and there was even a weird trace of light shining from his body. He plucked out the black dagger and stabbed it towards his heart.

He remembered everything that had happened between him and Dong’er. Wasn’t it sort of a relief for him? Right now, he only wanted to be free. Now, no one could stop him. Even Di Tian couldn’t do so. This was because there was no sense of danger in his heart. Everything was done willingly.

He really didn’t want to live anymore. He felt very, very tired. There was a bitter look on his face right now.

I’m sorry, my partners. I can only shirk my responsibilities this way. I’m not afraid of death. Death, to me, is like home. Dong’er has forgotten me, Qiu’er has died because of me, and I don’t want revenge anymore. The Snow Empress, Ice Empress, and Star Anise all have the origins of the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. They can help someone else to improve and become a god.

Everything seems to be perfect. I can finally leave this world. I want to find my mother.

Due to his terminal lucidity, Huo Yuhao’s last stab was stronger than the earlier eight stabs. No matter how strong he was, he would never be able to survive once this dagger stabbed into his heart.

Tang Wutong collapsed completely when he stabbed himself again, losing consciousness.

The sharp dagger stabbed into his flesh and penetrated it. He had eighteen wounds on his body now.

Huo Yuhao’s consciousness blurred. He couldn’t control his body as it fell back. However, there was a smile on his face. It was a smile of freedom and relief. In this world, there was nothing he longed for anymore. It was time for him to go, because his time was up.

-----------------

Long Xiaoyao placed the unconscious Tang Wutong on the ground. He revealed a heavy look on his cold and elderly-looking face.

“What a passionate young man!” He sighed slightly and took a step out before coming to Huo Yuhao’s side. He slowly squatted down and grabbed the black dagger in his chest before pulling it out.

Huo Yuhao lay there without moving. His life energy seemed to have disappeared.

Long Xiaoyao’s eyes suddenly brightened. Their surroundings became dark and silent once again. Even the blood in Huo Yuhao’s body stopped flowing.

In this silent and dark world, he was the only one who could move. He slowly lifted his right hand and pressed it on Huo Yuhao’s chest. He could clearly see streaks of black fading from the eighteen wounds on Huo Yuhao’s body. In a matter of seconds, the wounds were already covered in red.

Light flashed in Long Xiaoyao’s hands, and a white bead appeared in his palm. He pressed his other hand on Huo Yuhao’s chest, as if he were sensing something.

After a brief moment, a satisfied look came over his face. After that, he placed the bead in Huo Yuhao’s mouth.

After completing all this, he bent over and carried Huo Yuhao away to a cleaner place, where he stripped the bloodstained shirt from his body.





Volume 34, Chapter 484.3: Game of Death


Huo Yuhao stopped losing blood under the coagulation effect of the silent and dark Domain. However, when his body was completely naked, his wounds were bared for the Dragon Emperor Douluo to see.

A smile surfaced across Long Xiaoyao’s face, “If not for the fact that this Dragon Pill requires you to have no resistance, and that you must be in your absolute weakest state, why would I make you go through so much pain? Haih, to be honest, I was moved by you earlier, and almost couldn’t lay my hands on you. It’s just that Mu En made me do this. In fact, you wouldn’t need this Dragon Pill if you weren’t improving so quickly. However, the time seems to be right now. I can’t stop Xishui. I shall leave the responsibility of resisting the Holy Ghost Church to you. Young fellow, you must do your best!”

As he spoke, Long Xiaoyao moved his hands and turned Huo Yuhao’s body continuously. His wounds were quickly stitched up. However, he was still very pale from losing so much blood.

However, it was at this moment that a layer of dim golden light came from the Dragon Pill in his mouth. The golden halo spread down to his entire body.

Long Xiaoyao also carried Tang Wutong over and placed her down beside him. The smile on his face intensified. “What a touching scene! If such a young lady doesn’t fall for him, it’ll be really weird. This young man is so dumb. Unless there are twins, how can you find two people who look so alike in this world? Surely there isn’t a second Three-Eyed Golden Lion, right?”

If Huo Yuhao were still alive, he would almost surely be shocked by Long Xiaoyao’s words. It seemed the Dragon Emperor Douluo was very aware of his matters...

--------

Sun Moon Empire, Radiant City, the Imperial Palace...

Xu Tianran quietly sat in a chair decorated with all types of treasures and rubies. Not far in front of him, Ju Zi was kneeling with one knee on the ground and her head lowered. From the side, it was clear that she looked a little pale.

“Get up. It isn’t fully your fault,” Xu Tianran waved at her.

Ju Zi lowered her head and said, “Your Majesty, it’s my mistake. If I were more alert, we wouldn’t have suffered such heavy losses. We’ve lost soldiers and resources this time. Please punish me, Your Majesty.”

Xu Tianran stood up and walked in front of Ju Zi, lifting her up. He gently patted her shoulder and said, “Alright, it happened too abruptly. Who would have expected the soul beasts in the Extreme North to suddenly turn violent? According to what you mentioned, there were at least two Savage Beasts attacking you. They’re likely to be two of the Three Heavenly Kings of the Extreme North. It already wasn’t easy for you to escape. The conditions in the Extreme North are rigorous, unlike any other place. It’s simply too harsh. It’s a place that favors those ice-type soul beasts. It seems like we made a wrong strategic move this time, and ignored such an important aspect.”

Ju Zi continued to lower her head and said, “I am guilty.”

Xu Tianran pulled her hand and walked all the way to her side, sitting down with her. “What’s the crime? Over the past year, you’ve given your all for me and the empire. You’ve become much thinner. You’ve contributed so much to the empire and have risen quickly in the military. You are known as the Warrior Queen of our military.

“What’s a single mistake worth? No one is always victorious. When we fully occupy the Heavenly Soul and Dou Ling Empires, I’ll let you command the entire military to destroy those soul beasts in the Extreme North. Then, all the rare metals will still belong to us. With all those soul beasts around, I don’t believe the Dou Ling Empire will be able to obtain anything either. You don’t have to think so much.”

Ju Zi lifted her head at this moment and was moved as she said, “Your Majesty, thanks for sparing me.”

Xu Tianran smiled as he looked at her. After this, he sighed and said, “The situation at the frontline is very stable now. We have taken over most parts of the Heavenly Soul Empire. However, our forces are a little overwhelmed because of the Star Luo Empire. This was especially true during the earlier stages of the war, when a lot of our resources were drained, and we weren’t able to supply enough reinforcements to the front lines. Right now, we’ll maintain the status quo and not rush into attacking further. Otherwise, we’ll give the three empires opportunities if our fighting lines are overstretched.”

Ju Zi’s confidence was restored when they began talking about the front line. She furrowed her brow slightly and commented, “Although our fighting lines are a little overstretched now, the regions of the Heavenly Soul Empire that we’ve occupied are still quite stable. You are right. We must further stabilize the situation at the frontline. We must quickly get rid of the problems that the Star Luo Empire is bringing us from the back to resolve the dilemma. I suggest that we ask the Death God Douluo to attack the Ming Dou Mountain Range once again, after we’ve accumulated further resources. We’ll be able to threaten the Star Luo Empire then. It’s only when we strengthen our defense at the Ming Dou Mountain Range that we can continue to attack without any worries.”

Xu Tianran smiled and said, “My Ju Zi is a brilliant strategist now. All those elders from the military are impressed by you. You’ll arrange these strategies. I’ll tell them to the rest when we have a mission.”

“Yes, Your Majesty. Your Majesty, please allow me to move out tomorrow and lead the Phoenix Soul Engineer Legion to kill the Star Luo Empire’s soul masters. I’ll clean them out in the fastest possible time and give the Death God Douluo the opportunity to attack the Ming Dou Mountain Range.”

Xu Tianran stood up. With the advancements of soul tool technology, the prosthetic legs that he wore had allowed him to become mobile.

He shook his head gently and said, “Ju Zi, while it’s important, we can’t finish it quickly. Leave it to someone else. I’ve already requested help from Zhong Liwu of the Holy Ghost Church. The Death God Douluo is holding the fort at the border. She’s the anchor. The Star Luo Empire is only making trouble for us. It’s fine. They can’t accomplish anything.”

Ju Zi was moved and asked, “Your Majesty, do you have something else for me to do?”

Xu Tianran nodded slightly and said, “That’s right, there’s something important I need you to do. You’re the only who can do it.”

Ju Zi quickly got up and kneeled down beside Xu Tianran before saying, “Your Majesty, please instruct me. As long as I can do it, I’ll do anything.”

Xu Tianran revealed a displeased look on his face and bent over to lift her up. “Silly girl, I’ve told you many times that we’re married now. You don’t have to be so ceremonial in front of me. Why don’t you listen to me?”

Ju Zi lowered her head and softly said, “In my heart, you’ll always be my master. I’m only your servant. My life belongs to you. As long as you need it, I’ll even die for you without any hesitation.”

Even though Xu Tianran was an anti-hero, he was still a person. In his earlier years, his biological younger brother had tried to assassinate him, and he had almost died. Ju Zi had helped him escape even though she was hurt. During all these years, he had many powerful people around him. However, he only trusted Ju Zi.

Xu Tianran embraced her. “I told you that you’re my wife, not my servant. It’s like that now, and it’ll remain like this in the future. In the future, you’ll command the masses.”

Ju Zi gently leaned on his shoulders and revealed a satisfied smile on her face. However, she was actually sighing in her heart.

Your Majesty, do you really think I don’t know your personality? If I don’t appear obedient in front of you, you’d start to become skeptical. I understand you very well. This is why I must do this to earn your trust!

“Your Majesty, what do you want me to do?”

Xu Tianran turned serious and said, “When you left this time, the officials submitted a petition for something.”

Ju Zi asked, “What has left you so troubled? Who’s the one who put you in a spot? I’ll go and…” As she said that, a cold look flashed across her eyes.

Xu Tianran shook his head and said, “If it were anything else, who would dare to threaten me? However, this matter can’t shut everyone’s mouth. They want me to sire the Crown Prince while I’m at the peak of my reign.”

After hearing the words ‘Crown Prince’, Ju Zi couldn’t help but tremble. She subconsciously lifted her head to look at Xu Tianran.

Xu Tianran revealed a bitter smile on his face. “You’re the only one who knows my secret. How can I bear a Crown Prince? Ever since I took over the throne, you have been my only Empress. Apart from you, I don’t have any other concubines. In the eyes of others, I appear to be very loyal to you. However, you know the true reason.”

Ju Zi naturally knew that Xu Tianran was sterile because of the injury he had sustained. He didn’t need concubines at all. On the other hand, having concubines might make things worse. This matter concerned his dignity as an emperor and as a man.

Ju Zi didn’t say anything. She didn’t know what to say. This concerned Xu Tianran’s face.

Xu Tianran pondered and said, “Right now, I need to have a kid. It has to be a male to shut everyone’s mouth. Even if it’s not, I don’t think they’ll say anything much, as long as there’s a kid. This is why you must remain in the palace for some time. You’re still the commander of the three armies, but don’t personally enter the battlefield temporarily. Bear me a child first.”

“This…” Ju Zi was a little dazed as she looked at Xu Tianran. After she was stunned for a moment, she lowered her voice and asked, “Your Majesty, do you want us to adopt one?”

Xu Tianran shook his head and snorted coldly, “Those old fellows are watching me. How can I adopt and keep things from them? They have people in the infirmary. We can’t mess this up, and must make it real. Do you still remember? I mentioned that we can’t artificially inseminate you. Even though I can’t speak to anyone of this, I can still request a relative find a ‘seedling’ for you. This kid will be my heir.”





Volume 34, Chapter 485.1: I'm Not Dead?


Ju Zi was horrified. She turned around and kneeled once again. “No, Your Majesty. No, I can’t do that. How can I bear someone else’s child? I’m your Ju Zi, and will only be your Ju Zi. No, I don’t agree.”

Xu Tianran was a little stunned, and was also a little touched as he looked at Ju Zi. This was the first time she had dared to resist his orders ever since she had saved him. However, this resistance only stroked his ego.

“If possible, no one would want his wife to have someone else’s kid. However, I have no choice. I can only do this to shut everyone up. I’ve even selected the candidate. He’s an authentic bearer of the royal blood lineage, and he’s a distant cousin of mine. Due to a mutation of his martial soul, he’s not even a soul master now, and he holds a very lowly position in the royal family. Apart from you, no one else must know about this.

“I’ll ask someone to teach you how to carry it out. After that, you’ll retrieve the ‘seedling’ from his body and implant it into your own. After that, he’ll be killed. No one will know this secret then. Don’t worry, I am infertile. The child you bear will be ours. I’ll treat him like our biological son. When I turn a hundred years old, he’ll inherit the throne. Perhaps we might rule the entire Douluo Continent by then.”

Ju Zi lifted her head and looked at Xu Tianran pitifully, “Your Majesty, is there no other way? I am really unwilling to do this.”

Xu Tianran’s expression turned cold and he said, “Alright, this is final. Do you really think I want to do this? I feel heartache doing it, too. Alright, with this sort of plan, you’ll be touched by another guy. Go and prepare first. I’ll get someone to teach you how to do it, and I’ll get the Imperial Physician to take a look at your body. These next few days are the best time for you to be impregnated.”

“Yes.” Ju Zi shuddered a little and eventually agreed to his words. She kowtowed to him respectfully.

Xu Tianran’s expression turned gentler. He lifted her up for the third time and patted her back. “Silly girl, don’t think too much. I already told you that I’ll treat the child you bear as our own. Only I have the right to be his father. You can go now.”

“Yes, Your Majesty.” Ju Zi indignantly made her way out after bowing to Xu Tianran.

After exiting, a heavy look gradually appeared on Ju Zi’s face. However, a cold intent that flashed across her eyes.

Xu Tianran, why didn’t I realize that I’ll only be your pawn? Even the closest pawn is still a pawn.

------

When Huo Yuhao regained consciousness, he was stunned to discover that he was in a clean room. The room also looked very familiar to him. Everything around him was familiar, including the aura.

Where am I? He was a little puzzled.

Everything that had happened earlier replayed itself in his memories.

Didn’t I meet the Darkness Holy Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo, Long Xiaoyao? Wasn’t I stabbed nine times because of his threat? But why don’t I feel any pain?

He subconsciously touched his body, and was astonished to discover that there weren’t any wounds at all. He then circulated his soul power. His body drifted up above his bed, and there were suddenly strong soul power undulations in the room.

This…

Huo Yuhao was shocked as he sensed everything. He discovered that this soul power was like a strong wave. Just by circulating it slightly, it was actually surging.

What’s going on? Where exactly am I? Bang!

The door opened, and a figure rushed in. Wasn’t she Nan Qiuqiu?

When she saw Huo Yuhao sitting up, Nan Qiuqiu was delighted. “Ah, Yuhao, you’re awake! You’re finally awake. What happened exactly!? You were unconscious for seven days!”

Huo Yuhao looked at her and was shocked as he asked, “Am... am I really alive?”

Nan Qiuqiu took a few steps forward and pinched his arm hard.

“Aiyo, what are you doing?!” Huo Yuhao screamed in pain.

“If you know that it’s painful, it obviously means that you aren’t in a dream. Of course you aren’t dead!” Nan Qiuqiu snapped.

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly. “It was already not easy for me to come back alive, but you still pinched me so hard. Are you still human?”

Nan Qiuqiu furrowed her brow and placed her hands on her waist angrily. “How dare you mention it? You didn’t even bring me on your adventure to Heaven Dou City. How did Tang Wutong find you the moment she was there? Didn’t you say that she isn’t Dong’er?”

After hearing her mention Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao was stunned, and asked, “Did she send me back? Is she fine?”

“How would I know?” Nan Qiuqiu said coldly, “She dumped you here before leaving. She didn’t say anything at all, as if she were dumb.”

Huo Yuhao furrowed his brow and sighed in his heart.

Tang Wutong isn’t Dong’er after all! Although I don’t know why I’m alive, it seems like the Dragon Emperor Douluo still let her off in the end. It’s just that I was critically hurt then, and my life energy was about to fully disappear. Now that I think about it, it seemed like the last stab was blocked by something before it reached my body, preventing my heart from being struck. Don’t tell me the Dragon Emperor Douluo did it intentionally? He’s the only one who could do that at that point in time...

However, how did I survive? My injuries were so critical. Furthermore, I don’t even feel any pain now. On the other hand, my soul power even seems to have improved. I feel as if I have touched a bottleneck. What exactly is going on?

Huo Yuhao was filled with doubts as he climbed up from the bed. He moved his body. Indeed, he was filled with strength! Everything felt unbelievably good.

It was good to be alive. Furthermore, Huo Yuhao felt that a lot of the pressure on him had been relieved after he went through that near-death experience. The look in his eyes was much more vibrant compared to before. He couldn’t help but think of what Wang Dong’er had said to him: relieving stress from time to time was good for cultivation.

Yes, I’ve really been under a lot of pressure. I didn’t expect this to relieve so much pressure, although the way it was done wasn’t very nice.

“Hey, what are you thinking of?” Nan Qiuqiu was displeased as she questioned Huo Yuhao, seeing that he had gone quiet all of a sudden.

Huo Yuhao shook his head and said, “Nothing. Alright, Qiuqiu, how was I when I returned?”

Nan Qiuqiu answered, “Pretty good! You were just in a coma. There was nothing else really. Tang Wutong didn’t say anything else. She just seemed very confused. Eldest senior didn’t probe further upon seeing that you were fine.”

I was fine when I returned? My wounds disappeared? It seems like I can only ask Tang Wutong to learn what’s going on.

“Qiuqiu, I’ll go and see eldest senior first.” As he said that, he walked out.

Nan Qiuqiu chased after him and said, “Don’t forget what you promised me. Teacher Xuan seems to be very excited after seeing the metal that you brought back.”

“Oh right, don’t worry. You won’t be excluded,” Huo Yuhao smiled.

----------------

When Huo Yuhao saw Bei Bei, Bei Bei was dealing with a lot of things. Seeing him entering, Bei Bei was delighted before his expression sank.

“Little junior, you are really incorrigible! I won’t let you leave the sect easily no matter what. Every time you leave, you have to get into some trouble. Tell me, what happened this time? Why were you in a coma, and Wutong had to bring you back? She didn’t want to say anything. Surely you can tell me what’s going on, right?”

Huo Yuhao laughed as he said, “Eldest senior, don’t be angry! Nothing happened, really. I went to Heaven Dou City to capture an evil soul master, as well as to find out where Teacher Xiao Ya and Sister Xiaotao are at. I searched the city. They aren’t there. After that, I met a strong opponent when capturing an evil soul master, which drained me. I might have fallen into a coma because of that. Oh yes, I almost forgot...”

When he mentioned the evil soul master, Huo Yuhao immediately thought of two important questions. He wondered if the evil soul master he had sealed in his storage-type soul tool was alive after so many days. In addition, the Ice Bear King could still be in Heaven Dou City!

“What’s wrong?” Bei Bei jumped in shock when he heard Huo Yuhao trail off.

Huo Yuhao didn’t say anything, but hurriedly poured in his soul power into his storage-type soul tool. A light flashed before an ice statue appeared in front of him.

Huo Yuhao’s Ultimate Ice had improved compared to before. He had frozen the evil soul master for at least seven to eight days, but there weren’t any signs that it was going to melt. It wasn’t even damaged in the slightest. The evil soul master that was frozen inside was still astonished, and even terrified.

Bei Bei was stunned as he asked, “This is… an evil soul master you caught?”

Huo Yuhao nodded and replied, “Yes! It took me quite a lot of effort to capture this fellow.” When he faced the Darkness Holy Dragon, he wasn’t afraid at all. However, now that he thought of it, he was actually pretty terrified back then. Long Xiaoyao’s cultivation was not something that he could sense using his Spiritual Detection, because Long Xiaoyao was spiritually much stronger than him. It was very easy for him to put up a spiritual barrier that kept out Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power. Huo Yuhao had no way of dealing with Long Xiaoyao directly.

Of course, Long Xiaoyao’s spiritual power was stronger than his in terms of absolute volume rather than the level of it. Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power had reached the concrete-material realm. Even the Dragon Emperor Douluo wasn’t at that realm yet. This was the advantage of a spiritual-type soul master. Just like Long Xiaoyao had said, if Huo Yuhao purely cultivated his Spirit Eyes to the standard of a Transcendent Douluo, he might actually be able to fight him. In fact, Huo Yuhao had the confidence of challenging Long Xiaoyao at that level when he considered his Ultimate Ice.





Volume 34, Chapter 485.2: I'm Not Dead?


Bei Bei came to Huo Yuhao’s side. When he saw the ice-sealed evil soul master, he couldn’t bother with blaming Huo Yuhao anymore. After all, it was possible to obtain information about Tang Ya from this evil soul master! Even though he was normally very composed, his breathing got heavier now.

Bei Bei lowered his voice and asked, “Can he still recover after being frozen?”

Huo Yuhao said, “He’ll be fine if it’s within the short-term. However, he has been frozen for quite a while. I didn’t expect to be unconscious for so long, so I’m not confident anymore. However, logically speaking, I still have a chance. After all, this evil soul master is a Soul Sage. Even if he’s frozen, his soul power can still protect his body. Let me give it a try.”

As he spoke, Huo Yuhao lifted his right hand and pressed against the ice statue.

Gentle ice elements were drawn out under his meticulous control, fusing back into his body. This was his second time circulating his soul power after waking up from his coma. He was much more aware right now than he had been just after he had just woken up. Suddenly, he could feel how consolidated his soul power was!

It wasn’t just his soul power. His spiritual power had increased too! His soul core had become more and more abstruse, as if it were one with the boundless sky around it. This soul core could devour all, like a black hole.

What did Long Xiaoyao do to me? Why do I feel such an obvious improvement in my powers? No, when I’m free, I’ll need to take a look in the Academy, and see how strong my soul power has become.

The ice statue slowly melted under Huo Yuhao’s immaculate control. However, no water dripped out. Under Huo Yuhao’s control, the ice elements vaporized into the air as soon as the ice melted, making the room a little more humid than usual.

Slowly, the ice disappeared. The original form of the evil soul master was also revealed. His complexion was softer, but his body functions were still not working.

Very quickly, the ice melted completely. Huo Yuhao’s eyes turned dim-grey, and he muttered a few incantations. After that, he smacked the evil soul master’s left chest.

It was his third martial soul, his Necromancer martial soul.

Huo Yuhao couldn’t use his Ultimate Ice or Spirit Eyes’ spiritual power to resuscitate this evil soul master. The other party would have a great resistance against them due to the massive difference in the elemental types, and they would harm him. At such a moment, the powers of his Necromancer martial soul would be useful. To some extent, a part of Huo Yuhao’s powers belonged to the same origins as evil soul masters, when he used his Necromancer martial soul.

A dark and sinister power surged into the evil soul master’s body, stimulating his heart. The pressure exerted on his heart got his blood flowing again. Under Huo Yuhao’s control, his blood started to flow with some rhythm once again. After that, Huo Yuhao started to revive his brain.

Everything around him became distorted. Huo Yuhao was using his Imitation right now.

His Imitation combined with his Spiritual Interference Domain, and the lights in Bei Bei’s office dimmed. In addition, the entire room was filled with a sinister aura.

Huo Yuhao shot a look at Bei Bei. Bei Bei nodded and pulled Nan Qiuqiu to a dark corner of the room. Although she didn’t know what Huo Yuhao was going to do, she knew that he must have some plan to deal with the evil soul master.

Just like Huo Yuhao had mentioned, the life energy of an evil soul master Soul Sage was very strong. This evil soul master’s heartbeat was slowly returning to normal, enough to send blood to all parts of his body. He was also slowly regaining his awareness.

Huo Yuhao was delighted. It seemed like this evil soul master hadn’t suffered any real harm. In this way, he was more confident in waking this evil soul master from his sleep. His vital signs were all fine; he wasn’t too heavily hurt by Huo Yuhao’s Ultimate Ice.

Huo Yuhao retrieved a huge black veil from his storage-type soul tool before he put it on. He felt even more sinister and mysterious right now. Dim-greyish air currents revolved around him. As he lifted his left hand, he used his Imitation to form a magic staff with a skull-shaped gem at the top of it. He stood there silently and waited.

The evil soul master slowly regained consciousness. When he opened his eyes, he suddenly felt that he was in a comfortable environment. Furthermore, there were even rings of air revolving around him, supporting his body so that he didn’t fall.

“Where is this place?” He was evidently a little confused, as he had just awoken.

Huo Yuhao’s voice became low-pitched and hoarse. He coldly said, “Are you asking where you are?” As he spoke, he snorted, and his immense spiritual power gently touched the evil soul master’s head.

The evil soul master was shocked, and immediately regained even further awareness. When he saw Huo Yuhao and the greyish current around him, he was shocked. Huo Yuhao was exuding a very strong spectral aura. Right now, the undulations that Huo Yuhao was projecting were actually those of a Titled Douluo.

He was very adept at this. He was imitating his own teacher, Electrolux, right now. Even though he didn’t have the same divine sense as Electrolux, he could still imitate his aura.

This evil soul master wasn’t fully conscious, and his soul power was still in the process of recovery. His senses weren’t very acute. It was like the break of dawn, when someone had just woken up from sleep. He only felt that Huo Yuhao were extremely strong, but his aura was the same aura of evil soul masters.

The evil soul master was unsure as he asked, “You, you are…”

“You don’t need to know who I am.” Huo Yuhao said coldy, “You just need to tell me what happened. Why did you faint by the side of the palace? Who knocked you out?”

The evil Soul Sage subconsciously answered, “A Soul Sage invaded the palace and killed one of my subordinates. After I discovered him, I immediately chased him. I gained the upper hand at first, but that person suddenly turned around. I fell into a trance before my entire body felt very cold. After that, I don’t know what happened.”

“Are you telling the truth? Did you miss anything?” Huo Yuhao said coldly. At the same time, he was also silently unleashing his spiritual power to influence the evil Soul Sage’s mind.

“Of course I am. Who exactly are you?” The evil Soul Sage mind seemed to clear at this moment. He also looked a little skeptical as he looked at Huo Yuhao.

“You don’t have to care who I am.” Huo Yuhao answered, “I already said that knowing more won’t help you. You just need to know that Sect Leader Zhong Li sent me over to supervise all of you.”

“You, you’re from the Imperial Shrine?” The evil Soul Sage seemed to have heard something terrifying, and his voice started trembling.

Imperial Shrine?

Huo Yuhao was moved. He seemed to remember people calling the Holy Ghost Church that before.

Then Long Xiaoyao seems to be a member of the Imperial Shrine. He must hold a high position, too.

“It’s good that you know. Tell me, what else have you missed? Also, what does the person who knocked you out look like?”

The evil Soul Sage laughed bitterly. “I really don’t remember, sir.”

“Since you can’t remember, I’ll help you do so. Don’t resist, otherwise you’ll bear the ramifications.” As he spoke, Huo Yuhao started reciting incantations. His voice became low-pitched and hoarse, but there seemed to be some special magical power about it.

The evil Soul Sage looked at him dumbfoundedly and let him recite his incantations. Bei Bei also started to break out in a sweat.

This guy is too brazen. Although I don’t know what he’s doing, trouble might brew if that evil Soul Sage fights back and attacks him.

However, Huo Yuhao was very good at this. In addition, his Necromancer abilities were too similar to those of evil soul masters, such that the evil Soul Sage threw away his doubts after sensing Huo Yuhao’s strong necromantic aura. Huo Yuhao’s aura was simply too strong, and he couldn’t resist at all. Moreover, the Imperial Shrine was very respected in the Holy Ghost Church. The evil Soul Sage wasn’t in any position to put up any resistance.

A layer of pale white light drifted up from Huo Yuhao’s body as he started reciting incantations. Slowly, this pale white light formed flames, which started burning between him and the evil Soul Sage.

The evil Soul Sage felt his spirit being sucked away just taking a look at it. Slowly, he began to appear very dazed and lost. He seemed to enter a very weird state, as if he had lost his spirit.

This was the Fire of Spiritual Control. It was a strong spell that Electrolux had once used to control some powerful individuals before. However, this spell caused a great backlash too. Unless the other party’s cultivation was far weaker, even Electrolux wouldn’t use it easily.

Although the evil Soul Sage had around the same soul power cultivation as Huo Yuhao, their spiritual powers were vastly different. Moreover, the evil Soul Sage was still very weak after being thawed out. How could he possibly resist the Fire of Spiritual Control?

“What is your name?” Huo Yuhao asked coldly.

“I’m called Chu Yanwei,” the evil soul master replied dazedly.

“What is your mission in the Heavenly Soul Empire?” Huo Yuhao asked.

“My mission is to aid the Nightmare Douluo and supervise the Sun Moon Empire’s control over the Heavenly Soul Empire. At the same time, I’m here to gather more resources. I am to listen to the Nightmare Douluo’s instructions.”

“Where are the two Holy Ladies?” After preparing for so long, Huo Yuhao finally asked the question he was most concerned about.

In the corner, Bei Bei also clenched his fists and stared at Chu Yanwei.





Volume 34, Chapter 485.3: I'm Not Dead?


Chu Yanwei was still a little dazed as he replied, “Out of the two Holy Ladies, one of them is at the front line. The other one seems to be in trouble. I heard she was locked away and imprisoned at headquarters.”

Front line and headquarters!

Huo Yuhao was delighted, and continued probing, “Where is the headquarters?”

“Headquarters? It’s…” Just as he finished speaking, his pupils dilated. His body started to shake tremendously, and balloon at an incredible speed!

“Shit!” Huo Yuhao shouted. He turned around and leapt towards Nan Qiuqiu and Bei Bei. At the same time, he quickly switched his martial soul to his Ice Jade Empress Scorpion, and smacked Chu Yanwei’s body, slowing its expansion rate.

Three figures rushed out of the room simultaneously. Behind them, a loud explosion blew apart the room behind them.

There were sizzling sounds along with the explosion. Bei Bei’s office was torn apart. The huge explosive force went all the way into the sky, forming a greyish mushroom cloud that was about to spread.

Huo Yuhao didn’t dare to delay any further. He mimicked a lifting action, and a strong tornado was unleashed from his hands. His Ultimate Ice soul power shot into the sky, turning into countless snowflakes. These snowflakes engulfed the greyish fog in the air before sending it further up into the sky.

Huo Yuhao charged up after it, controlling his snowflakes. He froze the particles before turning them into a giant, greyish ice ball. After that, he put this ball away in his storage-type soul tool, preventing the lethal poison from spreading.

This explosion alarmed the entire Tang Sect. Very quickly, many senior figures from the Tang Sect had gathered.

“Little junior, are you hurt?” Bei Bei flew up to Huo Yuhao’s side.

Huo Yuhao shook his head before landing. “I’m fine. I just didn’t expect that some kind of curse was actually placed on Chu Yanwei by some senior evil soul master. This soul master’s method is really weird.”

Bei Bei was also given a shock. He could still clearly remember the explosion of an evil soul master’s corpse that hurt many of his seniors during the Continental Advanced Soul Master Academy Soul Dueling Tournament, when he was still a reserve squad member of Shrek Academy. That was also the reason why they were chosen to compete for the Academy.

This time it was a Soul Sage who had blown up. Fortunately, the body of that Soul Sage was very weak, which was why the strength of the explosion wasn’t too great. Otherwise, the three of them might not have been able to escape in time.

Bei Bei asked, “Little junior, what’s this curse you’re talking about?”

Huo Yuhao replied, “If I’m not wrong, it must have been placed by a Titled Douluo. This Titled Douluo must have grown some kind of weird soul power in Chu Yanwei’s body. There’s even a spiritual aura to this soul power, which was tightly connected to Chu Yanwei’s own soul and spiritual origins. When he was about to reveal some secret, he would initiate an explosion using his own soul and spiritual power, just like what we saw earlier. Evidently, anything on the Holy Ghost Church’s headquarters is top secret.”

Bei Bei nodded agreement.

Huo Yuhao smiled and said, “However, we’ve already achieved our goal. Teacher Xiao Ya is at the front lines of the Heavenly Soul Empire. This is valuable information. Sister Xiaotao is at the headquarters. It seems like she’s unable to repress the evil fire inside her. We must think of a way to quickly find her so that I can help her. Otherwise, she’ll do a lot of things she doesn’t want to once she loses her rationality.”

Although Huo Yuhao didn’t explicitly say anything, Bei Bei understood what he meant. Right now, everyone else had already surrounded them.

Xu Sanshi, Jiang Nannan, Xiao Xiao and even He Caitou were here. Seeing that Huo Yuhao had awoken, they were all delighted. They only understood what had happened after asking him.

Xu Sanshi looked at Bei Bei. “How? No matter where, I’ll follow you. When are we setting off?”

There was a complex look in Bei Bei’s eyes. He unwittingly clenched his fists, and his breathing grew heavier.

This was their first time receiving accurate information on Tang Ya ever since their second tournament. It would be a lie to say that he wasn’t anxious at all. However, the Sun Moon Empire had deployed a few soul engineer legions at the frontline. There were evil soul masters from the Holy Ghost Church there, too. It would be extremely difficult for them to save Xiao Ya. Furthermore, the Tang Sect was in a very important developmental stage right now. If everyone was brought along on this mission, failure would affect the future development of the sect.

“For my own selfish reasons, I can’t…” Bei Bei said achingly.

“Eldest senior, don’t put it that way. If not for Teacher Xiao Ya, there wouldn’t be a Tang Sect. Third senior is right. No matter what, we’ll follow you on this trip. We must save Teacher Xiao Ya,” Huo Yuhao stated with determination.

Jiang Nannan, Xiao Xiao, He Caitou, Ji Juechen and Jing Ziyan all nodded with him. They all looked very determined.

“Thanks, thanks everyone.” Bei Bei peered into the sky. Normally, he was very composed. However, he was clenching his lips tightly right now. He was well-aware that they would face many problems if they all went on this trip. Although they were from the Tang Sect, everyone knew that the Tang Sect and Shrek Academy were almost the same. Once they embroiled themselves in the war, it undoubtedly meant that Shrek Academy would be joining the war. This would affect the entire Academy!

“Bei Bei, make your choice,” Xu Sanshi said.

Bei Bei looked at everyone and said heavily, “This matter is of vital importance. I can’t decide alone. It’s not even something that the Tang Sect can decide. Go get busy first. I’ll ask Elder Xuan and see what he thinks.”

Everyone nodded. If they wanted to save Tang Ya, they would need to consult the Academy first. In addition, they would be more likely to succeed if they had the Academy’s support.

“Little junior, follow me.” Bei Bei looked at Huo Yuhao.

“Alright.”

-----------

Huo Yuhao returned to his room to wash up and change his clothes. As he changed his clothes, he couldn’t help but wonder where his bloodstained clothes had disappeared to.

Did Tang Wutong change my clothes for me? I really have to ask her what happened when I go to the Academy this time.

Bei Bei and Huo Yuhao left the Tang Sect and rushed to the Academy. On the way, Bei Bei told him about the sect’s development during this period of time.

Following the Academy’s plans, the three soul engineer legions were in the process of being established. A huge amount of resources had been gathered, and the Tang Sect and the Soul Tool Department of the Academy were doing their best to establish these three soul engineer legions.

The threat posed by the Sun Moon Empire was simply too great, such that the Dou Ling Empire and the Star Luo Empire had greatly supported their efforts.

In terms of soul tool technology, these two empires were lagging slightly behind, and they weren’t on the same level as Shrek Academy. The Academy agreed to supply soul tools to them at cost price after they had manufactured sufficient soul tools. These soul tools could be used to resist the Sun Moon Empire.

According to their current progress, the soul engineer legions would be fully equipped in less than a year’s time. The three soul engineer legions were already being trained under Xian Lin’er and Qian Duoduo’s tutelage. All the inner courtyard students were involved in the training. They were going to be the main force in the future, and also going to be an elite force. In terms of soul masters, Shrek Academy never had to fear anyone else.

The Tang Sect was basically on the right track now. There were more and more disciples in the sect, too. Many of them came from the Academy, especially from the Soul Tool Hall. Basically, the sect was the same entity as Shrek’s Soul Tool Department. The students nurtured by the Academy had to be tested in the Soul Tool Hall first. This was a win-win situation for both the Tang Sect and Shrek Academy. Furthermore, the students had many rare metals to experiment with. This was especially beneficial to their cultivation, which was met with great approval by the vast majority of teachers and students.

---

It wasn’t far from the Sect to the Academy. In just a while, the two of them were already at the east gate of the Academy.

Ever since the new Shrek City was built, the Academy was fully encompassed by the city, it was no longer at the edge of the city anymore.

Huo Yuhao also asked about the situation at the Spirit Pagoda, whose overall development was stalled by the war. However, the Academy had experienced great development. Following the increase in the number of successful Spirits, more old and dying soul beasts were willing to offer themselves as spirits. Furthermore, the establishment of the Spirit Pagoda also reduced the number of humans entering the Great Star Dou Forest to hunt for soul beasts. This fulfilled Huo Yuhao’s wish back when he had first established the Spirit Pagoda. Despite everything, there were still a few good things going on...





Volume 34, Chapter 486.1: Elder Xuan is Wise


After entering the Academy, Huo Yuhao and Bei Bei slowed down.

Bei Bei was a little puzzled as he asked, “Yuhao, what’s going on between you and Wutong? Why did she leave without saying a word after sending you back that day?”

Huo Yuhao was helpless as he replied, “I don’t know either! We faced danger then. She must have saved me. Perhaps she was hurt or too tired, and she rushed back to the Academy to rest.”

He didn’t dare tell Bei Bei that he took nine stabs for Tang Wutong. If he did, he didn’t know how Bei Bei would admonish him. He wasn’t afraid of anyone but Bei Bei. It was like facing Dai Luoli. He had always considered Bei Bei like his own biological elder brother.

Bei Bei said, “Since she saved you, you should go and visit her after we report to Elder Xuan. This time, Wutong has really treated you well by going so far to save you. I can tell that she likes you.”

Huo Yuhao revealed a bitter smile on his face. However, he didn’t outright reject Bei Bei. He only nodded slightly.

------

Bei Bei brought him as the two of them went to Sea God’s Island. They rushed straight to Sea God’s Pavilion under Bei Bei’s lead.

When they were outside the pavilion, Huo Yuhao stopped in front of the Golden Tree before kowtowing. Bei Bei did the same.

Huo Yuhao thought to himself,

Teacher, I’m back alive. I faced Long Xiaoyao this time, but I don’t know why he let me off. Is it because of you? Or something else? Why did my cultivation improve after I took the nine stabs? And why aren’t there any wounds on my body?

Regarding this mystery, he could only ask Tang Wutong later on. However, he could roughly remember that Tang Wutong had fainted before he completely lost consciousness.

How would she know anything, if that’s the case? It would probably be too difficult for her.

Huo Yuhao sighed helplessly as he finished thinking.

“Why are you sighing? Both of you, come in” Elder Xuan’s voice came from the Sea God’s Pavilion.

Huo Yuhao and Bei Bei stood up and walked into the pavilion. Among the younger generation, only the two of them and Zhang Lexuan could enter and leave the Sea God’s Pavilion freely. That was because they were all members of the Sea God’s Pavilion. Without a doubt, they were going to be the leading figures of Shrek Academy in the future.

Elder Xuan was already waiting for them on the first level. He looked at Huo Yuhao and said, “Yuhao, why do you create a different problem every time you leave? You’re a problem magnet indeed!”

Huo Yuhao tensed up.

Don’t tell me that Wutong has already told Elder Xuan about our meeting with the Darkness Holy Dragon? Elder senior will still scold me if Elder Xuan blurts it out!

However, he had no other choice, since things were already at this stage. He only thickened his skin and laughed, “Elder Xuan, I don’t know whether I’m fortunate or not. However, I did earn some merit this time! Even if I was wrong in some way, I should be able to make amends for it.”

Elder Xuan nodded and answered, “You did make a mistake, which is to cause trouble for me. However, you did well in the Extreme North. Tell me, how did you spoil the Sun Moon Empire’s plans? Logically speaking, you couldn’t deal with an entire soul engineer legion on your own. Qiuqiu’s words were also very ambiguous. She also doesn’t know what you did.”

Hup Yuhao coughed. “It’s like that. Elder Xuan, I’ve got some things to report to you. In fact, do you still remember the Spirit that I have?”

Elder Xuan thought for a moment before asking, “Are you talking about that young lady? The cute one?”

Huo Yuhao nodded hurriedly and answered, “Yes, her.”

“Of course I do. How could I not remember such a cute young lady? Why? What has she got to do with this?” Elder Xuan was puzzled. Even Bei Bei was curious. Even though he all along knew that Huo Yuhao’s strength was a little mysterious, this had to do with Huo Yuhao’s own privacy. If Yuhao didn’t say anything, he wouldn’t ask. But right now, his curiosity was piqued.

Huo Yuhao chuckled and said, “She isn’t some young girl. Talking about her background, it’s actually quite impressive.”

He recounted how he came upon the embryo of the Snow Empress when he was in the Sun Moon Imperial Soul Engineering Academy, as well as how he had fused with her. He also talked about how the Snow Empress had created a Spirit.

After hearing his story, Elder Xuan and Bei Bei were in awe!

The things that happened to Huo Yuhao couldn’t be adequately described by the word ‘magical’ anymore. A human had actually fused with the Snow Empress, ranked third among the Ten Great Savage Beasts. The Snow Empress was only inferior to Di Tian and the Evileye Tyrant King, her cultivation around seven hundred thousand years!

When the Snow Empress was at her peak, even if Mu En were still alive, he might not even be able to fight her. If it was in the ice plains of the Extreme North, the Snow Empress could even fight the Beast God! Such a supernatural being had actually become Huo Yuhao’s Spirit!

No wonder this kid’s Ultimate Ice abilities rose so quickly. Ultimate Ice is such a difficult ability to cultivate, but he was able to become a Soul Sage just like Bei Bei and the rest. So this is why!

“I led the Snow Empress to the core of the Extreme North. Under her command, the strongest species of soul beasts in the Extreme North, the Tai Tan Snowdevils, agreed to help me. I came up with a simple plan to destroy the base and facilities that the Sun Moon Empire’s military had set up. Given the harsh conditions, they couldn’t survive without their facilities, and could only retreat. Believe me, with the threat of those soul beasts, and given the Sun Moon Empire is so far away, they won’t be able to do anything in the short-term.”

Elder Xuan’s lips twisted after he heard Huo Yuhao’s story. He said, “That works? You’re actually able to tap into the power of the soul beasts in the Extreme North. It’s really…”

“Hehe.” Huo Yuhao chuckled. He was blowing his horn a bit, but he was also a little proud of himself.

Elder Xuan glared at him and said, “Don’t be too happy. Don’t be so reckless when you face something like that in the future. Can’t you at least send news back to the Academy and wait for reinforcements first? Do you really not trust us at all?”

Although Elder Xuan was admonishing Huo Yuhao, Huo Yuhao still felt very warm in his heart.

Yes! Shrek Academy is just like my home. “Yes, I was wrong, Elder Xuan. I’ll keep that in mind in the future,” Huo Yuhao admitted his mistake very obediently.

Elder Xuan wanted to scold him further, but he stopped upon seeing that Huo Yuhao was so repentant. After all, he was already a grown-up. He couldn’t help but laugh, “You are eager to admit your mistakes, but you won’t change your character.”

Huo Yuhao scratched his head in embarrassment, while Bei Bei nodded in agreement.

Huo Yuhao quickly changed the topic and said, “Elder Xuan, both of us are here to tell you about Teacher Xiao Ya. We caught an evil soul master when we went to Heaven Dou City. We managed to find out that she’s at the front lines.”

Huo Yuhao was secretly relieved when he said that. Elder Xuan didn’t seem to know about him and Tang Wutong. Otherwise, he wouldn’t be let off so easily.

Bei Bei was anxious, and rushed to tell Elder Xuan about what Chu Yanwei had revealed.

Elder Xuan pondered for a moment. “Since that’s the case, form a team in the Tang Sect. I’ll think about who I should send with you.”

Bei Bei was evidently a little stunned. He probed, “Elder Xuan, we’re going to save Xiao Ya. Will it affect the Academy?”

Elder Xuan glanced at him. “I understand what you’re worried about. Don’t tell me that the Sun Moon Empire doesn’t know that we’re going to deal with them? Not only do we have to succeed in saving her this time, but we must also do something useful. This will boost confidence in the three empires of the original Douluo Continent. At the same time, we’ll bring the Sun Moon Empire back to the ground. We must think of a way to confuse them.”

Bei Bei’s eyes brightened, and he said, “Elder Xuan is wise.”

Elder Xuan snapped, “Stop bootlicking. Tell me then, how am I wise?”

“Uh… Elder Xuan, I’m a little confused. Come, Yuhao, tell him.” As he spoke, he dragged Huo Yuhao over.

Eldest senior, you’re dishonorable!

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly in his heart, but he didn’t dare to say it out loud. He thought for a moment before saying, “Elder Xuan, you’re clear in the other areas, but as for the confusion part, we just have to exclude soul engineers. We’ll use traditional soul masters from the Academy to fight. The Sun Moon Empire will still think that we’re mainly composed of soul masters. Even if our Soul Tool Department has developed, it can’t compare to our soul masters.”

Elder Xuan nodded in satisfaction and said, “That’s it. Right now, Lin’er and Duoduo are busy with the Soul Tool Department. I’ll ask Shaozhe to follow both of you instead. He can represent the Academy. However, the lessons and training in the Academy are quite tight on schedule. I can’t allocate many people to go with you. I’ll ask Elder Song to go, too. With the two of them around, there shouldn’t be any problems protecting you.”

In Shrek Academy, Elder Song was only inferior to Elder Xuan. Her Greenshadow Godly Eagle had played a very important role during the Beast Wave.

With two Transcendent Douluo backing them up, their chances of success were greatly increased. Bei Bei rubbed his hands in excitement. “Thanks, Elder Xuan! Thank you!”





Volume 34, Chapter 486.2: Elder Xuan is Wise


Elder Xuan smiled and asked, “What are you thanking me for? I already said that Shrek Academy and the Tang Sect are just like one family. Xiao Ya is the real sect leader of the Tang Sect. Shouldn’t we save her? However, do you have any way of removing the evil poison in her body?”

Bei Bei’s expression turned slightly grim, and he answered, “It’ll be difficult. However, we have to save her before we even have a chance.”

Elder Xuan said, “Oh, that’s right. It’s fine for both of you to go this time, but please be careful. Think about who you want to bring along with you on this trip. You should be the ones holding the fort at the Tang Sect, but I’m afraid you’ll still be anxious even if you remain in the sect. That’s why it’s better for you to go. But you still need to arrange things in the Tang Sect first.”

“Yes, I’ll do so!” Bei Bei replied excitedly.

“Elder Xuan, how’s Tang Wutong? She saved me. I’m planning to go take a look at her,” Huo Yuhao probed by asking Elder Xuan.

Elder Xuan replied, “You can’t find her now. She’s in closed-door cultivation.”

“What?” Huo Yuhao was stunned as he looked at Elder Xuan.

Elder Xuan said, “I don’t know what’s going on with her, either. She seems a little distracted after saving you. She asked permission from me to enter closed-door cultivation. No one is to disturb her. She’s very talented, and is not even inferior to you. I hope this round of cultivation will do her some good.”

--------------

After hearing Elder Xuan’s words, Huo Yuhao naturally couldn’t insist anymore. He returned to the Tang Sect after leaving the Sea God’s Pavilion with Bei Bei.

Bei Bei immediately got busy. He didn’t know when they would return once they left on this trip. Things were still very busy in the Tang Sect. Naturally, he had to make plans before leaving.

Huo Yuhao didn’t idle either. He returned to his room and immediately summoned the Snow Empress from his spiritual sea. The situation of the Ice Bear King was unknown, but he believed the Snow Empress had a way of finding him.

He slightly sighed and thought to himself.

I’m afraid the Snow Empress will scold me this time. I was really resigned to dying then. I really feel a little uncomfortable facing the Snow Empress, Ice Empress, and Brother Skydream.

But I have no choice. No matter what, this issue has to be settled.

Since he had no choice, he gritted his teeth and summoned the Snow Empress from his spiritual sea.

A figure flashed before the Snow Empress appeared. Just like Huo Yuhao had expected, she was staring at him with a cold look. It looked like he was going to be in great trouble.

“I was wrong.” Huo Yuhao lowered his head and used the same trick he had used on Elder Xuan earlier.

The Snow Empress didn’t say anything as she looked at him.

“Snow Empress, I admit my mistake. I…”

“Boo!” The Snow Empress suddenly laughed. She couldn’t maintain the cold expression on her face anymore, and a captivating smile surfaced.

Huo Yuhao subconsciously lifted his head. When he saw her laughing, he was shocked.

“What, what are you laughing at?”

The Snow Empress suddenly turned serious and snorted, “What do you think? What do you think I’m laughing at?”

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly and replied, “I don’t know! I’d rather you scold me instead. I’ll feel better then.”

The Snow Empress snapped, “Daddy, are you so miserable?”

Huo Yuhao got goosebumps when she called him ‘daddy’. “I think calling me that is even worse than scolding me.”

The Snow Empress was furious, “I’ll keep calling you that. Daddy, daddy, daddy…”

Huo Yuhao listened to her listlessly, and didn’t dare to resist at all. Who asked him to be the one at fault?

The room became quiet once again. The Snow Empress looked at him just like that, but he didn’t dare to look back at her. He only lowered his head.

After a brief moment, the Snow Empress laughed once again. “You’re indeed a fool. No wonder Wang Dong’er called you that when you were still together. Did you really think the Darkness Holy Dragon wanted to kill you? And that we’d watch and let you die? He didn’t have the intention of killing you from the beginning. Otherwise, it wouldn’t have been so simple.”

“What?” Huo Yuhao lifted his head and looked at the Snow Empress in a daze.

The Snow Empress snorted coldly. “Did you not understand me? That day, right from the start, the Darkness Holy Dragon had no intention of killing you. I don’t know what you were thinking. Given his cultivation, he would have countless ways to kill you. He can even avoid Di Tian. However, he didn’t have the intention. Didn’t you notice that? If he wanted to kill you, what would be the point of dragging you outside the city? The city is his territory. What would be the point of dragging you outside the city?”

Huo Yuhao was stunned as he asked, “He didn’t want to kill me? Why did he threaten me, then? And why did he lay his hands on me?”

The Snow Empress answered, “I didn’t understand at the start, either. I only felt that he neither wanted to kill you nor harbored any evil intentions toward Tang Wutong. Otherwise, do you really think you could have attacked so many times? If he didn’t give in to you, you would already have been restrained by his Domain.”

Huo Yuhao furrowed his brow. “That’s weird, then. If Long Xiaoyao didn’t want to hurt me or Wutong, what was the point of appearing? Snow Empress, tell me, quickly.”

The Snow Empress said coldly, “Before I reveal his true intentions, let’s talk about us first. You wanted to abandon us, right? Tell me, what should we do?”

Huo Yuhao was helpless as he laughed bitterly, “I had no choice then! Did you really expect me to be confident in the face of an Ultimate Douluo? I had no choice. I only knew that Long Xiaoyao would keep his promise. The poison in his dagger could have killed Tang Wutong. I’d rather take the poison in her place. At least one of us would be alive to relay information. I’m a man. I couldn’t have let a woman take stabs for me! Furthermore, I remember the Ice Empress mentioning before that your origins have been consolidated after absorbing the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. Even if I died, all of you could still find new bodies.”

The Snow Empress sighed and said, “You’re really a fool. Ice was only saying that. Furthermore, she was only speaking theoretically. Right now, let me tell you for real. In fact, our lives are tied to you. If you die, we die. Skydream might still be able to leave your body. However, have you forgotten? When you were forming your soul core, he left the remnants of his spiritual origin to you. It’s like allowing a part of his Spirit to fuse with you. He’s already a part of you. If you let him go, would you still have a conscience?”

“What?” Huo Yuhao was stunned.

The Snow Empress snorted coldly and continued, saying, “Furthermore, can Ice leave? She’s your second martial soul, and her origin power is in your soul bone. If you die and she’s able to escape, she’ll have less than one percent of her original strength. She’ll dissipate before she can even find a new body. Among all of us, Star Anise is the most likely to escape. That’s because Star Anise is a pure Spirit. After absorbing some ice essence, its origin is stable, and is the only one who can find a new owner.”

After speaking to there, the Snow Empress paused for a moment before continuing, “Lastly, me. Initially, your teacher burned the origin of his divine sense to save me, so that I could become your Spirit. Otherwise, how could you have handled my immense strength, given how weak you were back then? My origin has long been interlinked with your Spirit through your teacher’s divine sense. He saved me out of goodwill. However, he also tied me to you in order to save you. If you die, I’ll be the next. Do you understand?”

It was indeed Huo Yuhao’s first time learning about his connection with his four Spirits. He felt very guilty now. The Snow Empress’ words were very clear to him. If he died, all his Spirits, excluding the Star Anise Mysterious Ice Grass, would be buried with him!

Suddenly, his face turned red. He didn’t know what to say. He had only achieved what he had today with the help of his Spirits. However, he had thought of giving up then.

The Snow Empress groaned, “I’m telling you all this to make you understand. You aren’t living for one person now, but for everyone. Yes, you might have faced some obstacles in your love life. However, you’re a man. Can’t you live without love?”

Huo Yuhao lowered his head as he said, “Snow Empress, I was in the wrong. I won’t do it again.”

“Mm.” The Snow Empress gently acknowledged his words and said, “Alright, you don’t have to act like this. In fact, we aren’t angry with you.”

Huo Yuhao lifted his head again after hearing her words. “Not angry with me?” He sounded a little astonished.

The look in the Snow Empress’ eyes had evidently turned gentler. She sighed slightly and said, “We can understand what you’re going through, and it’s not easy. All these years, you’ve been cultivating tirelessly and facing all sorts of dangers. You’ve even been spiritually affected. To be honest, you’re already very tough and resilient for a human. If it were someone else the other day, he would have made the same choice too. This is why you shouldn’t think too much. We can understand your decision. You’re tired. The pressure on you has been too great.

“Let me tell you something else. Remember that we are your Spirits. We are one with you. No matter what you do in the future, you must treasure yourself. It’s the same as treasuring us. Moreover, you don’t have to treat us as burdens or misgivings. We’re part of you. That’s why we should try to help you shoulder whatever burdens you have, instead of giving you more pressure.”





Volume 34, Chapter 486.3: Elder Xuan is Wise


Huo Yuhao’s eyes started to turn red as he looked at the Snow Empress. In fact, in his heart, whether it was the Skydream Iceworm or the Ice Empress, they were reasons why he felt stressed. He clearly knew what their objectives were in following him. If he couldn’t fulfil them, he would be letting them down!

The Snow Empress’ words moved him greatly, and caused the last streak of distance between him and the Spirits in his body to vanish completely.

“Thanks, Snow Empress!” Huo Yuhao sobbed.

“Call me Snow Lady. We know you’re tired. That’s why we won’t force you in the future. Rest when it’s time to rest, and relax when it’s time to relax. Even against strong opponents, you have us. Long Xiaoyao was right. As an Ultimate Douluo, he has many ways of isolating your connection with Di Tian. However, he doesn’t know that you and I are the same entity. I’m not some kind of greenhorn. As long as I’m around, I can get into contact with the Beast God anytime I want, and inform him that you’re in danger. Doesn’t Di Tian want to restrict you? He’s the first person you can turn to. You might as well make good use of him. That’s why you don’t have to be overly concerned for your own safety. Of course, it’s still best to be careful.”

“Alright, Snow Lady. What about Little Bai? He’s still at Heaven Dou City. I planned to ask you if you can contact him. I’ll go to Heaven Dou City to find him now.”

“You don’t have to go to Heaven Dou City.” The Snow Empress laughed as she said, “I already knew that you were going to ask me this. When Tang Wutong left with you, I had already signaled to Little Bai to tag along. In fact, I would have asked Little Bai to go over if not for the fact that Long Xiaoyao didn’t plan to kill you. With him around, you should have been able to retreat safely.”

“Where is he now?” Huo Yuhao asked, surprised.

“Outside Shrek City.” The Snow Empress said, “I asked him to wait in the wilderness. Go and fetch him. After that, I believe that your fusion with him can begin.”

“What?” Huo Yuhao was startled, “What do you mean?”

The Snow Empress nodded and said, “That’s right. When you were hurt that day, Long Xiaoyao first dispelled the poison from your body before healing your wounds. According to his words, he wanted to drain your soul and spiritual power, as well as your energy, before letting you consume that thing. Once you absorb it, its effect will be greatest.”

Huo Yuhao was stunned, “What thing? What exactly is that? What did Long Xiaoyao do to me?”

The Snow Empress sighed and was a little envious as she looked at him and said, “That day, Long Xiaoyao gave you a Dragon Pill.”

“Dragon Pill? What is that?” He asked, stunned.

“What?” The Snow Empress was speechless as she asked, “You don’t know what a Dragon Pill is? Oh, no wonder. It’s a treasure in this world that you basically can’t find.”

Huo Yuhao was curious as he looked at her. He was waiting for her to explain.

The Snow Empress continued, “A Dragon Pill is a pill from a dragon.”

“……”

The Snow Empress couldn’t help but chortle after seeing Huo Yuhao’s speechless look, “I’m not wrong! Why are you looking at me like that?”

Huo Yuhao said, “That’s because your explanation is too good. A pill from a dragon. Why don’t you call it a dragon’s egg instead?”

The Snow Empress laughed, “Dragon’s egg? The effect of a dragon’s egg isn’t even as great as a Dragon Pill. Can you fertilize a dragon’s egg? Even if you can, can you wait for it to grow up? A dragon takes many years to grow from a fetus to an adult.”

“What’s a Dragon Pill, then?” Huo Yuhao asked.

The Snow Empress answered, “A Dragon Pill is an energy body that slowly forms after a Giant Dragon becomes an adult. It contains the blood lineage of a Giant Dragon, as well as its origin strength. It’s something a Giant Dragon uses to develop its spiritual senses. You can take it like this: a Dragon Pill from a Giant Dragon is like the soul core of a human soul master. It’s even more important than a soul core. You have to kill a Giant Dragon to obtain its Dragon Pill.”

“So fierce? Why did Long Xiaoyao give me such a pill then? What effect will it have on me?” Huo Yuhao asked hurriedly. It sounded like it was a great thing!

The Snow Empress answered, “I’m not too sure about that. However, I might have overheard that it had something to do with someone called Mu En. Mu En seemed to have asked him for a favor. That’s why he gave it to you.”

“Teacher?” Huo Yuhao said. “Mu En is my teacher! Together, they were known as the Twin Dragons of Black and White. He was also an Ultimate Douluo, and the last Master of the Sea God’s Pavilion. He was very strong, and his martial soul was the Radiant Holy Dragon.”

The Snow Empress was enlightened, “I see. I don’t know where they got that Dragon Pill. You really have it good.”

Huo Yuhao said, “You haven’t told me what a Dragon Pill is used for.”

The Snow Empress replied, “Its greatest effect is to cleanse your body and strengthen your blood and bones. Simply put, after you consume the Dragon Pill, your body will become as strong as a Giant Dragon’s. Even when you try to break through to become an Ultimate Douluo, you don’t have to worry about your body not being strong enough.”

Huo Yuhao was astonished. As an elite student of Shrek Academy, he naturally understood that a soul master’s physical strength had to do with his cultivation. Usually, a soul master’s physical strength was what limited him during the later stages of cultivation. This was especially relevant at the tier of Transcendent Douluo. Most times, it was because their body couldn’t handle the surge of soul power.

If the Snow Empress is right, does that mean I would have no problems cultivating all the way to an Ultimate Douluo in the future? It’s not just a great thing! This Dragon Pill is indeed very powerful. Teacher, did you ask Long Xiaoyao for help? IF so, why is he with the Holy Ghost Church, then?

Right now, Huo Yuhao was lost. He didn’t understand what kind of agreement Long Xiaoyao had with his teacher to lead to what had happened. However, no matter what, it was great to have consumed a Dragon Pill.

“That is why your soul power reached all the way to a bottleneck. The Dragon Pill is transforming your body, and has taken form inside your body. Otherwise you would have imploded, given your cultivation. Long Xiaoyao must have been prepared.

“He used a part of the Dragon Pill’s strength on your body, while the rest of its strength was used to compress it in your chest. In the future, if you can form a soul core there, the strength contained within the Dragon Pill will be of great help to you. Long Xiaoyao has given you a big gift. Right now, we really see hope in you. It’s not just because of your intelligence or talent. It’s more because of your abilities. Do you understand?”

After hearing the Snow Empress’ words, Huo Yuhao still didn’t understand, and looked at her in confusion.

“You’re really dumb. Has your brain turned to dust after being stabbed a few times?” The Snow Empress rolled her eyes and said, “Think about it. How many different types of strength are there in your body? First, you have the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. I’ve already absorbed a large part of the ice essence. You absorbed part of it too, and it’s still in your blood. In fact, it will be of use when you try to reach Rank 90 and become a Titled Douluo. As you already have a soul core, it’s much more difficult to form a second one. You’ll need enough energy to support your endeavor. Otherwise, why did you think I would ask them to store all the ice essence? It’s for when you form your second soul core!

“While the Dragon Pill that Long Xiaoyao gave you might seem to contain less energy than our ice essence, it’s still immense. Furthermore, the strength of that Dragon Pill is much more dominating, and it’s extremely helpful to your body. According to your current situation, you should form your second soul core in your chest and absorb the strength of that Dragon Pill. In that way, your body will evolve once again when you form your second soul core with the Dragon Pill as its core.

“Earlier, I mentioned that your strength would be similar to that of a Giant Dragon. What I meant was that it would happen after you absorb the strength of the Dragon Pill, not now. Although you’ve been strengthened, you’re still lacking compared to a true Giant Dragon. However, things will be different after you absorb the strength of a Dragon Pill. Even your spiritual sea will be as stable as a Giant Dragon’s at that time, along with your body. When you fight Di Tian in the future, you’ll at least stand a chance.

“This also means that you can form an unprecedented third soul core when you become an Ultimate Douluo in the future, with both a Dragon Pill and the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence.”

“Oh.” Huo Yuhao acknowledged her words.

Three soul cores sounds pretty good! I really have hope to become an Ultimate Douluo.

The Snow Empress was annoyed. “What kind of expression is that? Do you know what three soul cores means?”

Huo Yuhao was puzzled and asked, “Is it considered remarkable? Di Tian’s soul power seems to come from his soul cores. How many soul cores does he have?”

“Idiot. With two main soul cores working together, one’s soul power will become as powerful as Di Tian’s. I’m not too sure whether Di Tian has a third main soul core. He should. This means that your abilities will be as great as Di Tian’s if you form three soul cores. You’ll definitely become the strongest human in the last ten thousand years.”





Volume 34, Chapter 487.1: Huo Yuhao is Not Allowed to Go!


“So fierce?” Huo Yuhao finally understood why the Snow Empress said she could see hope in the future from his strength. If he could possess power like Di Tian’s, that meant he would be at the pinnacle of the world. When that happened, as long as he could obtain the Godly Seat, then becoming a God would be the most natural outcome.

“So that’s it. I understand. Thank you, Snow Lady.” Huo Yuhao acknowledged sincerely. The Snow Lady was both teacher and friend to him now. She had been immensely helpful to him ever since she had truly awakened, both on the battlefield and in teaching.

The Snow Empress grunted and said, “There’s no need for thanks. Even though I did say that you can relax when you should, you can’t go overboard with that. You have to work hard at what you need to do. Alright, go and get Little Bai. I figure he’s probably starving.”

Huo Yuhao felt his heart skip a beat. Wasn’t that right? So many days had gone by, and yet he hadn’t given Little Bai anything to eat.

Right, there’s still Big Mao and Second Mao too. They’re still in my spectral demiplane.

Huo Yuhao allowed the Snow Lady to return to his body as he left the room. He found Nan Qiuqiu before he released Big Mao and Second Mao so that she could take them to get something to eat. He quickly ran out of the city.

Huo Yuhao quickly found the Ice Bear King, Little Bai, with the Snow Empress’ guidance.

The Ice Bear King was still at a small river not far from Shrek City, and he was napping without a care. He was still in human form with his enormous and protruding belly, and he dipped his hands into the river water from time to time. He didn’t even have to look, yet he grabbed a fish or two with every dip before he tossed them into his mouth and swallowed them with a few bites.

But how many small fish could there be outside the city? Furthermore, they weren’t very big, and Huo Yuhao could tell from his lazy demeanor that his appetite was clearly unsatiated.

“Little Bai!” Huo Yuhao found him with Spiritual Detection from far away and hurriedly called out.

The Ice Bear King sprang to his feet when he heard Huo Yuhao’s voice. He moved deceptively fast as he looked in Huo Yuhao’s direction with an expression of pleasant surprise.

Huo Yuhao was suspicious about whether this fellow was staring at him so passionately and eagerly because he was hungry, or because he was starting to miss him.

“You’re here, grandfather. I’m starving!” Little Bai was almost stammering as he spoke. He even put his hands into his clothes as he put on a very pitiful look.

Huo Yuhao stared at him as he shook his head in exasperation. If this were made known to the public, who would believe that this “man” was one of the strongest savage beasts in the Extreme North!? He looked just like a hungry little child with that aggrieved expression on his face.

“Alright, alright. Eat your fill.” Huo Yuhao took out a pile of dried meat and fish from his storage-type soul tool for the Ice Bear King to eat.

Huo Yuhao had his own plans. He wanted to bring this fellow back after feeding him. Otherwise, when he began to eat his fill inside the Tang Sect, he would probably astonish the entire Tang Sect. He might possibly even cause mass panic and hysteria!

There was no doubt that Huo Yuhao wanted to bring the Ice Bear King with him on his coming expedition to the front lines. He had worked together with him twice now, and understood quite a bit about his strength from those experiences. Furthermore, his teamwork with the Ice Bear King and their combined fighting strength was very effective, especially in limiting the Sun Moon Empire’s aerial surveillance soul tools. The Ice Bear King was someone who could rival a Transcendent Douluo’s strength.

The Ice Bear King couldn’t be bothered with anything else as long as he had something to eat. He just sat down and gobbled his food up in elation.

---

The Ice Bear King patted his stomach after munching for a good hour. Was it strange that this fellow immediately became so energetic and lively once he was full? Huo Yuhao was rendered speechless as he looked on.

“Where are we going now, grandfather?” the Ice Bear King immediately asked Huo Yuhao.

The Snow Empress immediately came out from Huo Yuhao with a flash of white light and appeared in front of the Ice Bear King.

“Mother!” The Ice Bear King immediately lay prostrate on the ground when he saw her, and called out to her intimately.

The Snow Empress blushed and said, “Don’t call me mother. Address me as Snow Empress next time.” She turned towards Huo Yuhao and asked, “Yuhao, do you plan to fuse with him right now, or a little while later?”

Huo Yuhao understood what she was trying to say. “Are you saying that my soul power has reached Rank 80?”

The Snow Empress nodded and replied, “Even though you’ve only just reached that stage, you are actually at Rank 80. You should have no problem absorbing another soul ring, and that’s the same with a Spirit. Little Bai won’t resist you in any way, and after he becomes your Spirit, your soul power will be boosted by at least another two ranks because you have Ultimate Ice. A normal soul master’s soul power would be boosted by at least four or five ranks.”

Huo Yuhao was astonished when he heard her words. Soul masters needed to accumulate much more soul power to raise their soul power by another rank after reaching Rank 80. A soul master reached a different stage after every ten ranks, and the journey after reaching Rank 80 had been called the path to heaven. Becoming a Titled Douluo was heaven, but how easy could it be to move towards becoming a Titled Douluo?

But that wasn’t too surprising. Little Bai was a savage beast with more than two hundred thousand years of cultivation. Huo Yuhao would definitely receive a great boost in his cultivation after absorbing the Ice Bear King as a Spirit. He could even raise his soul power by two ranks even with his Ultimate Ice. That was strength that belonged to a Soul Douluo!

Huo Yuhao hesitated, but then shook his head and said, “Snow Lady, I can’t bear to leave him. Is it really appropriate that he becomes my Spirit?”

The Snow Empress smiled and said, “You don’t have to hesitate about that. I wouldn’t have been so certain last time. Have you forgotten what I just told you? Even I have seen hope in you, so you fusing with Little Bai is good for him. He won’t disappear because of that anyway, and his consciousness will still be around. Even if you ask Ah Tai to do this, he would be willing to grab such an opportunity. This is an opportunity that soul beasts like us can only dream of. Therefore, you don’t have to deliberate at all. Little Bai will definitely be willing.”

“Yes, yes. I’m willing, I’m willing.” Little Bai chimed in from the side without any hesitation.

Huo Yuhao thought to himself in exasperation,

Little Bai, oh Little Bai. You must have no idea what we’re talking about, and you’re just in a hurry to profess your loyalty. But this fellow is so cutely straightforward and honest.

Huo Yuhao contemplated for a moment, then said, “Snow Empress, I think I’m not going to fuse with Little Bai for now. I am about to go to the front lines, where the Sun Moon Empire and the Heavenly Soul Empire are locked in battle. Little Bai’s support will be very important for us there. Let’s wait until after our expedition. Furthermore, my soul power has just reached Rank 80, and my cultivation isn’t stable or consolidated yet. I’m not in a hurry.”

The Snow Empress replied, “That’s up to you, then, as Little Bai can do it anytime. Bring him along, and you can fuse with him whenever you feel the need to. External strength is not as important as your own strength no matter how powerful it is. Furthermore, I can feel that Little Bai is becoming increasingly close to his day of tribulation. Take him along, and you can absorb him as your Spirit as soon as you feel that something is amiss.”

Huo Yuhao tilted his head and said, “Alright. We’ll rescue teacher Xiao Ya, and then I’ll fuse with Little Bai immediately afterwards.”

------------

Huo Yuhao took the Ice Bear King back to the Tang Sect. He emphasized to Little Bai once more not to address him as “grandfather” before entering the Tang Sect, and Little Bai was like a curious baby as he asked questions nonstop. In the end, Huo Yuhao told him that he wouldn’t give him food to eat if he continued asking, and only then did he quiet down.

“Eh, who’s that, Master?” Huo Yuhao ran into Na Na as soon as he stepped into the door.

Several years had gone by, and Na Na’s spirit and liveliness were vastly different from when she had first met Huo Yuhao. Na Na was both pretty and capable today, and she worked as a butler to the Tang Sect. Her status within the Tang Sect had grown exponentially, but the only characteristic that she couldn’t shake off was that she would always address Huo Yuhao as “master” every time they met. Huo Yuhao was too lazy to correct her after a while.

“This is my friend,” Huo Yuhao introduced the Ice Bear King to Na Na.

Na Na smiled at the Ice Bear King and said, “Welcome to the Tang Sect.”

The Ice Bear King stared at Na Na and said, “Hello, pretty lady.” He had almost never had any contact with humans before, and he almost began to drool when he saw the beautiful Na Na.

Huo Yuhao nudged him from the side, and only then did the Ice Bear King return to normal. He scratched his head awkwardly before he followed Huo Yuhao inside.

---

Bei Bei’s office was torn apart by the explosion, and it was still undergoing repairs, so he decided to move into the conference room to deal with administrative matters.

He had arranged a series of jobs because he was in a hurry to rescue Tang Ya. He had gathered the Tang Sect’s senior-level individuals for a meeting, and they had to discuss who was to participate in this operation. He was the eldest senior brother, but the Tang Sect’s internal affairs and atmosphere had always been harmonious.

“Eldest senior brother, you should let me go, no matter what. It’s my turn.”

Huo Yuhao had just stepped in through the door when he heard his second senior brother, He Caitou’s voice. There was a tinge of bitterness in his voice.

Bei Bei chuckled and said, “Don’t be hasty, Caitou. By rights, I should let you go out to take a walk, but you know about our situation in the Tang Sect. Teacher Xuan can’t deal with everything by himself, and you are the best with soul tools next to our little junior brother. I am most assured with you directing things. You are stable, and I have decided to let you take over my role temporarily. What do you think?”

He Caitou seemed a little depressed as he shook his head. “No. Let me go, eldest senior brother. Why don’t you have little junior brother remain? He’s better than me at everything. With him around, everything within the Tang Sect will be dealt with neatly and impeccably. He hasn’t been staying within our walls for quite some time, and he’s always running into danger when he’s outside. I think we should let him calm down a little inside the Tang Sect, and he can also help relieve your burdens.”

“Don’t backstab me, second senior brother!” Huo Yuhao chimed in with a laugh.





Volume 34, Chapter 487.2: Huo Yuhao is Not Allowed to Go!


He Caitou turned around to look at him, and laughed. “What backstab? I would say the same even if you were in front of me! You have been too wild outside recently. We have been the ones dealing with so much of the sect’s internal affairs, and it’s your turn to stay back this time.”

Huo Yuhao chortled and said, “I’m not very good at resolving the sect’s internal affairs! Eldest senior brother won’t rest assured giving me those responsibilities, right? I’m better at fighting instead. Furthermore, I’m the Tang Sect’s main control-type soul master, and if I’m not there, everyone’s strength will be greatly diminished.”

He was a little worried that Bei Bei wouldn’t let him go. Huo Yuhao’s individual fighting strength was one of the best within the Tang Sect. More importantly, he was the only true control-type soul master within the Tang Sect. Everyone’s overall fighting strength would be greatly boosted with him around. Furthermore, he had always been the one in command in battles.

Bei Bei nodded slightly and said, “It’s quite impossible to fight in the outside world without little junior brother. The truth is, I do want him to keep him here to deal with the sect’s internal affairs. Haih, we’ll do that after this operation.”

Huo Yuhao glanced at He Caitou proudly, as He Caitou retorted dejectedly, “You can’t be biased, eldest senior brother! Don’t we have Dean Yan and Elder Song commanding the team this time? Little junior brother’s absence won’t mean much.”

Huo Yuhao immediately said virtuously, “You can’t say that, second senior brother! The Sun Moon Empire’s aerial surveillance soul tools are developing very quickly, and I have been fighting against them consistently. I have a deep understanding of the Sun Moon Empire’s way of battle. Furthermore, the situation at the front lines is still a mystery, and we don’t know where teacher Xiao Ya is located. With my Spiritual Detection, searching for her will be a lot easier. Elder Xuan has already said we have to confuse our opponents as much as possible in this operation. Your fighting strength with soul tools is so formidable, second senior brother, so what if we expose our Academy’s soul tool standards to them? Won’t that undermine our complete plan?”

He Caitou was rendered speechless by Huo Yuhao’s words. The truth was that He Caitou staying behind was indeed the most appropriate this time. However, he hadn’t been outside for a long time, and was itching to do something. More importantly, Xiao Xiao was also participating in this expedition, and he was a little worried inside, as he wanted to protect her.

“I agree to let him stay behind,” a deep voice spoke up at this moment.

Everyone turned towards where this voice came from; it was Xuan Ziwen, who was sitting just below Bei Bei’s position.

Everyone else’s words were probably not so effective, but Xuan Ziwen’s words immediately made He Caitou smile.

Who was Xuan Ziwen? He was the master of the Tang Sect’s Soul Tool Hall, and he deserved much credit for the Tang Sect’s recent developments. He held a very high status within the Tang Sect, and everyone in the Tang Sect’s senior levels treated him with respect, like a teacher. He was Huo Yuhao’s teacher in the first place, and even Bei Bei had to respect his opinions.

Huo Yuhao’s expression immediately crumbled. “Teacher Xuan, you…”

Xuan Ziwen grunted and said “You still have the audacity to talk back to me? How long have you spent not studying soul tool construction? Don’t forget, you’re already a Class 7 soul engineer. Furthermore, I would not allow it even if you wanted to forgo your development as a soul engineer.”

“Why?” Huo Yuhao stared at Xuan Ziwen in confusion. He remembered very clearly that he had made an agreement with teacher Xuan that they would focus on using all sorts of soul tools, and less on forging soul tools. They would focus more of their attention towards developing his abilities as a soul master. He had twin martial souls after all, and he was already a high-tier soul master at his current rank. His normal cultivation speed would be affected if he continued to train as both soul master and soul engineer at the same time.

Of course, that was the reason Huo Yuhao had given back then when he was discussing it with Xuan Ziwen. The truth however, was that ever since he had obtained his spiritual soul core, and after he had absorbed the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence, training as a soul engineer at the same time wouldn’t affect his cultivation speed much.

Xuan Ziwen snickered and said, “You dug this hole for yourself, Yuhao. Do you remember those rare metals that you let Qiuqiu bring back here?”

“Are you talking about the Divine Ice Crystals?” Huo Yuhao asked.

Xuan Ziwen nodded and said, “Yes, I’m talking about those Divine Ice Crystals. I have never seen that kind of rare metal before, and I began to inspect it once she brought it back. I used all sorts of methods to investigate this rare metal’s characteristics, and I have finally come to a conclusion.”

Xuan Ziwen stood up as he finished. He surveyed everyone in the Tang Sect before he lowered his voice and said, “The Divine Ice Crystal’s quality is comparable to any of the top-tier rare metals in the world today. Furthermore, it can only be equal or better. This means that the Divine Ice Crystals can be used to forge Class 9 soul tools, and it can even be used as materials for forging Class 10 soul tools. I’ve heard from Qiuqiu that you obtained quite a few of these things!”

Huo Yuhao hurriedly nodded and said, “Yes! I have obtained quite a bit of them. Teacher Xuan, I’ll give it all to you. What do you think? After all, you can just forge a suitable soul tool for me when the time comes.”

Xuan Ziwen chuckled once more, his laughter evidently meaning something else as Huo Yuhao felt a chill run down his spine.

Xuan Ziwen continued, “Yes, the Divine Ice Crystal is very precious. However, you probably didn’t realize that I can’t craft things with the Divine Ice Crystals after inspecting them.”

“Eh?” Huo Yuhao stared at Xuan Ziwen in shock. “Why?” Teacher Xuan had officially become a Class 9 soul engineer. Even though he had just broken through to Class 9, that was only because Xuan Ziwen had been restricted by his own soul power. In terms of his knowledge regarding soul tools and forging them, he was one of the best across the entire continent.

What use were rare metals that not even Teacher Xuan could use to forge, no matter how precious they were?

Xuan Ziwen laughed coldly and said, “That’s because the Divine Ice Crystals will continuously release intense chills when used. This chilly air is at least one hundred degrees below zero, and at such temperatures, not even I can complete the job, even though I’m already a Titled Douluo. Both engraving formation arrays and crafting tools require the utmost concentration, and not a single mistake can be made. How can I craft soul tools under such circumstances? This means that the Divine Ice Crystals are very good stuff, but you are the only one who can forge them into soul tools. That’s because you are the only one with an Ultimate Ice martial soul, so you’re not afraid of the cold exuded from that rare metal.”

Huo Yuhao’s expression froze, and only now did he understand what was meant by shooting himself in the foot. Wasn’t that right? Teacher Xuan’s words meant that he was probably the only one who could forge the Divine Ice Crystals into soul tools within the Tang Sect, and possibly within the entire Academy. Furthermore, such top-tier materials had to be used to forge top-tier soul tools, and that couldn’t be done without a lot of effort. He was still a Class 7 soul engineer in terms of forging soul tools. Teacher Xuan didn’t want him to leave, because he wanted Huo Yuhao to continue learning about forging soul tools from him!

“Teacher Xuan, since these Divine Ice Crystals will release very low temperatures during forging, will that affect its quality? If all the coldness within is released, it won’t have any value even if the forging is successful.” Huo Yuhao probed.

Xuan Ziwen continued, “You don’t have to worry about that, because I finished conducting experiments a long time ago. I have called the Divine Ice Crystal a top-tier rare metal; how could I take it so seriously if I couldn’t even resolve a problem like that? Divine Ice Crystals will release very low temperatures when struck from the outside, or when soul power is infused into them, but once those actions stop, the low temperatures will recede. This means that its own energies will be contained, and it will maintain its original state. The constant change in its temperature means there’s nothing I can do to it. Otherwise, I would have already attempted to forge soul tools with the metal. What do you have left to say?”

Huo Yuhao forced a laugh and said, “Can this wait until after I return?”

“No!” Xuan Ziwen said decisively. “You have been hanging around outside for so long, and you haven’t been paying much attention to forging soul tools or working hard as a soul engineer. You will lose your skills if this continues. Don’t think you can do what you like just because you’re talented. You are still young, but your future will be limited if your heart isn’t in the right place. It’s time for you to focus and curb your distractions. Therefore, I am not allowing you to go this time. You’ll stay in the Tang Sect and deal with its internal affairs as you learn about crafting soul tools with me.”

“Very wise, Teacher Xuan!” He Caitou boot-licked at an appropriate time.

Xuan Ziwen glared at him and said, “Don’t even try. He can’t go, and you can’t go, either. Yuhao is correct; now is the time to keep a low profile and accumulate our strength. We cannot expose our strength at crafting soul tools to the Sun Moon Empire. Furthermore, your development in forging soul tools has reached the standard of a Class 8 soul engineer, so you’d better stay at the Academy to learn more. I predict that once your soul power breaks through Rank 80, you will become a Class 8 soul engineer.”

He Caitou pulled a long face and said, “It’s not as easy as it seems! I’m only at Rank 75, Teacher Xuan.”

“You have to remain steady on your path,” Xuan Ziwen replied plainly. “Furthermore, I’ll be the only one left if you leave. Doesn’t that mean all the work is going to be piled onto me? You won’t be very useful even if you go, so you’d better stay here and do some work. You can go out and do whatever you want once our three soul engineer legions have been established. For now, you are going to do some hard labor for me.”

“I…” He Caitou dropped back into his seat. How could he dare displease Teacher Xuan? He was still hoping he’d guide him into becoming a Class 9 soul engineer!

Even though He Caitou was a little low-spirited because he hadn’t been going out, his individual cultivation, and his prowess with and understanding of soul tools, had been improving exponentially over the past year. His strength was a far cry from what it was back in the day. Therefore, he didn’t dare to retort, even though he was depressed!





Volume 34, Chapter 487.3: Huo Yuhao is Not Allowed to Go!


Bei Bei glanced at Huo Yuhao, still quite hesitant, as their operation’s chances of success would be greatly boosted if Huo Yuhao was present. However, Xuan Ziwen had given so much blood and sweat for the Tang Sect, not even he could speak out against his wishes.

Huo Yuhao suddenly said, “Teacher Xuan, what do I have to do so that you’ll let me go? Actually, I haven’t been slacking in recent days!”

Xuan Ziwen snickered and said, “You haven’t been slacking? Alright! It’s simple to prove that you haven’t been slacking. Soul engineers will use the soul engineers’ method; all you have to do is forge a Class 8 soul tool for me and show that you can use it. Only then will you prove to me that you haven’t been slacking. Furthermore, you have to be able to use it perfectly. Otherwise, you will stay inside the sect, and not even think about going anywhere! You can’t leave until you become a Soul Douluo AND you can forge a Class 8 soul tool. What do you think of my idea, sect leader?’

Bei Bei glanced at Xuan Ziwen, and then turned around to look at Huo Yuhao with a helpless expression. Bei Bei would have clapped his hands in applause for what Xuan Ziwen was doing if they weren’t heading out to rescue Xiao Ya. However, this operation was extremely dangerous, and everyone would be able to predict their opponents’ moves preemptively with Huo Yuhao around. But he couldn’t contradict Xuan Ziwen and lose him face, so he could only nod as he said, “I agree.”

Bei Bei thought to himself,

Little junior brother, oh, little junior brother. Make your own luck. Whose fault is it that you’ve been spending so much time outside, to the point where not even teacher Xuan can look on anymore? There’s nothing I can do to help you….

Huo Yuhao sighed and said, “Teacher Xuan, that’s too cruel. Can I forge a Class 7 soul tool instead?”

Xuan Ziwen grunted coldly and said, “Don’t think I’m unaware that you have long been a Class 7 soul engineer. Even though there aren’t many Class 7 soul tools you know how to forge, crafting one with your spiritual power is not a problem, not to mention wielding one. You are a Soul Sage, and using a Class 7 soul tool is a piece of cake. There’s no discussion. You have to forge a Class 8 soul tool.”

Huo Yuhao forced a laugh and said, “But, teacher Xuan, I haven’t even seen a Class 8 soul tool’s blueprint before! How can I do that?”

Xuan Ziwen snapped, “And you still have the cheek to tell me you haven’t been slacking?”

“Uh…” Huo Yuhao knew that he probably couldn’t get out of this. Teacher Xuan was extremely stubborn when he got serious, and nobody could say anything to change his mind. Huo Yuhao glanced at everyone else, and realized in exasperation that most of his companions seemed to be rejoicing in his misfortune. Nan Qiuqiu’s schadenfreude was most evident.

Why isn’t anyone helping me? Huo Yuhao was very aggrieved.

“Alright, teacher Xuan, I’ll try. Can you give me blueprints for a Class 8 soul tool? If I can craft one and use it, you have to let me participate in this expedition. Can you give me a few days, eldest senior brother?”

Bei Bei stared at him in surprise. “You’re really going to try, little junior brother?” A Class 8 soul tool?! Was that a joke? Before Xuan Ziwen had arrived in Shrek City, there were only a few soul engineers within Shrek Academy who could forge Class 8 soul tools. Among them was the teacher of Huo Yuhao and He Caitou, Fan Yu, along with Qian Duoduo, their vice-Dean. Not even the Valkyrie Douluo, Xian Lin’er, was that confident in accomplishing the task. In the end, Xian Lin’er’s main focus was as a soul master. She was the Soul Tool Department’s Dean back then more because she wanted to gain some dignity back from Yan Shaozhe.

Huo Yuhao was still so young! He was already struggling to craft a Class 7 soul tool back then, and it would be truly unbelievable if he could craft a Class 8 soul tool, just like that!

Bei Bei tilted his head and said, “You are very determined. If you want to try, then go for it. However, we will only wait three days for you, and then everyone will set off. I’ll arrange some of the sect’s various affairs within these three days, you should make use of your time.”

Since Bei Bei had approved Xuan Ziwen’s request, he had to consider how to lead his companions to rescue Tang Ya if Huo Yuhao wasn’t around. This was a serious matter, as they weren’t that clear about the situation at the front lines. He had to use these few days to gather some intelligence from the front so that he could study it.

Huo Yuhao was probably the person most adept at war and battle within the entire Tang Sect. No one else there had really participated in the war before, and even when they did, Huo Yuhao was the one commanding them. He Caitou and Huo Yuhao had participated in the Ultimate Soldier Plan before, but He Caitou was focused more on learning about support, mainly so that he could provide support for Huo Yuhao. Furthermore, He Caitou wasn’t going this time, either!

Huo Yuhao had a look of exasperation as he said, “Alright, three days, then. Teacher Xuan, please hurry and provide me with those blueprints. I will make that attempt now.”

Xuan Ziwen laughed. “You little rascal, now you know to polish your spear before battle. You have been wilding so much outside, now it’s time to sit down and focus. Go, let me see how you are going to craft a Class 8 soul tool. Oh, right, call me when you’re about to start crafting it. Don’t think you can smoke through this. Nobody can help you this time.”

“Do I look like someone who smokes through things?” Huo Yuhao retorted indignantly. However, his heart was pounding in his chest. The truth was that he had wanted to look for teacher Fan Yu, so that he could ask for his help. Huo Yuhao was confident that he would have no problem using a Class 8 soul tool.

Xuan Ziwen’s requirement of using a Class 8 soul tool perfectly meant that he wanted Huo Yuhao to unleash the soul tool’s full potential and strength. Huo Yuhao wouldn’t have been so confident back then, but everything was different now, because he actually had a cultivation rank that was worth eight soul rings! Even though he hadn’t obtained his eighth soul ring, using a Class 8 soul tool wouldn’t be a problem!

Seems like I can’t take any shortcuts anymore,

Huo Yuhao heaved a sigh inside. Since that’s the case, then I’ll just work hard at giving it a try. Teacher Xuan still doesn’t know that I have a spiritual soul core, and I have improved a lot at controlling the more delicate and fine aspects of forging a soul tool. I might actually have a chance...

Xuan Ziwen had already handed over a stack of blueprints. A high-level soul tool couldn’t be detailed clearly with just one blueprint. The soul tool was split into its shell, formation arrays, how it was assembled, how it was activated, and other crucial components. Every blueprint detailed a component, and the soul engineer still had to assemble everything after forging those components, and experiment with it to ensure that the soul tool would be perfect.

Huo Yuhao’s face turned gray when he saw those blueprints. Xuan Ziwen was undoubtedly deliberately trying to make things difficult for him. There were more than thirty blueprints in this stack; not even a Class 8 soul tool should be so complicated.

Teacher Xuan is clearly certain and correct that I don’t have a Class 8 soul tool of my own, so he deliberately found one that is hard to forge and extremely complicated even among Class 8 soul tools for me. You’re so mean, Teacher Xuan!

Those were Huo Yuhao’s thoughts, but he wasn’t angry at all. Xuan Ziwen was doing this for his own good, and Huo Yuhao was very clear on that. He knew that it was about time for him to settle down and focus on studying and cultivation. However, they were going to rescue Tang Ya this time. How could he not participate?

No matter, I’m going to give everything in this attempt. It’ll be my fault if I really can’t complete this task.

Huo Yuhao took the blueprints and immediately turned to leave.

“Hey, Yuhao, what about me?” The Ice Bear King, Little Bai pointed at his own nose and asked.

Everyone had already noticed this fatso, but there was definitely no problem with him since Huo Yuhao was the one who had brought him back, so nobody asked any questions.

Huo Yuhao thought about it and said, “This is my friend, eldest senior brother. He will come with us to rescue teacher Xiao Ya. Can you arrange somewhere for him to stay? I will provide his food. I’m going to take my leave. Second senior brother, can you accompany me and help me prepare some materials?”

Huo Yuhao was part of the Tang Sect’s core, but he wasn’t very familiar with the Tang Sect’s Soul Tool Hall. The Soul Tool Hall had been continuously refurbished and renovated in recent months and years, and Huo Yuhao really didn’t know where to find the rare metals that he would need. In order to prevent Teacher Xuan from trapping him even more, Huo Yuhao decided to ask He Caitou for help.

He Caitou chortled as he stood up and accompanied Huo Yuhao out. The truth was that he really wanted to see how Huo Yuhao could forge a Class 8 soul tool. He Caitou had been working very hard over the past year, and could even provide some help when Xuan Ziwen was crafting Class 8 soul tools. However, He Caitou wasn’t confident at all in forging a Class 8 soul tool all by himself. After all, crafting a Class 8 soul tool was too delicate, and one needed formidable spiritual power and soul power for support. Furthermore, the materials needed for a Class 8 soul tool were very rare and precious. The more high-class and rare a material was, the more soul power expended in forging a soul tool. Many techniques in crafting Class 8 soul tools had to be completed in one go, and such a feat couldn’t possibly be done without sufficient soul power.

---

Huo Yuhao left with He Caitou, while Bei Bei and the others continued to discuss who would remain. He Caitou was definitely staying behind, while Na Na accepted Bei Bei’s order with a bitter look on her face. If Bei Bei wasn’t there, the Tang Sect would descend into chaos if their great butler wasn’t around.

Bei Bei felt that the Tang Sect needed someone to hold down the fort. Jing Ziyan decided to stay behind after their final discussions. As everyone’s strength increased, Jing Ziyan knew that her abilities were already lagging behind the Tang Sect’s prodigies, and she couldn’t do much to help even if she participated. She had become a Soul Emperor far earlier than many of the Tang Sect’s individuals, but among the Tang Sect’s Shrek’s Seven Monsters, almost everyone now either had seven soul rings, or were almost there, except for Wang Dong’er, who had gone missing while her soul power was only at Rank 67. Furthermore, her martial soul didn’t have any advantages, and thus she decided to stay behind so that she could actually contribute to the Tang Sect. She was one with her husband anyway, and even if she didn’t go, Ji Juechen would still definitely participate. The sword fanatic’s thirst for battle was far too strong.

Besides Jing Ziyan, Bei Bei decided after thorough consideration that he would bring along the rest of the Tang Sect’s core individuals. This operation was very important, and Huo Yuhao might not be able to participate. It was clear that their operation would fail if they didn’t have sufficient strength.





Volume 34, Chapter 488.1: Class 8 Decomposition Cannon


The final decision was for Bei Bei to take the leading role, while Xu Sanshi, Jiang Nannan, Xiao Xiao, Ji Juechen, Ye Guyi, and Nan Qiuqiu would all participate. Of course, Huo Yuhao would have a spot on the team if he could pass his test. However, nobody believed that he could actually do so.

Bei Bei and four others from Shrek’s Seven Monsters were part of this operation, excluding Huo Yuhao and He Caitou. With the addition of the sword fanatic, who was also a Soul Sage, along with Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu, who were two Soul Emperors with special martial souls, their overall strength was unprecedentedly powerful.

Of course, Bei Bei was very clear on the difference between having Huo Yuhao around and going on without him. Simply put, even if they encountered a Titled Douluo, Huo Yuhao would give them a chance to kill their opponent with their prowess. Without Huo Yuhao, the best they could do was protect themselves.

But Dean Yan and Elder Song, who were both Transcendent Douluo, would also participate in this expedition. Their chances were probably quite good.

Bei Bei began to prepare intricately after he decided who was to participate in this expedition. He had to make sure that the Tang Sect’s affairs were properly settled and arranged within the shortest possible time. At the same time, he had to make a trip to Shrek Academy’s Soul Tool Department to request Xian Lin’er and Qian Duoduo’s support, and so that the two Deans could help him temporarily look after the Tang Sect. With all that arranged, the Tang Sect wouldn’t run into any problems.

--------

Huo Yuhao didn’t have any energy to see how his eldest senior brother was arranging things; his thoughts were entirely occupied by how to forge a Class 8 soul tool.

There was only one set of blueprints, and he didn’t get to choose. Since he didn’t get to choose, then he had to rely on his own efforts!

Fortunately, he had He Caitou to help him. Even though he and He Caitou had clashed with each other for a chance to participate in this expedition, they were brothers after all, and how could He Caitou sit by and watch when his brother was in trouble?

The two entered one of the well-equipped silent rooms within the Soul Tool Hall. Huo Yuhao realized to his surprise that the silent room’s layout was very particular and exquisite. There was an extremely large platform for crafting soul tools in the middle, its surface silver-white, with all sorts of equipment and configurations around it. This seemed very similar to the one that he had used back in the Sun Moon Imperial Soul Engineering Academy... though this one was probably better, due to their being some equipment and configurations that even he didn’t know about!

There were many metal racks and frames around the silent room. These racks weren’t very pleasing to the eye, but they were very practical, because all sorts of rare metals were placed on them, coming in all shapes and sizes. Typically, the more precious a rare metal was, the smaller the pieces on the racks would be.

Forging soul tools would naturally be a lot more effective with a silent room like this one!

Huo Yuhao couldn’t be bothered with admiring the Soul Tool Hall’s current development as he walked up briskly before the table and laid out the blueprints that Xuan Ziwen had given him. He started to study them closely.

This was the first time that he had seen such detailed and comprehensive blueprints of a Class 8 soul tool, but this wasn’t the first time that He Caitou had seen such things.

He Caitou’s expression changed a little when he saw them. He couldn’t help but utter, “Teacher Xuan is cruel enough! Little junior brother, do you know what these blueprints are for?”

Huo Yuhao was still looking at the rare metals that this soul tool required, but he hurriedly turned his attention towards the name on the blueprints’ first page when he heard He Caitou’s words. Huo Yuhao’s expression also became extremely spectacular when he saw the name.

“Decomposition cannon!” The soul tool’s name was just two simple words, but Huo Yuhao drew a cold breath.

Of course he knew about decomposition cannons, as such soul tools had appeared in various classes. However, decomposition cannons of the lowest class were at least Class 6 soul tools!

A decomposition cannon was a single-target offensive soul tool. Its core principles included the element of space and making use of space’s pyrolytic properties to create formidable destructive power. Decomposition cannons were one of the hardest types of soul tools to forge, no matter which class they were in, and they were also considered one of the strongest single-target offensive soul tools within their respective classes.

That was the reason why He Caitou remarked that Teacher Xuan was cruel. He was indeed! Even Xuan Ziwen himself would have to put in some effort to forge a Class 8 decomposition cannon by himself. Furthermore, Huo Yuhao could vaguely remember that Xuan Ziwen had mentioned that Class 8 decomposition cannons were impractical and a waste of time. It had formidable attacking power, but forging one required too much effort, while the time and effort needed to forge such a cannon was enough to forge three other Class 8 soul tools. Even though the alternate soul tools would have weaker attacking strengths, the three of them added together would still be stronger overall than a single decomposition cannon.

Yet, Teacher Xuan has chosen to use this decomposition cannon to stump me. Teacher Xuan, oh, Teacher Xuan, you are too cruel...

Huo Yuhao wanted to cry, but no tears would come. But what else could he do? There was nothing he could do against Teacher Xuan’s authority.

Huo Yuhao heaved a long sigh as he concentrated on studying those blueprints.

Huo Yuhao had to make sure he knew what rare metals these blueprints required before he could gather those resources. He couldn’t do anything more without sufficient materials, or everything else wouldn’t matter, and he wouldn’t even have a chance to attempt this feat. What else was there to talk about?

Fortunately, Xuan Ziwen just wanted to see what Huo Yuhao could do after slacking for so long. Therefore, there were no problems with resources, even though he deliberately chose a difficult Class 8 soul tool to pin him down.

Shrek Academy had been receiving support from the Douluo Continent’s three native empires in secret. They didn’t have that many rare metals, but they could be considered well-stocked. Even though their inventory couldn’t compare to the Sun Moon Empire’s scale, the three empires’ combined national strengths were sufficient to support all kinds of research and soul tool production.

Huo Yuhao used one hour to gather all the materials that he required with He Caitou’s help, and only then did he begin perusing the blueprints for forging this soul tool. His expression quickly changed after just one look.

So complicated, this is just too complicated! Teacher Xuan, you’re asking for my life!

Huo Yuhao felt like he couldn’t take it anymore after going through the blueprints for a little while. Twenty-four plans out of the thirty were for designing the formation arrays. Huo Yuhao wouldn’t complain if twenty-four formation arrays were needed, because that was just a quantitative problem. He wouldn’t have any trouble with that with his speed at crafting soul tools.

The problem was that these twenty-four pieces actually depicted just three formation arrays! That meant that every formation array had eight components on average, which meant... every formation array was as complicated as one could get! These weren’t simple two-dimensional pictures; they were all three-dimensional, and they even breached topics of four-dimensional spatial features.

For instance, the most important formation array hovered within the soul tool. This was the first time that Huo Yuhao had even heard of a formation array being used that way, not to mention never having seen one.

Huo Yuhao felt like he didn’t know where to start.

A Class 8 soul tool. It really is a Class 8 soul tool, after all!

Huo Yuhao heaved a long sigh. Does heaven want to punish me?

Huo Yuhao began to scrutinize those blueprints after momentary sighs and laments. He was never one to admit defeat just like that, and he had a defiant personality that made him stronger the more suffering he took.

Huo Yuhao quickly immersed himself in his studies. He wasn’t quick to attempt to forge the soul tool, he just studied and interpreted the blueprints intently.

From Huo Yuhao’s perspective, forging wasn’t too difficult. Forging a Class 8 soul tool shouldn’t be too difficult with his current soul power. That was especially true with the support from his formidable spiritual power. With his spiritual soul core, Huo Yuhao was confident that his spiritual power wasn’t inferior to even a Class 9 soul engineer.

The crucial problem lay in understanding this soul tool’s principles and its forging method before he could get any work started.

He Caitou was still watching from one side in the beginning, but he quickly realized that Huo Yuhao had been completely absorbed into the blueprints. He Caitou was also staring at the blueprints seriously from the side, and even though these blueprints were so complicated that he wanted to vomit blood, they were still invaluable treasures to soul engineers like them! Not every soul engineer could obtain blueprints of such top-tier soul tools, and that was especially true for the Douluo Continent’s three original empires. Top-tier soul tool blueprints were considered extremely rare.

However, He Caitou felt like he couldn’t keep going anymore after studying them for a short while. The Class 8 decomposition cannon’s blueprints were absolutely the most complicated ones of any of the Class 8 blueprints he had seen before. Furthermore, they weren’t just complicated. He Caitou felt like his head was spinning after just looking at those three-dimensional blueprints for a short while.

He Caitou knew that he was lacking in spiritual power. Even though he was already working very hard, he knew that his spiritual power could only catch up after his soul power passed Rank 85 and then allow him to consider these blueprints.

He stole a glance at Huo Yuhao, and discovered that Huo Yuhao was very seriously studying them, but didn’t seem like he was completely lost. He Caitou couldn’t help but feel a tinge of admiration and envy.

Little junior brother’s spiritual power is truly admirable!

Soul engineers were more reliant on spiritual power in some ways than soul masters, and that was ever more the case as soul engineers became stronger.

-----------------

Time continued to pass. He Caitou accompanied Huo Yuhao for another two hours inside the silent room before he left quietly, as he knew that he could no longer help. He didn’t know how much time would pass before Huo Yuhao would awaken from his contemplation.

He Caitou left quietly, and informed the Tang Sect’s other members that nobody was to disturb Huo Yuhao.

A full day passed in the blink of an eye, and Huo Yuhao had been inside the silent room from the beginning to the end. He Caitou came to visit him twice discreetly, and Xuan Ziwen even came by to see Huo Yuhao once. However, Huo Yuhao didn’t speak, and neither did he move as he stared at those blueprints, like his entire being was completely immersed in them.

He Caitou sighed in exasperation, while Xuan Ziwen was feeling happy inside. Of course, he knew how difficult it was to forge a Class 8 decomposition cannon. This challenge was meant to deliberately stump Huo Yuhao, after all.

Xuan Ziwen was clear that becoming a Class 9 soul engineer was his own limit, given his talents. That wasn’t because his abilities at research weren’t enough, but because he didn’t have enough soul power. He couldn’t possibly become a Transcendent Douluo in the future, and even if he could become a Transcendent Douluo, he wouldn’t have a chance to try to become a Class 10 soul engineer in the future.





Volume 34, Chapter 488.2: Class 8 Decomposition Cannon


Therefore, even though he had become a Class 9 soul engineer, his understanding about soul tools was far deeper than before. He came to realize how important Huo Yuhao was as a prodigy, and that only Huo Yuhao could carry on his legacy and work towards breaking through and becoming a Class 10 soul engineer. Therefore, Xuan Ziwen had given some deep thought to this, and decided that he had to find some way to convince Huo Yuhao no matter what to properly learn about forging soul tools from him. Under such circumstances, he needed Huo Yuhao to remain. Otherwise, wouldn’t his intentions just be empty thoughts?

Xuan Ziwen wouldn’t be surprised if Huo Yuhao couldn’t complete the decomposition cannon, but he didn’t want to see Huo Yuhao not have any solutions at all. From what he could see, if Huo Yuhao could at least immerse himself within those blueprints, he would definitely gain some understanding of them. That was enough for him.

Huo Yuhao was a youngster who had just become a Class 7 soul engineer. What else could Xuan Ziwen expect from him, wanting Huo Yuhao to understand a Class 8 decomposition cannon, which had a complexity that came close to a Class 9 soul tool? As long as Xuan Ziwen could guide him, and with his continuously improving cultivation, Huo Yuhao wouldn’t need more than one or two years before he could become a Class 8 soul engineer!

Xuan Ziwen was very clear about Huo Yuhao’s talents. This fellow was just too talented. Not only was he intelligent, but he also had formidable spiritual power supporting him, and so had a much easier time forging soul tools than other soul engineers.

------------

On the second day, Huo Yuhao still hadn’t moved or spoken, neither had he eaten or had anything to drink. He Caitou was starting to get worried, and he conveyed what he saw to Bei Bei. Bei Bei personally spoke with Xuan Ziwen, and wanted to interrupt Huo Yuhao so that he could stop, but Xuan Ziwen stopped him.

Xuan Ziwen stopped Bei Bei irritably. From his perspective, Huo Yuhao was like a qualified soul engineer in his current state. He was more than eager for Huo Yuhao to continue being in such a state. “What? Stop? What kind of joke is this? Do you know how difficult it is for a soul engineer to be so immersed in his own studies? He can only truly experience the beauty of soul tools if he is frequently immersed in them and experiencing revelations from them; only then can he improve quickly. Not to mention two days, with that body of his he can spend half a month not eating or drinking without a problem. The deal has been struck, anyway; you guys will wait three days for him. If he doesn’t come to after three days, you guys can just leave without him.”

Bei Bei couldn’t convince Xuan Ziwen, so he had no choice but to allow He Caitou to continue sending food and water to Huo Yuhao.

But Huo Yuhao paid no attention to any of that. His eyes didn’t shift away from those blueprints. He Caitou once observed Huo Yuhao closely for a little while, as he was afraid that Huo Yuhao was in a daze from scrutinizing those blueprints, but he quickly realized that Huo Yuhao was completely fine.

The reason was because Huo Yuhao’s expression was changing throughout the process. Sometimes he would frown, and sometimes he would express pleasant joy. There was a time when Huo Yuhao even slammed the table with his hand, startling He Caitou.

It was evident that Huo Yuhao was just immersed in his own research, and there was nothing wrong with him.

--------------

Two days went by while Huo Yuhao was like that. The third day quickly arrived.

Bei Bei had already made all the necessary arrangements for the Tang Sect. Xian Lin’er and Qian Duoduo, their two Deans, had agreed to his request to take care of the Tang Sect, and they told Bei Bei to complete his task with assurance. However, Elder Xuan had also given them a time limit; everyone had to come back within one month, whether or not they could rescue Tang Ya. The Tang Sect needed them, after all, and the Tang Sect’s development was related to their resistance against the Sun Moon Empire in the future.

“The third day is coming, and little junior brother seems like he won’t be coming with us,” Bei Bei said to Xu Sanshi helplessly.

They were about to depart the next day, so they made some final preparations.

Xu Sanshi pulled a long face and replied, “I wonder why teacher Xuan is so determined this time. I’m honestly not confident at all without little junior brother around! I didn’t feel that way last time, since he has always been the one planning strategies and whatnot. We’re about to go onto the battlefield by ourselves this time, and I am a little lost about where to start.”

Bei Bei couldn’t help but laugh. “Seems like we have to train a little. Otherwise, won’t we become laughingstocks?”

Xu Sanshi snapped, “Don’t bite off more than you can chew. Who will be the main control-type soul master without Yuhao? You, or me? Or who else? Not even sister Ziyan is going, and Ziyan can still be considered a half control-type soul master. Seems like Xiao Xiao has to take this role, but her control only works within a small area of effect, and when the battle is spread out over a larger area, she probably can’t keep everything under control. Bei Bei, why don’t we look for Teacher Xuan to convince him to let Yuhao go this time? He’ll learn properly when he gets back.”

Bei Bei sighed and said, “I know how important little junior brother is. However, Teacher Xuan’s attitude is very resolute. You know that the Tang Sect couldn’t have developed so quickly in recent months and years without him, and we couldn’t have had so much support from the Academy. Teacher Xuan doesn’t typically ask anything of us, so I can’t reject his request this time, since he is so determined. Furthermore, he usually has a casual personality, but he’s very stubborn once he’s decided on something. I’ll only infuriate him if I look for him again. Forget it, let’s just work hard by ourselves. I don’t think we’ll have too much trouble rescuing Xiao Ya with Elder Song and Dean Yan around.”

“I guess that’s all we can do,” Xu Sanshi replied in exasperation. “Alright, I’m going back.”

Xu Sanshi stood up as he finished, when a voice suddenly erupted from outside. “Done, he’s done!”

Both Xu Sanshi and Bei Bei were momentarily stunned as He Caitou charged in from outside with an excited look on his face.

“What’s done?” Xu Sanshi asked in confusion.

He Caitou said excitedly, “Little junior brother is done going through the blueprints, and he’s starting to forge the soul tool. He’s asked me to look for Teacher Xuan. I’m here to relay this good news before calling him.”

Xu Sanshi shook his head helplessly and said, “Are you alright, second senior brother? Are you saying that he will succeed after he’s done going through the blueprints? Won’t that make becoming a Class 8 soul engineer too easy? You can go look for Teacher Xuan.”

“Yes! He might not succeed at forging the soul tool, even though he’s done with the blueprints,” He Caitou forced a laugh as he slapped his forehead. “I just watched little junior brother stare at blueprints for three days, and my thoughts went sideways that he would definitely succeed when I saw that he was finally getting down to crafting it.”

Bei Bei smiled and said, “There’s nothing sideways about that. Little junior brother might actually succeed. Isn’t he very adept at creating miracles?”

He Caitou nodded and said, “I also think there’s hope. Soul engineers have to understand a soul tool’s principles before forging it, and they have to figure out a soul tool’s blueprints that they’ve never seen before, just like he has. Little junior brother has been going through the plans for almost three days, and he’s finally getting to work. Perhaps he’s doing it because he’s out of time, or perhaps he has really understood them! I’m leaning towards the latter, as little junior brother never does things without thinking.

“He will only have a chance at forging the soul tool if he understood those blueprints. Even if he isn’t yet a Soul Douluo, he has twin martial souls, so his soul power is stronger than most other soul masters at the same rank. Maybe he really can do it, and his spiritual power is just so formidable…

“Alright, I’m going to look for Teacher Xuan, and you guys can go take a look if you’re interested. Let’s cheer little junior brother on together, and hope that he’ll succeed!” He Caitou ran out excitedly after his speech to notify Xuan Ziwen.

Bei Bei and Xu Sanshi exchanged a look, and they uttered at almost the same time, “Let’s go!”

-------

Huo Yuhao was done with the blueprints, but he didn’t start forging immediately. Instead, he drank some water, but didn’t eat anything as he sat down with his legs crossed while he began to meditate.

Huo Yuhao had spent almost three days on these blueprints, and had consumed a lot of energy doing that. How could he craft a Class 8 soul tool without his energy in perfect condition? This was his first attempt!

Huo Yuhao was still meditating when Xuan Ziwen, Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi, and He Caitou slipped into the silent room, and seemed to be deep in meditation.

Everyone besides Xuan Ziwen was a little stunned when they saw what he was doing. Xuan Ziwen nodded instead and said, “That’s good, he still knows that he should regain his energy before making this attempt. Seems like he’s very confident! Let’s wait and see.”

Waiting around was typically very torturous. At least, that was the case for most people, but Huo Yuhao quickly gave them a reason to remove that torturous feeling, because something was happening to his body.

Huo Yuhao only had faint soul power undulations before, but as time continued to pass, those undulations started to change. Furthermore, those changes were extremely weird.

Faint gold colors began to emanate from inside his body. That was very normal for most people, as they would think that it was just his soul power visible externally. Most people could reach this state when they were without worries and didn’t need anyone to protect them.

However, Huo Yuhao’s aura was just so dominating. A terrifying aura resembling that of an ancient awakening beast rippled out from his body as the faint golden light continued to flow out in waves. Everyone inside the silent room, including Xuajn Ziwen, began to felt a little stifled, and found it difficult to breathe.

“Is he using Imitation while he’s meditating?” Xuan Ziwen snapped.

“I don’t think so,” Bei Bei’s expression was solemn. He was well-aware of Huo Yuhao’s abilities, and they were inside the Tang Sect. Why would he be using soul skills while he was meditating? But... what was going on with that golden light that was emanating from his body?





Volume 34, Chapter 488.3: Class 8 Decomposition Cannon


Huo Yuhao quickly gave his answer as fine, compact scales began to appear on his skin. These scales were diamond-shaped, and even appeared three-dimensional, as the center of every scale protruded up. Under such circumstances, there were many reflections off the surface of these scales, and they made the faint golden light radiating from his body even more brilliant and eye-catching. Huo Yuhao’s formidable aura continued to rise, and every instant gave everyone a kind of frightening pressure.

“If we weren’t so used to spending so much time with this fellow, we’d probably think he’s a savage beast in human form!” Xu Sanshi exclaimed in admiration.

It didn’t take long before Huo Yuhao’s beastly aura finally stabilized. Everyone heaved a sigh of relief at the same time. At least they didn’t have to channel soul power to resist that tremendous pressure anymore. But their eyes quickly widened, because a strange black whirlpool gradually appeared between Huo Yuhao’s eyebrows. Everyone felt their spiritual seas quiver when that whirlpool appeared, and a hurricane of formidable spiritual power was immediately unleashed from within it.

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power was released for just an instant, but that instant sent everyone stumbling backwards uncontrollably.

His spiritual power was released and withdrawn in a single instant, but it was released again in the next moment.

“I can’t handle it anymore. I’ll step out for a little while.” Xu Sanshi turned and left the silent room with a stifled look on his face.

Bei Bei and the others also walked out with strange expressions on their faces. Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power was too strange, and under such circumstances, they were continuously sustaining spiritual shocks. It was more painful than being in a fight, because they couldn’t fight against it, as resisting would likely create feedback shocks to Huo Yuhao.

The only person who didn’t leave was Teacher Xuan, who was already a Class 9 soul engineer.

Xuan Ziwen stared at Huo Yuhao with his eyes wide, and his mouth hung slightly agape as a look of disbelief filled his eyes.

That… what is that whirlpool?

The others in the Tang Sect didn’t know, because they weren’t at that level yet, but Xuan Ziwen was!

Shrek Academy had wanted to express their gratitude for his contributions to the Soul Tool Department, and several Transcendent Douluo had personally helped him form his soul core. Even though his foundations weren’t very secure, as he barely became a Titled Douluo, and he might be stuck at Rank 91 for his entire life, Xuan Ziwen could have spent his entire lifetime without becoming a Titled Douluo otherwise, given his foundations. If he couldn’t do that, he couldn’t become a Class 9 soul engineer.

He knew how difficult it was to form a soul core because he had done it himself. Back then, he felt as if he had died, and he remembered very deeply about how powerful and frightening a soul core was.

But what was he looking at now? The center of Huo Yuhao’s brow was filled with formidable spiritual power undulations, releasing and withdrawing spiritual power along with his breathing. It seemed like a soul core!

But how’s that possible? He’s just a Soul Sage, so how can he have a soul core? It was very difficult for me to form my own soul core when I was breaking through to become a Titled Douluo. Wouldn’t he have a much harder time forming a soul core as a Soul Sage?

But judging from the spiritual undulations that are coming from the center of his brow, that is a soul core! Gods! Will this fellow give me a very pleasant surprise? No, that’s not possible. Even if his spiritual power is strong enough, he can’t possibly finish forging a Class 8 soul tool like this one. Forging soul tools requires more than just great soul power. A soul engineer also needs powerful soul power to support him. Otherwise, the soul engineer will find it very difficult to complete everything in one go. He also has to be able to use a Class 8 soul tool perfectly in our deal, and a decomposition cannon expends a lot of soul power.

Xuan Ziwen gradually calmed down as he finished thinking. However, when he felt Huo Yuhao’s spiritual undulations and the undulations from his own soul core, he still discovered some differences. At least, what made him more gratified was that Huo Yuhao’s

thing that was similar to a soul core couldn’t compare to his own soul core in terms of overall strength.

Then that is definitely not a soul core. Yes, doesn’t he have that Eye of Destiny? Maybe this is his Eye of Destiny’s unique appearance.

Xuan Ziwen continued to console himself. He had never heard of a Titled Douluo who could establish a soul core in his glabella!

Xuan Ziwen finally turned and left as well. Staying in the silent room and continuously resisting Huo Yuhao’s sporadically appearing spiritual power wasn’t comfortable at all.

---

Everyone was still waiting outside when he came out of the room. Huo Yuhao was still meditating, so they naturally stayed to protect their junior brother.

“Teacher Xuan, don’t you think Yuhao’s aura is a little strange? Why do I not remember him having such formidable spiritual power before? Can it be that he has run into another miracle in the time he’s spent outside?” Xu Sanshi asked curiously.

He Caitou was deep in thought as he nodded and said, “Yes, I don’t remember his spiritual power being that strongl. Furthermore, his soul power seems to have changed. I have no idea where that aura that resembles a Savage Beast comes from, and the golden light radiating from his body doesn’t seem to be coming from his soul power. It goes from in to out, and I don’t know what’s going on. It’s like he himself has turned golden.”

Xuan Ziwen shook his head and said, “I’m a soul engineer, not a soul master. You have to bring these questions to the Titled Douluo in Shrek Academy. Anyway, I don’t care what he’s doing, he’s not leaving unless he can forge a Class 8 soul tool.”

Bei Bei and Xu Sanshi exchanged helpless looks. They still wanted to try to convince Xuan Ziwen, but it seemed like they should dispel that thought to prevent the bitterness of being rejected.

Huo Yuhao meditated for a shorter time than everyone imagined he would. Two hours later, the soul power undulations from inside the room gradually receded, and a gentle hum that resembled a dragon’s roar was heard.

“This fellow. If he’s done, then he’s done. Why is he calling out?” Xu Sanshi laughed as he chided, and was the first back inside the silent room.

However, he realized something was wrong once he went back in, because Huo Yuhao was still sitting there with his legs crossed and his mouth closed. The dragon hum from his body was still resonating, but the sound seemed to come from his chest. The dragon hum was faint, and it seemed to form a feedback loop with his soul power as it resonated.

What’s happening?

Xu Sanshi turned around and glanced at Bei Bei. Bei Bei had a dragon-type martial soul, and if he didn’t know, Bei Bei should know.

However, Bei Bei’s expression showed the same astonishment. It was obvious that he couldn’t understand anything that was happening with Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao was startled when he gradually opened his eyes. His senior brothers and sisters were all here, and even Ji Juechen, the sword maniac, was here.

Ji Juechen almost wasn’t in time, but Jing Ziyan immediately ran to call him when she witnessed the strange things happening to Huo Yuhao. Ji Juechen was very interested in and curious about any kind of special circumstances, especially when they were happening to Huo Yuhao. Therefore, he hurried over as quickly as possible. But he couldn’t understand anything that was happening, either.

“You’re all here, eldest senior brother?” Huo Yuhao sprang to his feet.

Huo Yuhao was completely reinvigorated, and back in his peak condition after more than two hours of meditation.

At his current cultivation rank, not eating for a few days wasn’t a big deal. Furthermore, he possessed immense energy from the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence, enough to sustain his energy expenditure. Even if he didn’t meditate, his soul power would be continuously rising, as his spiritual soul core’s greatest benefit was that it helped a soul master cultivate all the time.

Xuan Ziwen took a few steps forward and came before Huo Yuhao. “Alright, there’s not much time left, and nighttime has come. If you haven’t forged the decomposition cannon before daybreak, then you will stay here with me.”

Even though he suspected that Huo Yuhao already had his own soul core, now wasn’t the time to ask him. Xuan Ziwen was going to wait for him to stay before asking him. From his perspective, Huo Yuhao couldn’t possibly forge a Class 8 soul tool, no matter how prodigious he was.

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “You’re very cruel, Teacher Xuan. You didn’t have to give me such a complicated one, even if you want me to forge a Class 8 soul tool. This soul tool breaches knowledge about space, and you would have stumped me if I hadn’t gained some understanding of spatial power in recent weeks.”

“What? You understand something about spatial power?” Xuan Ziwen’s expression was full of disregard. “Do you know what spatial power is? That’s something that only Titled Douluo or stronger individuals are worthy of studying. You little rascal, hurry up if you’re going to do it, and stop delaying. I will be watching from the beginning to the end, so nobody can help you cheat.”

Huo Yuhao chuckled and said, “I don’t need to cheat. Even though I’m not that confident, I’m still going to try. Let me warm up.”

He walked behind the working platform as he spoke.

Huo Yuhao’s expression immediately calmed down as he entered the are around the working platform, and even his aura seemed to become cool and calm. Xuan Ziwen was very satisfied about that point. Even though his prized student hadn’t been conducting any research into soul tools or forging them in recent months, he didn’t throw away too much regarding forging soul tools. At the very least, Huo Yuhao’s theory and concepts were still sound.

Huo Yuhao was just standing there quietly, and he was silent for about thirty seconds as he adjusted his breathing, heart rate, soul power undulations, and even his spiritual power. He allowed every inch of his aura to enter a certain rhythm.

Xuan Ziwen still had a scornful look on his face in the beginning, but his expression quickly gave way to one of surprise, because Huo Yuhao’s current state was too similar to that of a very powerful soul engineer!





Volume 34, Chapter 489.1: The Eighteen Ice Needles


Adjusting one’s breathing and spiritual power are things I did not teach him before! How did he manage to do it?

Xuan Ziwen was puzzled as he watched Huo Yuhao. Right now, he was more and more interested in learning how his student managed to achieve such a standard.

At that moment, Huo Yuhao moved. He wasn’t quick. He casually grabbed a piece of rare metal and placed it in a mold. After that, he lifted a forging hammer and started to hammer the piece of rare metal.

Is he making the outer shell first? Xuan Ziwen had a skeptical look on his face.

For a soul engineer, the core formation should always be produced first when making a soul tool. This was because creating the outer shell of even an advanced-tier soul tool wasn’t very difficult. The real difficulty lay in the core formation.

However, Huo Yuhao wanted to manufacture the outer shell first. What was he doing?

In fact, he had thought too highly of Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao only chose to make the outer shell first for one reason. He was too raw!

He had not seriously manufactured a soul tool for a long time! The last time he did so was during the tournament in Radiant City. Even though he had managed to understand the blueprint over the past two days, what if he made a mistake while starting with the core formation? He had to practice first and get used to the feeling of making a soul tool, so this was what he did.

A slight error when making the outer shell could be rectified. However, the core formation would become useless with even the slightest problem. He would then have to start over again, which was a waste of resources.

Huo Yuhao didn’t want that to happen. This was why he started with the outer shell first to get back into the feeling of making soul tools.

Ding, ding, ding…

A series of clear sounds echoed out. At the start, Huo Yuhao was still rather slow. However, he gradually picked up speed.

This was because the rare metal in front of him was very clear. Every minor detail on it was under his perusal. Under such circumstances, he didn’t need to think too much. In addition, he felt that he was simply too slow, given how strong his spiritual power was, so he naturally picked up speed. In others’ eyes, he actually looked pretty quick.

As he forged the metal, it sounded like raindrops were drumming rhythmically against banana leaves. Not only was it pleasant, but Huo Yuhao’s movements were also very delightful.

Xuan Ziwen nodded repeatedly as he watched Huo Yuhao’s movements. There were generally two ways to make the outer shell of a soul tool. In one, the metal could be directly punched after creating a mold. This would allow the metal to take shape in one go. This was more applicable for larger-scale soul tools. The second way was to use Huo Yuhao’s current method of forging the metal himself.

It was comparatively easy to forge the metal on the carving table, since there were all sorts of equipment he could turn to.

However, Huo Yuhao was so quick that Xuan Ziwen couldn’t achieve the same standard if he were in his place. What this required was stability and accuracy. At the same time, one’s observations had to be quick.

The inner parts of a piece of rare metal weren’t completely stable. This was applicable across all rare metals. Any changes to a rare metal had to be carefully observed while it was being forged, even if it was only for an outer shell. This allowed for the most effective use of rare metals.

Although Huo Yuhao was quick, he was accurate. Under his control, the lines on the metal were forged very neatly. From this, it was clear how sturdy his basic foundation was. Xuan Ziwen was originally very displeased with how lackluster Huo Yuhao was performing during this period of time, but this displeasure slowly faded away. No matter what, Huo Yuhao was a student that he had nurtured!

Very quickly, the first piece of the outer shell was created. It was time for the second piece.

With the first piece as experience, Huo Yuhao quickly adapted, and found it much easier with the second piece of the outer shell. Furthermore, the soul power undulations that he released from his body soon disappeared.

Oh? This kid is using his own strength to forge the metal? Won’t his muscles be sore?

Sore? Huo Yuhao felt as if he had the strength of a ten-thousand-year soul beast, even if he didn’t use his soul power. Ever since he had fused with Wang Qiu’er, his strength had grown significantly. More recently, he had even absorbed Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence and a Dragon Pill. With these two treasures, he felt like a human savage beast. When he fully absorbed all the medicinal power of the Dragon Pill, he would truly become a human Savage Beast.

Although rare metals were tough, he was already as strong as a Titled Douluo. This was nothing to him.

Very soon, Xuan Ziwen discovered that his worries were unfounded. Piece after piece of the outer shell was created by Huo Yuhao. Furthermore, he was also getting faster and faster. Giving up the use of his soul power had no effect on him at all. Occasionally, he even lifted his head to laugh. Even still, the forging hammer still landed very accurately on the rare metals before him.

A genius is a genius!,

Xuan Ziwen raved inside. From watching Huo Yuhao, he fully understood how a spiritual-type soul master always had an edge over ordinary soul masters with regards to creating and researching soul tools.

-------------

Huo Yuhao only took an hour to create the outer shell of a Class 8 decomposition cannon, which required more than forty external accessories.

Every part of the outer shell presented a beautiful streamlined design. Even with Xuan Ziwen’s strict standards, there were no flaws at all.

After completing the outer shell, Huo Yuhao moved slightly, and started to move the pieces of the soul tool on the carving table.

Everyone knew that he was about to start on the core formation, which was the most important part of a soul tool.

It was obvious how complex the core formation of a Class 8 soul tool was. Moreover, this was Huo Yuhao’s first attempt at a Class 8 soul tool! Even Xuan Ziwen wasn’t confident about his chances, so everyone around also didn’t think that he would succeed.

However, Huo Yuhao was very composed right now. His expression was very calm, and there was even a confident smile on his face. This baffled those watching. They knew Huo Yuhao very well, and knew that he was great at creating miracles. This was the reason why they were willing to wait here and witness the birth of a miracle.

Xuan Ziwen only stood there quietly and watched. He wasn’t rushing Huo Yuhao, only waiting for him to do his stuff.

Huo Yuhao retrieved a piece of rare metal and focused. At the same time, he lifted his right hand and made a grabbing gesture toward that piece of rare metal. His eyes also turned a dim gold.

His gentle spiritual power was like a lady’s hand, landing gently on that piece of rare metal. To others, Huo Yuhao was only unleashing his spiritual power. However, Huo Yuhao could clearly sense that the piece of rare metal started to show closely-woven lines. These lines were the blueprint that he had memorized.

Even though he had long since memorized the blueprint, he still carefully projected it on the rare metal using his spiritual power to ensure that things went smoothly.

He didn’t use the carving knife on the table. Each of the fingertips of his right hand now had dark gold blades at the end of them. Weren’t those his Darkgolden Terrorclaws?

However, he didn’t fully unleash his Darkgolden Terrorclaws, only revealing an inch of them. In this way, he could achieve the same effects as using a carving knife. His Darkgolden Terrorclaws could compare to most of the carving knives on the carving knife leaderboard.

It wasn’t that Huo Yuhao didn’t want to use his Life Guardian Blade, but it had grown too large. It was no longer in the shape of a carving knife. It wouldn’t be very smooth using it.

His five fingers gently tapped the rare metal before his wrist started moving. Suddenly, everyone saw a dark-golden light flash before five slivers of rare metal slipped off the original piece.

Carving using five blades simultaneously?

He Caitou opened his eyes wide. Even Xuan Ziwen was stunned.

Huo Yuhao’s five fingers started to move gently and rhythmically. It was like he was gently caressing the rare metal. Slivers continued to fall from the piece he was working on. The outer layer was soon being carved out. Huo Yuhao’s actions weren’t quick, but He Caitou and Xuan Ziwen both knew that his carving method was much faster than the traditional method of carving a core formation.

The general shape of the core formation was soon carved out.

A smile soon surfaced on Xuan Ziwen’s face.

Huo Yuhao’s actions were shocking, but pleasing. However, he realized that Huo Yuhao’s actions weren’t that magical. During this carving process, Huo Yuhao had only carved the outer shape of the core formation. He hadn’t touched the most delicate part of it yet, only simplified the carving process of the outside. The true essence of the core formation would depend on how well he did later on. Furthermore, this was only one of the twenty-four core formations required.

The difficulty of creating this Class 8 soul tool lay in how to combine twenty-four core formations into three core formations. This required all twenty-four formations to be completely flawless throughout the entire process. During the combination of these formations, immense soul and spiritual power was needed as support before the entire process could be completed!





Volume 34, Chapter 489.2: The Eighteen Ice Needles


Huo Yuhao had indeed slowed down. He retracted his other four fingers before using his left hand to pick up the rare metal. Only his right index finger continued to make minor carvings on the metal. Even though he was still quick, he was now much slower than before.

Metal scraps continued to fall, and Huo Yuhao stayed extremely focused.

Even though it was only the first out of twenty-four core formations, it was still much more complex than the central core formations of many Class 7 soul tools. The more advanced the soul tool, the more difficult it was to make. It was just like soul masters and soul engineers: the higher the cultivation, the more difficult it was to achieve.

Xuan Ziwen felt a sense of nostalgia as he watched Huo Yuhao. Long ago, when he was still in the Sun Moon Empire, he had relied on making a Class 8 decomposition cannon to become the youngest Class 8 soul engineer in the Illustrious Virtue Hall. At the same time, he became their chief researcher!

He was really high-spirited back then. It was a pity that his power was so restricted in the Illustrious Virtue Hall. Eventually, he was poached by Huo Yuhao, and came to the Tang Sect.

However, Xuan Ziwen didn’t regret his choice at all. Ever since he had come to the Tang Sect, he had been shown respect. At the same time, the Tang Sect and Shrek Academy didn’t skimp on providing him with all types of resources. Otherwise, how could he have become a Class 9 soul engineer in such a short period of time?

Although Xuan Ziwen knew that he wasn’t inferior to anyone else in terms of soul tool research, he was also very aware that his foundation in terms of his soul power cultivation was very poor. Initially, he had relied on all sorts of medicine to become a Soul Douluo. Before he reached Class 9, he believed that anyone with seven rings in the Tang Sect could easily defeat him if he didn’t use a soul tool.

Normally, he was very busy with work, and didn’t even have time to think about daily matters. Now that he finally had the time to rest, all types of thoughts ran through his mind. However, he was still very fixated on Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao was going faster and faster. From his initial unfamiliarity, he slowly regained the feeling of making a soul tool. Even he himself was delighted and surprised by that.

This rare metal seemed to have been enlarged in his eyes. Even some very minor details were attended to under his meticulous observation.

At the start, he didn’t dare to use any carving techniques. However, as time passed, he found things much easier using his spiritual power as a guide.

Very soon, his first core formation had been completed. He carefully placed it on a corner of the carving table. He then picked up his second piece of rare metal and started to carve it.

Xuan Ziwen took a few steps forward and silently picked up that first core formation, carefully examining it. After a brief moment, he nodded and put it back in its original position.

This kid has indeed not been slacking.

This was the appraisal that Xuan Ziwen gave after seeing the core formation.

From the fact that Huo Yuhao could create a core formation in such a short period of time, it was evident that he was a qualified Class 7 soul engineer. He was even one of the more experienced ones.

Perhaps I should let him try one of the simpler Class 8 soul tools. He might successfully create them.

Of course, this was only an instantaneous thought passing through Xuan Ziwen’s mind.

Huo Yuhao was already getting faster and faster. The creation of the second core formation took only four-fifths of the time he needed to make the first one.

All twenty-four core formations were being built for the same goal. There were three groups of eight, and each group had their own similarities. Furthermore, they were also interlinked in some aspects.

------

Huo Yuhao took two hours to finish the first group of core formations. The eight formations were neatly arranged on the table.

Xuan Ziwen revealed a weird expression on his face when he saw this.

He could still clearly remember that he had taken a total of six days to finish creating a Class 8 decomposition cannon when he was still a Class 8 soul engineer. As for the first group of core formations, it had taken him three days.

They were the same core formations. The first group was the most difficult. It was only at the later stages that one could proceed faster as they grasped the technique.

This kid has actually succeeded? At least it doesn’t seem like he’s made a mistake. It’ll be even easier later on. Surely he hasn’t made a mistake, has he?

Xuan Ziwen wanted to remind Huo Yuhao that he could take a break halfway into making an advanced soul tool to recharge.

However, when he looked at Huo Yuhao, he immediately discovered that Huo Yuhao was very energetic. He didn’t seem the least bit tired at all!

He doesn’t need to rest, then, Xuan Ziwen thought to himself wickedly.

He turned around and walked out. He found that it was already dark outside. From the sky, it looked like it was six hours to daybreak.

Hmph, if he can’t finish before daybreak, it won’t count even if he succeeds in the end. Furthermore, so what if he succeeds? If it can’t be used, he’ll still lose.

Even Xuan Ziwen didn’t realize that his mentality had already changed. At the start, he had believed that Huo Yuhao was destined to fail. Right now, he was already starting to think of ways to keep Huo Yuhao behind. The change was quite gradual.

-----

Huo Yuhao naturally didn’t know what Xuan Ziwen was thinking. He was completely invested right now.

It was indeed much easier to complete the second group compared to the first group. However, he wasn’t complacent at all. He knew that any flaws could result in total failure.

This was a Class 8 soul tool. He needed to pour in soul power to link the components. If there were problems with the internal structure of the core formations, the entire formation would be disabled. When that happened, his efforts would be futile, and he would have wasted precious rare metals too. That was something he didn’t want to see.

---

One by one…

As Huo Yuhao did his work, he was also counting. As time passed, he felt that his movements were getting more and more fluid.

I’ve seemed to become better after not practicing! Hehe, Teacher Xuan should be rather astonished.

However, this thought only flashed across his mind before disappearing. He almost made a mistake from being just that slightly distracted.

In fact, his improvement from a lack of practice was an anomaly. As for the reason, it was because his cultivation had risen too quickly. Using his immense spiritual power as support and his originally sturdy foundation, he managed to remain error-free after immersing himself in the research of soul tools over the past few days.

No matter how complex the core formations of a Class 8 soul tool were, they were still core formations. What was needed was only more effort, soul power, and experience!

Huo Yuhao definitely sorely lacked experience. However, he had an advantage in the other aspects. The soul power of a soul master with twin martial souls was greater than most other soul masters of the same tier. Right now, Huo Yuhao’s soul power had only reached Rank 80, but he had the soul power of an ordinary Rank 85 Soul Douluo. This also meant that his actual cultivation wasn’t too far from a Titled Douluo. After all, he already had a soul core!

---

The second group was completed!

Huo Yuhao let out a long breath. After he finished his second group of core formations, he finally lifted his head and stretched his neck to relax.

“What time is it, eldest senior?” Huo Yuhao asked Bei Bei.

Bei Bei replied, “It’s only four more hours to daybreak.”

“Alright.” Huo Yuhao responded before he got to work once again.

The rest had already left to sleep. Only Bei Bei, Ji Juechen, Xuan Ziwen, and He Caitou remained in the room.

It was normal for He Caitou and Xuan Ziwen to remain behind. However, Ji Juechen caught everyone by surprise by staying as well. He didn’t say anything, and only stood where he was, like a target board, silently observing Huo Yuhao. There were undulations in his eyes, as if he were thinking of something.

The others didn’t disturb him. This Sword Fanatic had a different mindset from ordinary people. However, his cultivation speed didn’t lag behind those from Shrek’s Seven Monsters.

Right now, he was sparring less and less with the others. However, there was an obvious improvement every time he did so. In addition, he had identified one opponent, and kept going to that opponent. This relieved the pressure on many others. This person that he had identified was Xu Sanshi.

Ever since Xu Sanshi gained the Xuanwu Shield and fused with the Golden Tortoise, his abilities were on the rise. He had even beaten Ji Juechen. In addition, his defense was so strong that he was unafraid of Ji Juechen.

In the Tang Sect, Ji Juechen was known for having the strongest offense, while Xu Sanshi had the strongest defense. It was only right for the two of them to spar. Xu Sanshi generally avoided Ji Juechen, as he didn’t want to keep fighting him.

---

Huo Yuhao only took one hour to finish the second group of core formations. However, he slowed down on the third group. The third group of core formations was the most complex, and the requirements for precision were also much greater. There was one formation that was in the center of the entire formation. This formation was the smallest, but the most complex.

It was only the size of a cherry, but the patterns that had to be carved on it were very complex. There were easily two or three times more patterns in this one than there were in the others.

Huo Yuhao first completed the seven other formations in the third group before he started on this most complex formation.

He was very careful, and slowed himself down. The golden lights in his eyes were much brighter than before. He was afraid of making even the slightest error.

Xuan Ziwen silently watched at one side. He had a look of admiration by now. He didn’t know what to say about this student in front of him.





Volume 34, Chapter 489.3: The Eighteen Ice Needles


He Caitou was slumped at one side. Originally, he had thought that Huo Yuhao had wasted his learning on soul tools after more than a year of hard work, and that he would catch up to him because of that. However, it seemed like he hadn’t caught up. He even seemed to have lagged further behind. The gap between their talents couldn’t be closed so easily just with hard work!

However, his slump only lasted for an instant. He Caitou was also very tenacious. Even if he couldn’t catch up right now, that didn’t mean he would forever be behind. At a certain standard, persistence, luck, and intelligence all played very important roles.

Huo Yuhao suddenly stopped as he was halfway through carving his core formation. Xuan Ziwen was surprised. Although he really wanted Huo Yuhao to stay and learn more about soul tools with him, he also subtly hoped that Huo Yuhao would succeed.

Successfully creating an advanced-tier soul tool was a great confidence booster for a soul engineer. That was why he felt very conflicted right now.

It was very critical for a soul engineer to finish a core formation in one go. Stopping halfway was a recipe for disaster!

However, Xuan Ziwen saw Huo Yuhao’s Eye of Destiny slowly opening.

Rose-gold sun rays spread from the Eye of Destiny. Very soon, they covered his entire forehead. The spiritual undulations in the room suddenly became very strong. Whether it was He Caitou, Bei Bei, Xuan Ziwen or Ji Juechen, they could clearly sense that their spiritual seas had started to surge under the stimulation of that immense spiritual power.

His spiritual power is so strong! Is it really possible for a Soul Sage to possess such immense spiritual power?

Xuan Ziwen suddenly lifted his hand and shut his mouth. It was the only way he wouldn’t shout out.

He only took a glance at the Eye of Destiny before he saw the deep whirlpool within it. As he quickly shifted his gaze away, he was already shocked inside. If it was only a guess earlier, he was fully certain now.

Yes, Huo Yuhao has a soul core. It’s even a spiritual soul core. He only has seven rings, seven rings!!

Xuan Ziwen’s actions didn’t catch anyone else’s attention. This was because they also saw Huo Yuhao’s Eye of Destiny.

Ji Juechen’s reaction was the quickest. He had the strongest willpower. In his heart, there was only his sword and Jing Ziyan. There was nothing else. He quickly shut his eyes when he saw that Huo Yuhao’s expression wasn’t right. At the same time, he started to think about his sword intent. It helped him break free from the weird spiritual undulations.

Bei Bei was like Ji Juechen. Although he wasn’t as pure as Ji Juechen, his willpower was still very strong. Once he discovered that something was amiss, he immediately lifted his hand to cover his eyes. At the same time, he unleashed his Radiant Holy Dragon and circulated his soul power to protect his spiritual sea. He wasn’t too greatly affected.

Xuan Ziwen was a Titled Douluo. Although he was astonished, he was fine.

He Caitou was the only one who was in trouble.

He was originally astonished by Huo Yuhao’s soul engineering talents. When Huo Yuhao’s Eye of Destiny opened, he only felt dizzy before he was drawn in by Huo Yuhao’s soul core. He couldn’t shift his eyes away, and subconsciously took a step forward.

However, he discovered something was wrong after taking this step. He tried to shut his eyes, but he realized he couldn’t do so.

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power was simply too strong. Furthermore, his soul core was spinning at the greatest speed the moment he opened his Eye of Destiny because he was too focused. This was why He Caitou was so greatly affected.

Fortunately, there were others in the room.

Xuan Ziwen immediately rushed to He Caitou’s side and quickly covered his eyes. He then smacked He Caitou’s shoulder with his other hand.

He Caitou jolted awake from his astonishment. As he twisted his head to look at Xuan Ziwen, there was already a horrified look on his face.

Xuan Ziwen sighed and shook his head to signal He Caitou not to look at Huo Yuhao’s vertical eye.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao had already resumed carving. This time, he was visibly faster. Scraps of metal slipped off his fingernail. The small metal ball seemed to be dancing in his hands.

Can he really succeed?

No one knew the answer to this question, including Huo Yuhao himself.

However, that tiny metal ball kept on changing. The dense patterns on it increased and increased. At the very end, the entire metal ball was shaped like a fretwork, and strange soul power undulations gradually surfaced within it.

Xuan Ziwen took in a deep breath, before slowing letting it out. Long ago, he had used an entire day to finish this core formation. It was also then that he felt as if he had reached the peak of his abilities in terms of soul tool production.

He would never forget that feeling. But right now, Huo Yuhao proved to be in better shape than he was back then. Furthermore, he had seen the blueprint for less than three days. He didn’t have any prior experience or knowledge of how to create Class 8 soul tools!

------

Two more hours passed. Huo Yuhao finally slowed down, beads of perspiration falling off his forehead. However, he was still as focused as ever, and didn’t waver at all. His immense spiritual power ensured that he was still fully concentrated.

He’s about to finish it! Xuan Ziwen subconsciously clenched his fists.

Yes, I’m about to finish it!, Huo Yuhao said to himself.

He was only left with the final step, but it was a very difficult step to take. This last carving required him to twist his blade eighteen times consecutively in one go before the patterns could be engraved. This didn’t just require control of his spiritual power, but also strong soul power to support this motion, because this last carving was

inside the metal. He needed to condense his soul power into a thin needle to perform the carving. Even a needle-shaped tool wouldn’t work, because it wouldn’t be sharp enough. Also, the angle couldn’t be controlled as precisely as it could with his soul power.

The piece of rare metal in Huo Yuhao’s hand was very tough. He needed to carve it using his soul power, twist his ‘needle’ eighteen times consecutively, and do everything with the same magnitude of strength. Unless one was a Soul Douluo, all of these were almost impossible.

Xuan Ziwen had the urge to ask Huo Yuhao to stop right now and let him finish this final step. In this way, Huo Yuhao’s previous efforts wouldn’t be wasted. Otherwise, if he failed, it would deal a huge blow to him.

Just as he was hesitating, Huo Yuhao had already started.

His left thumb and index finger pressed gently against the core formation. Even though he only touched it with his fingertips, his grip was still very sturdy. He had also retracted his Darkgolden Terrorclaws. A small, jade-green needle-shaped light slowly appeared on his fingertip.

Ice needle!

Following this, Huo Yuhao moved his fingers. His body shone with jade-green light, while the ice needle that he had formed pierced into the core formation delicately. Under Huo Yuhao’s control, it started to twist.

The entire thing was a little raw. It wasn’t perfectly smooth. However, Huo Yuhao didn’t stop at all. His Eye of Destiny shone even brighter, illuminating his soul core.

He completed this eighteen-rotation carving. He didn’t even know some of the techniques, because he had never learned them before. How did he complete it? Using his own way, he drained twice the amount of soul power!

Xuan Ziwen was filled with questions and astonishment right now. He couldn’t believe that someone could be so talented.

However, whether he believed it or not, Huo Yuhao still continued. In addition, he was still pouring out his soul power at an even greater speed. The small core formation was already emitting a dim silver light. This was the result of pouring in his soul power. Moreover, it wasn’t his ice-type soul power, but his pure soul power. There weren’t any elements to this soul power.

This also meant that Huo Yuhao was multitasking right now.

Xuan Ziwen’s face was contorting. However, he was already numb in his heart. Was this a miracle? No, it wasn’t a miracle to him anymore. It was a complete wonder!

Whoosh!

They heard a light sound. Huo Yuhao’s jade-green ice needle brought out the last scrap of metal. The core formation had already been activated as Huo Yuhao poured in his soul power, and it now magically drifted in mid-air. There were tiny but obvious spatial cracks around the dim silver light. There were indeed spatial elements!

This most vital core formation had finally been completed. Huo Yuhao let out a long breath and held onto the carving table as he panted.

All twenty-four core formations had been completed, along with the outer shell of this soul tool. What Huo Yuhao had to do next was piece them all together before he was fully finished. Without a doubt, this assembly process would require greater soul power and technique. However, was he troubled?

Huo Yuhao lifted his head and smiled at Xuan Ziwen. “Teacher Xuan, do we still have time?”

Xuan Ziwen turned gloomy. “Cut the crap. Be serious.”

“Yes!” Huo Yuhao’s attitude was very positive, and he respectfully acknowledged Xuan Ziwen’s words. After that, he immediately began, and started to piece the components together.

Doesn’t he need to rest for a while?

His arms opened, and he raised them up. Suddenly, the other seven core formations in the third group all flew up and drifted in mid-air.





Volume 34, Chapter 490: I'm Rank 80


There was an invisible air current around Huo Yuhao’s arms guiding these pieces of metal.

“Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon,” Bei Bei muttered softly.

The seven pieces of metal slowly gathered. Under Huo Yuhao’s control, they were congregating towards the silver ball drifting in the air.

This works?

This time, Xuan Ziwen was watching with a learning attitude.

Of the three groups of core formations, this was the group that was the most difficult to form. The difficulty lay in the fact that the core formations had to be joined together as the soul master poured his soul power into them. There wasn’t any room for error at all.

Even if Xuan Ziwen could do it, he would still need some tools to complete it. But right now, Huo Yuhao was only using his own abilities. Wasn’t he afraid that his soul power was insufficient?

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual soul core spun quickly, and provided a large amount of soul and spiritual power to him. The seven core formations in the air were under his strict observation. He adjusted their positions and slowly but steadily brought them together.

When they were only an inch from the silver ball, Huo Yuhao stopped them, then poured his soul power into all of them at the same time. Immediately, these seven core formations brightened and emitted a gentle silver light. Huo Yuhao carefully controlled them as they combined.

With his Spiritual Detection in action, he didn’t need to worry about any errors.

Clang!

An apple-sized group of core formations was formed. Blinding silver light was rapidly sucking away Huo Yuhao’s soul power.

Among these eight core formations were energy-storing core formations. This Class 8 decomposition cannon had to maintain the circulation of soul power within it as a means of stabilizing its spatial power.

Xuan Ziwen was completely in a daze right now.

How did Huo Yuhao make this process seem so simple?

Huo Yuhao let out a long breath as he saw the silver metal ball drifting in front of him. “I’ve finally completed the critical step.”

Following up on this, he joined the other two groups of core formations. Since he had already assembled the most difficult set, the other two groups were naturally not a problem for him. The next step would be the installation process.

The dark sky slowly turned deep blue. Dawn was about to arrive. Huo Yuhao held the one and-a-half-meter Class 8 decomposition cannon that was shining with dim silver light as he stopped in front of Xuan Ziwen.

He has actually completed it.

Xuan Ziwen automatically took the cannon in his hands. He didn’t need to test it, he had personally watched Huo Yuhao create it. Even though he didn’t use a conventional method, he didn’t make any mistakes throughout the entire process.

Huo Yuhao pulled a chair over and sat down. “I’ve finally finished it within the time limit. Teacher Xuan, can I go this time?”

Xuan Ziwen used one hand to hold the cannon as he grabbed Huo Yuhao with his other hand, asking, “Yuhao, did you learn how to create soul tools from someone else?”

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly, “No! Didn’t you see how raw I was?”

Xuan Ziwen’s lips moved, “Raw? You call this raw? You managed to make a Class 8 soul tool after seeing the blueprint for only three days. It’s even a complex decomposition cannon. You dare to call this raw?”

Huo Yuhao was a little embarrassed. “Teacher Xuan, have you forgotten? I was able to make a soul tool above my class a long time ago! When I was a Class 5 soul engineer, I could already make a Class 6 soul tool. That’s why it’s really nothing much. My spiritual power is above average. I have a natural advantage when creating the core formations.”

Xuan Ziwen was a little speechless now. A genius indeed couldn’t be measured using common logic!

This kid has become a Class 8 soul engineer just like that? Isn’t this too ridiculous?

“No, you can’t go. I want you to remain and learn the basic knowledge of a Class 8 soul engineer under me. I have the confidence that you’ll become a Class 9 soul engineer as long as you can become a Titled Douluo in the future. Furthermore, what we really lack now is a talented soul engineer. No matter what, you can’t leave this time.”

“What?” Seeing how persistent Xuan Ziwen was, Huo Yuhao was completely annoyed now. “Teacher Xuan, you can’t go back on your word! Didn’t we agree? If I make this decomposition cannon, you’ll let me go. Don’t worry, I’ll be back within a month.”

Xuan Ziwen was adamant. “No. Do you know how precious one month is? If the war continues, do you know when the enemy will come? Furthermore, I’m not going back on my word. You haven’t finished this decomposition cannon. Don’t tell me that you can make this soul tool unleash its full strength, even though an eight-ringed Soul Douluo would find it difficult?”

Huo Yuhao’s expression turned weird as he looked at Xuan Ziwen.

Bei Bei patted his shoulder and said, “Yuhao, why don’t you stay behind? I’ve already arranged things on the other side.”

Huo Yuhao shook his head and said, “No, eldest senior. It would be fine if it were something else. But we’re going to save Teacher Xiao Ya this time. I have to go. Teacher Xuan, though I don’t wish to contradict you, I have to tell you that I can easily use this decomposition cannon if that means that I can participate in the mission.”

“Rascal, are you out of your mind? It’s already not easy for you to create a Class 8 soul tool. You still want to go above your class and try to use it? Creating it and using it are two different concepts.” Xuan Ziwen rambled on furiously.

Huo Yuhao sighed and said, “Teacher Xuan, my soul power is already at Rank 80. In addition, I have twin martial souls. I have a natural advantage in terms of the total amount of soul power I have. Additionally, the purity of my soul power and the recovery ability of my spiritual soul core means that I can even try a Class 9 soul tool.”

“What? Rank 80?” Xuan Ziwen wasn’t the only one who exclaimed this time. Bei Bei, He Caitou, and Ji Juechen all shouted out at the same time.

Huo Yuhao scratched his head and said, “When I got those Ice Divine Crystals, I inadvertently discovered some Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence. Only I can absorb it. That is why I made great progress. Oh, yes, eldest senior, I went to the Icefire Yin Yang Well and brought back some good stuff. I’ll share it with everyone later. The plant-type soul beasts in the well gave them to me. It’s the essence that they produced themselves. I believe it can help everyone’s cultivation.”

Bei Bei looked at Huo Yuhao before turning to Xuan Ziwen. He probed, “Teacher Xuan, surely Yuhao wasn’t slacking, right?”

Xuan Ziwen’s breathing had become a little unbalanced. “Slack your head!” After he finished speaking, he turned his head and left.

Just as Bei Bei and Huo Yuhao thought he was angry, Xuan Ziwen’s voice sounded back from outside. “One month, just one month. One month later, you’d better get back. Do you understand me? You won’t be able to leave then!”

“Yes, I understand!” Huo Yuhao was delighted. He knew that he had finally convinced Teacher Xuan.

Xuan Ziwen didn’t persist in asking Huo Yuhao to test the cannon, he believed Huo Yuhao wasn’t lying.

Rank 80? He’s already Rank 80 at his age? He must have set a record in Shrek Academy’s history.

Xuan Ziwen appeared to be furious as he left. However, he was actually quite delighted. Huo Yuhao’s foundation was there. He had full confidence that he could nurture Huo Yuhao into a true Class 8 soul engineer in the future.

“This matter is finally settled.” Huo Yuhao only wanted to sleep right now. He had drained a lot of his energy over the past three days and nights.

“Little junior, are you fine? If not, we can leave a day later,” Bei Bei asked concernedly.

Huo Yuhao shook his head and answered, “There’s no need for that, eldest senior. We can’t make Dean Yan and Elder Song wait for us. I’m fine. I’ll grab a bite later. I’ll take this time to meditate for two hours and eat just before we leave.”

Bei Bei was in a good mood, too. With Huo Yuhao around, he was more confident in their mission this time. This was especially true after he realized that Huo Yuhao’s soul power had reached Rank 80. It meant that the Tang Sect finally had a Soul Douluo, apart from Teacher Xuan!

“Little junior, keep the stuff that you brought back from the Icefire Yin Yang Well with you. There’s bound to be casualties because of the war. We’ll give them to whoever needs them. It’s a waste to directly use it to increase our cultivations. Furthermore, we are cultivating quite well right now.”

“Sounds good.” Huo Yuhao acknowledged his words and immediately started to meditate. There was nothing better than meditating to restore his energy right now.

----------------

Daybreak...

The sky had already turned bright, and Bei Bei led those from the Tang Sect outside Shrek Academy as they silently followed.

Huo Yuhao was still a little listless even though he had already grabbed a bite to eat. However, some of his energy had been restored after resting for two hours. He could only rest after getting to the front lines, but Shrek Academy wasn’t too far from the fighting.

Not long afterward, Dean Yan Shaozhe and Elder Song walked out from the Academy.

“Elder Song, Dean Yan.” Bei Bei rushed up to receive them.

Elder Song smiled and asked, “Are you guys ready?”

“We’re all ready,” Bei Bei answered.

Elder Song was the most senior, and also the strongest. It was obvious that she was leading the others.

Bei Bei was leading the people from the Tang Sect. With Xu Sanshi, Jiang Nannan, Huo Yuhao, Xiao Xiao, Ji Juechen, Nan Qiuqiu and Ye Guyi with him, they indeed had a strong lineup for this mission. Only a few leading figures from the Soul Tool Hall remained in the Tang Sect. Xuan Ziwen, He Caitou, Gao Dalou, Na Na and Jing Ziyan were all holding the fort at headquarters.

“Alright, let’s move out.” Elder Song waved her hand. She was already rising into the air.

Yan Shaozhe nodded at everyone else before he flew after her.

Ever since the last beast wave and he was emotionally hurt, he had been keeping a low profile. Now that he was following Elder Song to the front line, and considering that Elder Song was Xian Lin’er’s mother, he became even more reserved.

Everyone from the Tang Sect followed behind the two Transcendent Douluo and proceeded towards the front line.

Shrek City was within the Heavenly Soul Empire’s territory, located to the southeast of the empire. Even though more than two-thirds of the Heavenly Soul Empire’s territory had been occupied, the area west of Shrek City was still under the Heavenly Soul Empire’s control. Apart from that, the empire still controlled most of the southeast parts of its borders.

The south of the empire was linked to the Star Luo Empire. To prevent the Sun Moon Empire from attacking them from the south, the Star Luo Empire did their best to support the Heavenly Soul Empire. This helped the remaining troops of the Heavenly Soul Empire regain some stability.

East of the Heavenly Soul Empire was the Dou Ling Empire. Close to half of the Dou Ling Empire’s troops were in the Heavenly Soul Empire, trying to resist the Sun Moon Empire. The three empires of the original Douluo Continent could be said to be banding together to fight a common enemy.

The team from Shrek needed to cross the plains of the Heavenly Soul Empire and reach the north, before proceeding to the northwest. In less than five hundred kilometers, they would reach the front line. The Sun Moon Empire’s army was that close to Shrek City.

Someone as strong as Elder Song could fly for two hours at her fastest speed and reach the front line. With the Tang Sect team with her, they would need around four hours. From afar, the Sun Moon Empire’s military base could be seen on the ground.

This was the first time that everyone from the Tang Sect had seen a battlefield of such a scale. Compared to the border with the Star Luo Empire, the battlefield here was much larger.

The Heavenly Soul Empire had set up their base of operations in a city known as Heavenly Spirit City. As they had too many soldiers, they had no choice but to extend their formations outside the city. Most of the army was quite spread out, keeping them all from being targeted by a single powerful soul tool.Since the start of the war, the Heavenly Soul Empire had on many occasions suffered at the hands of stationary soul cannons.

There were close to five hundred thousand soldiers from the three empires here. The Heavenly Soul Empire had the most soldiers here.

A number greater than a hundred thousand was already very impressive, not to mention five hundred thousand. From the sky, it appeared like there were an infinite number of soldiers.

On the other side, the Sun Moon Empire had around three hundred thousand soldiers, twenty-five kilometers from the borders of the Heavenly Soul Empire.

The weather was very good today, so the entire battlefield was visible. This was especially true for Huo Yuhao, who used his Spirit Eyes. He could even see the aerial surveillance soul tools over the Heavenly Soul Empire.

What a vast battlefield!

Although the Star Luo Empire had many soldiers, most of the empire was covered in mountainous regions, and the scale of its army was also not as great as that of the Heavenly Soul and Sun Moon Empires. It wasn’t very obvious that they had so many soldiers.

“Rest for a moment.” Elder Song asked everyone to stop. They weren’t too far from Heavenly Spirit City. In a war, misunderstandings arose easily. To prevent this, it wasn’t wise for them to advance recklessly.
